
Origin of the Family, Private Property and the State

Frederick Engels

From
http://www.marxists.org/archive/marx/works/1884/origin-family/index.html
Converted to eBook by Andrew Lannan

[Marxists Internet Archive]

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Written: March-May, 1884;
First Published: October 1884, in Hottingen-Zurich;
Source: Marx/Engels Selected Works, Volume Three;
Translation: The text is essentially the English translation by Alick
West published in 1942, but it has been revised against the German text
as it appeared in _MEW_ [Marx-Engels Werke] Volume 21, Dietz Verlag
1962, and the spelling of names and other terms has been modernised;
Transcription/Markup: Zodiac/Brian Baggins;
Online Version: Marx/Engels Internet Archive (marxists.org) 1993, 1999,
2000.
Proofed and corrected: Mark Harris 2010

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Introduction

After Marx’s death, in rumaging through Marx’s manuscripts, Engels came
upon Marx’s precis of _Ancient Society_ – a book by progressive US
scholar Lewis Henry Morgan and published in London 1877. The precis was
written between 1880-81 and contained Marx’s numerous remarks on Morgan
as well as passages from other sources.

After reading the precis, Engels set out to write a special treatise –
which he saw as fulfilling Marx’s will. Working on the book, he used
Marx’s precis, and some of Morgan’s factual material and conclusions. He
also made use of many and diverse data gleaned in his own studies of the
history of Greece, Rome, Old Ireland, and the Ancient Germans.

It would, of course, become _The Origin of the Family, Private Property
and the State_ – the first edition of which was published October 1884
in Hottingen-Zurich.

Engels wrote _The Origin of the Family, Private Property and the State_
in just two months – beginning toward the end of March 1884 and
completing it by the end of May. It focuses on early human history,
following the disintegration of the primitive community and the
emergence of a class society based on private property. Engels looks
into the origin and essence of the state, and concludes it is bound to
wither away leaving a classless society.

  Engels: “Along with [the classes] the state will inevitably fall.
  Society, which will reorganise production on the basis of a free and
  equal association of the producers, will put the whole machinery of
  state where it will then belong: into the museum of antiquity, by the
  side of the spinning-wheel and the bronze axe.”

In 1890, having gathered new material on the history of primitive
society, Engels set about preparing a new edition of his book. He
studied the latest books on the subject – including those of Russian
historian Maxim Kovalevsky. (The fourth edition, Stuttgart, 1892, was
dedicated to Kovalevsky.) As a result, he introduced a number of changes
in his original text and also considerable insertions.

In 1894, Engels’s book appeared in Russian translation. It was the first
of Engels’s works published legally in Russia. Lenin would later
describe it as “one of the fundamental works of modern socialism.”

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Preface to the First Edition, 1884

------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

The following chapters are, in a sense, the execution of a bequest. No
less a man than Karl Marx had made it one of his future tasks to present
the results of Morgan’s researches in the light of the conclusions of
his own — within certain limits, I may say our — materialistic
examination of history, and thus to make clear their full significance.
For Morgan in his own way had discovered afresh in America the
materialistic conception of history discovered by Marx forty years ago,
and in his comparison of barbarism and civilization it had led him, in
the main points, to the same conclusions as Marx. And just as the
professional economists in Germany were for years as busy in
plagiarizing Capital as they were persistent in attempting to kill it by
silence, so Morgan's Ancient Society ^([1]) received precisely the same
treatment from the spokesmen of “prehistoric” science in England. My
work can only provide a slight substitute for what my departed friend no
longer had the time to do. But I have the critical notes which he made
to his extensive extracts from Morgan, and as far as possible I
reproduce them here.

According to the materialistic conception, the determining factor in
history is, in the final instance, the production and reproduction of
the immediate essentials of life. This, again, is of a twofold
character. On the one side, the production of the means of existence, of
articles of food and clothing, dwellings, and of the tools necessary for
that production; on the other side, the production of human beings
themselves, the propagation of the species. The social organization
under which the people of a particular historical epoch and a particular
country live is determined by both kinds of production: by the stage of
development of labor on the one hand and of the family on the other.

The lower the development of labor and the more limited the amount of
its products, and consequently, the more limited also the wealth of the
society, the more the social order is found to be dominated by kinship
groups. However, within this structure of society based on kinship
groups the productivity of labor increasingly develops, and with it
private property and exchange, differences of wealth, the possibility of
utilizing the labor power of others, and hence the basis of class
antagonisms: new social elements, which in the course of generations
strive to adapt the old social order to the new conditions, until at
last their incompatibility brings about a complete upheaval. In the
collision of the newly-developed social classes, the old society founded
on kinship groups is broken up; in its place appears a new society, with
its control centered in the state, the subordinate units of which are no
longer kinship associations, but local associations; a society in which
the system of the family is completely dominated by the system of
property, and in which there now freely develop those class antagonisms
and class struggles that have hitherto formed the content of all
_written_ history.

It is Morgan’s great merit that he has discovered and reconstructed in
its main lines this prehistoric basis of our written history, and that
in the kinship groups of the North American Indians he has found the key
to the most important and hitherto insoluble riddles of earliest Greek,
Roman and German history. His book is not the work of a day. For nearly
forty years he wrestled with his material, until he was completely
master of it. But that also makes his book one of the few epoch-making
works of our time.

In the following presentation, the reader will in general easily
distinguish what comes from Morgan and what I have added. In the
historical sections on Greece and Rome I have not confined myself to
Morgan’s evidence, but have added what was available to me. The sections
on the Celts and the Germans are in the main my work; Morgan had to rely
here almost entirely on secondary sources, and for German conditions —
apart from Tacitus — on the worthless and liberalistic falsifications of
Mr. Freeman. The treatment of the economic aspects, which in Morgan’s
book was sufficient for his purpose but quite inadequate for mine, has
been done afresh by myself. And, finally, I am, of course, responsible
for all the conclusions drawn, in so far as Morgan is not expressly
cited.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

Footnotes

 

[1] Ancient Society, or Researches in the Lines of Human Progress from
Savagery, through Barbarism to Civilization, by Lewis H. Morgan, London,
Macmillan & Co., 1877. The book was printed in America and is peculiarly
difficult to obtain in London. The author died some years ago. [For the
purposes of this edition, all references to Ancient Society are from the
Charles H. Kerr edition, Chicago. — Ed.]

 

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Preface to the Fourth Edition, 1891

------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

The earlier large editions of this work have been out of print now for
almost half a year, and for some time the publisher has been asking me
to prepare a new edition. Until now, more urgent work kept me from doing
so. Since the appearance of the first edition seven years have elapsed,
during which our knowledge of the primitive forms of the family has made
important advances. There was, therefore, plenty to do in the way of
improvements and additions; all the more so as the proposed stereotyping
of the present text will make any further alterations impossible for
some time.

I have accordingly submitted the whole text to a careful revision and
made a number of additions which, I hope, take due account of the
present state of knowledge. I also give in the course of this preface a
short review of the development of the history of the family from
Bachofen to Morgan; I do so chiefly because the chauvinistically
inclined English anthropologists are still striving their utmost to kill
by silence the revolution which Morgan’s discoveries have effected in
our conception of primitive history, while they appropriate his results
without the slightest compunction. Elsewhere also the example of England
is in some cases followed only too closely.

My work has been translated into a number of other languages. First,
Italian: L’origine delta famiglia, delta proprieta privata e dello
stato, versions riveduta dall’autore, di Pasquale Martignetti,
Benevento, 1885. Then, Rumanian: Origina famdei, proprietatei private si
a statului, traducere de Joan Nadeide, in the Yassy periodical
Contemporanul, September, 1885, to May, 1886. Further, Danish:
Familjens, Privatejendommens og Statens Oprindelse, Dansk, af Forfattern
gennemgaaet Udgave, besorget af Gerson Trier, Kobenhavn, 1888. A French
translation by Henri Rave, based on the present German edition, is on
the press.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Before the beginning of the ’sixties, one cannot speak of a history of
the family. In this field, the science of history was still completely
under the influence of the five books of Moses. The patriarchal form of
the family, which was there described in greater detail than anywhere
else, was not only assumed without question to be the oldest form, but
it was also identified – minus its polygamy – with the bourgeois family
of today, so that the family had really experienced no historical
development at all; at most it was admitted that in primitive times
there might have been a period of sexual promiscuity. It is true that in
addition to the monogamous form of the family, two other forms were
known to exist – polygamy in the Orient and polyandry in India and
Tibet; but these three forms could not be arranged in any historical
order and merely appeared side by side without any connection. That
among some peoples of ancient history, as well as among some savages
still alive today, descent was reckoned, not from the father, but from
the mother, and that the female line was therefore regarded as alone
valid; that among many peoples of the present day in every continent
marriage is forbidden within certain large groups which at that time had
not been closely studied – these facts were indeed known and fresh
instances of them were continually being collected. But nobody knew what
to do with them, and even as late as E. B. Tylor’s Researches into the
Early History of Mankind, etc. (1865) they are listed as mere “curious
customs”, side by side with the prohibition among some savages against
touching burning wood with an iron tool and similar religious
mumbo-jumbo.

The history of the family dates from 1861, from the publication of
Bachofen’s Mutterrecht. [Mother-right, matriarchate – Ed.] In this work
the author advances the following propositions:

(1) That originally man lived in a state of sexual promiscuity, to
describe which Bachofen uses the mistaken term “hetaerism”;

(2) that such promiscuity excludes any certainty of paternity, and that
descent could therefore be reckoned only in the female line, according
to mother-right, and that this was originally the case amongst all the
peoples of antiquity;

(3) that since women, as mothers, were the only parents of the younger
generation that were known with certainty, they held a position of such
high respect and honor that it became the foundation, in Bachofen’s
conception, of a regular rule of women (gynaecocracy);

(4) that the transition to monogamy, where the woman belonged to one man
exclusively, involved a violation of a primitive religious law (that is,
actually a violation of the traditional right of the other men to this
woman), and that in order to expiate this violation or to purchase
indulgence for it the woman had to surrender herself for a limited
period.

Bachofen finds the proofs of these assertions in innumerable passages of
ancient classical literature, which he collected with immense industry.
According to him, the development from “hetaerism” to monogamy and from
mother-right to father-right is accomplished, particularly among the
Greeks, as the consequence of an advance in religious conceptions,
introducing into the old hierarchy of the gods, representative of the
old outlook, new divinities, representative of the new outlook, who push
the former more and more into the background. Thus, according to
Bachofen, it is not the development of men’s actual conditions of life,
but the religious reflection of these conditions inside their heads,
which has brought about the historical changes in the social position of
the sexes in relation to each other. In accordance with this view,
Bachofen interprets the Oresteia of Aschylus as the dramatic
representation of the conflict between declining mother-right and the
new father-right that arose and triumphed in the heroic age. For the
sake of her paramour, Ægisthus, Clytemnestra slays her husband,
Agamemnon, on his return from the Trojan War; but Orestes, the son of
Agamemnon and herself, avenges his father’s murder by slaying his
mother. For this act he is pursued by the Furies, the demonic guardians
of mother-right, according to which matricide is the gravest and most
inexpiable crime. But Apollo, who by the voice of his oracle had
summoned Orestes to this deed, and Athena, who is called upon to give
judgment – the two deities who here represent the new patriarchal order
– take Orestes under their protection; Athena hears both sides. The
whole matter of the dispute is briefly summed up in the debate which now
takes place between Orestes and the Furies. Orestes contends that
Clytemnestra has committed a double crime; she has slain her husband and
thus she has also slain his father. Why should the Furies pursue him,
and not her, seeing that she is by far the more guilty? The answer is
striking: “She was not kin by blood to the man she slew.”

The murder of a man not related by blood, even if he be the husband of
the murderess, is expiable and does not concern the Furies; their office
is solely to punish murder between blood relations, and of such murders
the most grave and the most inexpiable, according to mother-right, is
matricide. Apollo now comes forward in Orestes’ defense; Athena calls
upon the Areopagites – the Athenian jurors – to vote; the votes for
Orestes’ condemnation and for his acquittal are equal; Athena, as
president, gives her vote for Orestes and acquits him. Father-right has
triumphed over mother-right, the “gods of young descent,” as the Furies
themselves call them, have triumphed over the Furies; the latter then
finally allow themselves to be persuaded to take up a new office in the
service of the new order.

This new but undoubtedly correct interpretation of the Oresteia is one
of the best and finest passages in the whole book, but it proves at the
same time that Bachofen believes at least as much as Æschylus did in the
Furies, Apollo, and Athena; for, at bottom, he believes that the
overthrow of mother-right by father-right was a miracle wrought during
the Greek heroic age by these divinities. That such a conception, which
makes religion the lever of world history, must finally end in pure
mysticism, is clear. It is therefore a tough and by no means always a
grateful task to plow through Bachofen’s solid tome. But all that does
not lessen his importance as a pioneer. He was the first to replace the
vague phrases about some unknown primitive state of sexual promiscuity
by proofs of the following facts: that abundant traces survive in old
classical literature of a state prior to monogamy among the Greeks and
Asiatics when not only did a man have sexual intercourse with several
women, but a woman with several men, without offending against morality;
that this custom did not disappear without leaving its traces in the
limited surrender which was the price women had to pay for the right to
monogamy; that therefore descent could originally be reckoned only in
the female line, from mother to mother; that far into the period of
monogamy, with its certain or at least acknowledged paternity, the
female line was still alone recognized; and that the original position
of the mothers, as the only certain parents of their children, secured
for them, and thus for their whole sex, a higher social position than
women have ever enjoyed since. Bachofen did not put these statements as
clearly as this, for he was hindered by his mysticism. But he proved
them; and in 1861 that was a real revolution.

Bachofen’s massive volume was written in German, the language of the
nation which at that time interested itself less than any other in the
prehistory of the modern family. Consequently, he remained unknown. His
first successor in the same field appeared in 1865, without ever having
heard of Bachofen.

This successor was J. F. McLennan, the exact opposite of his
predecessor. Instead of a mystic of genius, we have the dry-as-dust
jurist; instead of the exuberant imagination of a poet, the plausible
arguments of a barrister defending his brief. McLennan finds among many
savage, barbarian, and even civilized peoples of ancient and modern
times a form of marriage in which the bridegroom, alone or with his
friends, must carry off the bride from her relations by a show of force.
This custom must be the survival of an earlier custom when the men of
one tribe did in fact carry off their wives by force from other tribes.
What was the origin of this “marriage by capture”? So long as men could
find enough women in their own tribe, there was no reason whatever for
it. We find, however, no less frequently that among undeveloped peoples
there are certain groups (which in 1865 were still often identified with
the tribes themselves) within which marriage is forbidden, so that the
men are obliged to take their wives, and women their husbands, from
outside the group; whereas among other peoples the custom is that the
men of one group must take their wives only from within their own group.
McLennan calls the first peoples “exogamous” and the second
“endogamous”; he then promptly proceeds to construct a rigid opposition
between exogamous and endogamous “tribes.” And although his own
investigations into exogamy force the fact under his nose that in many,
if not in most or even in all, cases, this opposition exists only in his
own imagination, he nevertheless makes it the basis of his whole theory.
According to this theory, exogamous tribes can only obtain their wives
from other tribes; and since in savagery there is a permanent state of
war between tribe and tribe, these wives could only be obtained by
capture. McLennan then goes on to ask: Whence this custom of exogamy?
The conception of consanguinity and incest could not have anything to do
with it, for these things only came much later. But there was another
common custom among savages–the custom of killing female children
immediately after birth. This would cause a surplus of men in each
individual tribe, of which the inevitable and immediate consequence
would be that several men possessed a wife in common: polyandry. And
this would have the further consequence that it would be known who was
the mother of a child, but not who its father was: hence relationship
only in the female line, with exclusion of the male line – mother-right.
And a second consequence of the scarcity of women within a tribe – a
scarcity which polyandry mitigated, but did not remove – was precisely
this systematic, forcible abduction of women from other tribes.

As exogamy and polyandry are referable to one and the same cause – a
want of balance between the sexes–we are forced to regard all the
exogamous races as having originally been polyandrous.... Therefore we
must hold it to be beyond dispute that among exogamous races the first
system of kinship was that which recognized blood-ties through mothers
only.

(McLennan, Studies in Ancient History, 1886. Primitive Marriage, p. 124)

It is McLennan’s merit to have directed attention to the general
occurrence and great importance of what he calls exogamy. He did not by
any means discover the existence of exogamous groups; still less did he
understand them. Besides the early, scattered notes of many observers
(these were McLennan’s sources), Latham (Descriptive Ethnology, 1859)
had given a detailed and accurate description of this institution among
the Indian Magars, and had said that it was very widespread and occurred
in all parts of the world – a passage which McLennan himself cites.
Morgan, in 1847, in his letters on the Iroquois (_American Review_) and
in 1851 in _The League of the Iroquois_, had already demonstrated the
existence of exogamous groups among this tribe and had given an accurate
account of them; whereas McLennan, as we shall see, wrought greater
confusion here with his legalistic mind than Bachofen wrought in the
field of mother-right with his mystical fancies. It is also a merit of
McLennan that he recognized matrilineal descent as the earlier system,
though he was here anticipated by Bachofen, as he later acknowledged.
But McLennan is not clear on this either; he always speaks of “kinship
through females only,” and this term, which is correct for an earlier
stage, he continually applies to later stages of development when
descent and inheritance were indeed still traced exclusively through the
female line, but when kinship on the male side was also recognized and
expressed. There you have the pedantic mind of the jurist, who fixes on
a rigid legal term and goes on applying it unchanged when changed
conditions have made it applicable no longer.

Apparently McLennan’s theory, plausible though it was, did not seem any
too well established even to its author. At any rate, he himself is
struck by the fact that “it is observable that the form of capture is
now most distinctly marked and impressive just among those races which
have male kinship” (should be “descent in the male line”). (Ibid., p.
140) And again: “It is a curious fact that nowhere now, that we are
aware of, is infanticide a system where exogamy and the earliest form of
kinship co-exist.” (Ibid., p. 146.) Both these facts flatly contradict
his method of explanation, and he can only meet them with new and still
more complicated hypotheses.

Nevertheless, his theory found great applause and support in England.
McLennan was here generally regarded as the founder of the history of
the family and the leading authority on the subject. However many
exceptions and variations might be found in individual cases, his
opposition of exogamous and endogamous tribes continued to stand as the
recognized foundation of the accepted view, and to act as blinders,
obstructing any free survey of the field under investigation and so
making any decisive advance impossible. Against McLennan’s exaggerated
reputation in England – and the English fashion is copied elsewhere – it
becomes a duty to set down the fact that be has done more harm with his
completely mistaken antithesis between exogamous and endogamous “tribes”
than he has done good by his research.

Facts were now already coming to light in increasing number which did
not fit into his neat framework. McLennan knew only three forms of
marriage: polygyny, polyandry and monogamy. But once attention had been
directed to the question, more and more proofs were found that there
existed among undeveloped peoples forms of marriage in which a number of
men possessed a number of women in common, and Lubbock (_The Origin of
Civilization_, 1870) recognized this group marriage (“communal
marriage”) as a historical fact.

Immediately afterwards, in 1871, Morgan came forward with new and in
many ways decisive evidence. He had convinced himself that the peculiar
system of consanguinity in force among the Iroquois was common to all
the aboriginal inhabitants of the United States and therefore extended
over a whole continent, although it directly contradicted the degrees of
relationship arising out of the system of marriage as actually practiced
by these peoples. He then induced the Federal government to collect
information about the systems of consanguinity among the other peoples
of the world and to send out for this purpose tables and lists of
questions prepared by himself. He discovered from the replies: (1) that
the system of consanguinity of the American Indians was also in force
among numerous peoples in Asia and, in a somewhat modified form, in
Africa and Australia; (2) that its complete explanation was to be found
in a form of group marriage which was just dying out in Hawaii and other
Australasian islands; and (3) that side by side with this form of
marriage a system of consanguinity was in force in the same islands
which could only be explained through a still more primitive, now
extinct, form of group marriage. He published the collected evidence,
together with the conclusions he drew from it, in his Systems of
Consanguinity and Affinity, 1871, and thus carried the debate on to an
infinitely wider field. By starting from the systems of consanguinity
and reconstructing from them the corresponding forms of family, he
opened a new line of research and extended our range of vision into the
prehistory of man. If this method proved to be sound, McLennan’s pretty
theories would be completely demolished.

McLennan defended his theory in a new edition of Primitive Marriage
(_Studies in Ancient History_, 1876). Whilst he himself constructs a
highly artificial history of the family out of pure hypotheses, he
demands from Lubbock and Morgan not merely proofs for every one of their
statements, but proofs as indisputably valid as if they were to be
submitted in evidence in a Scottish court of law. And this is the man
who, from Tacitus’ report on the close relationship between maternal
uncle and sister’s son among the Germans (_Germania_, Chap. 20), from
Caesar’s report that the Britons in groups of ten or twelve possessed
their wives in common, from all the other reports of classical authors
on community of wives among barbarians, calmly draws the conclusion that
all these peoples lived in a state of polyandry! One might be listening
to a prosecuting counsel who can allow himself every liberty in arguing
his own case, but demands from defending counsel the most formal,
legally valid proof for his every word.

He maintains that group marriage is pure imagination, and by so doing
falls far behind Bachofen. He declares that Morgan’s systems of
consanguinity are mere codes of conventional politeness, the proof being
that the Indians also address a stranger or a white man as brother or
father. One might as well say that the terms “father,” “mother,”
“brother,” “sister” are mere meaningless forms of address because
Catholic priests and abbesses are addressed as “father” and “mother,”
and because monks and nuns, and even freemasons and members of English
trade unions and associations at their full sessions are addressed as
“brother” and “sister.” In a word, McLennan’s defense was miserably
feeble.

But on one point he had still not been assailed. The opposition of
exogamous and endogamous “tribes” on which his whole system rested not
only remained unshaken, but was even universally acknowledged as the
keystone of the whole history of the family. McLennan’s attempt to
explain this opposition might be inadequate and in contradiction with
his own facts. But the antithesis itself, the existence of two mutually
exclusive types of self-sufficient and independent tribes, of which the
one type took their wives from within the tribe, while the other type
absolutely forbade it – that was sacred gospel. Compare, for example,
Giraud-Teulon’s _Origines de la Famille_ (1874) and even Lubbock’s
_Origin of Civilization_ (fourth edition, 1882).

Here Morgan takes the field with his main work, _Ancient Society_
(1877), the work that underlies the present study. What Morgan had only
dimly guessed in 1871 is now developed in full consciousness. There is
no antithesis between endogamy and exogamy; up to the present, the
existence of exogamous “tribes” has not been demonstrated anywhere. But
at the time when group marriage still prevailed – and in all probability
it prevailed everywhere at some time – the tribe was subdivided into a
number of groups related by blood on the mother’s side, gentes, within
which it was strictly forbidden to marry, so that the men of a gens,
though they could take their wives from within the tribe and generally
did so, were compelled to take them from outside their gens. Thus while
each gens was strictly exogamous, the tribe embracing all the gentes was
no less endogamous. Which finally disposed of the last remains of
McLennan’s artificial constructions.

But Morgan did not rest here. Through the gens of the American Indians,
he was enabled to make his second great advance in his field of
research. In this gens, organized according to mother-right, he
discovered the primitive form out of which had developed the later gens
organized according to father-right, the gens as we find it among the
ancient civilized peoples. The Greek and Roman gens, the old riddle of
all historians, now found its explanation in the Indian gens, and a new
foundation was thus laid for the whole of primitive history.

This rediscovery of the primitive matriarchal gens as the earlier stage
of the patriarchal gens of civilized peoples has the same importance for
anthropology as Darwin’s theory of evolution has for biology and Marx’s
theory of surplus value for political economy. It enabled Morgan to
outline for the first time a history of the family in which for the
present, so far as the material now available permits, at least the
classic stages of development in their main outlines are now determined.
That this opens a new epoch in the treatment of primitive history must
be clear to everyone. The matriarchal gens has become the pivot on which
the whole science turns; since its discovery we know where to look and
what to look for in our research, and how to arrange the results. And,
consequently, since Morgan’s book, progress in this field has been made
at a far more rapid speed.

Anthropologists, even in England, now generally appreciate, or rather
appropriate, Morgan’s discoveries. But hardly one of them has the
honesty to admit that it is to Morgan that we owe this revolution in our
ideas. In England they try to kill his book by silence, and dispose of
its author with condescending praise for his earlier achievements; they
niggle endlessly over details and remain obstinately silent about his
really great discoveries. The original edition of _Ancient Society_ is
out of print; in America there is no sale for such things; in England,
it seems, the book was systematically suppressed, and the only edition
of this epochmaking work still circulating in the book trade is – the
German translation.

Why this reserve? It is difficult not to see in it a conspiracy of
silence; for politeness’ sake, our recognized anthropologists generally
pack their writings with quotations and other tokens of camaraderie. Is
it, perhaps, because Morgan is an American, and for the English
anthropologists it goes sorely against the grain that, despite their
highly creditable industry in collecting material, they should be
dependent for their general points of view in the arrangement and
grouping of this material, for their ideas in fact, on two foreigners of
genius, Bachofen and Morgan? They might put up with the German – but the
American? Every Englishman turns patriotic when he comes up against an
American, and of this I saw highly entertaining instances in the United
States. Moreover, McLennan was, so to speak, the officially appointed
founder and leader of the English school of anthropology. It was almost
a principle of anthropological etiquette to speak of his artificially
constructed historical series – child-murder, polygyny, marriage by
capture, matriarchal family – in tones only of profoundest respect. The
slightest doubt in the existence of exogamous and endogamous “tribes” of
absolute mutual exclusiveness was considered rank heresy. Morgan had
committed a kind of sacrilege in dissolving all these hallowed dogmas
into thin air. Into the bargain, he had done it in such a way that it
only needed saying to carry immediate conviction; so that the
McLennanites, who had hitherto been helplessly reeling to and fro
between exogamy and endogamy, could only beat their brows and exclaim:
“How could we be such fools as not to think of that for ourselves long
ago?”

As if these crimes had not already left the official school with the
option only of coldly ignoring him, Morgan filled the measure to
overflowing by not merely criticizing civilization, the society of
commodity production, the basic form of present-day society, in a manner
reminiscent of Fourier, but also by speaking of a future transformation
of this society in words which Karl Marx might have used. He had
therefore amply merited McLennan’s indignant reproach that “the
historical method is antipathetical to Mr. Morgan’s mind,” and its echo
as late as 1884 from Mr. Professor Giraud-Teulon of Geneva. In 1874
(_Origines de la Famille_) this same gentleman was still groping
helplessly in the maze of the McLennanite exogamy, from which Morgan had
to come and rescue him!

Of the other advances which primitive anthropology owes to Morgan, I do
not need to speak here; they are sufficiently discussed in the course of
this study. The fourteen years which have elapsed since the publication
of his chief work have greatly enriched the material available for the
study of the history of primitive human societies. The anthropologists,
travelers and primitive historians by profession have now been joined by
the comparative jurists, who have contributed either new material or new
points of view. As a result, some of Morgan’s minor hypotheses have been
shaken or even disproved. But not one of the great leading ideas of his
work has been ousted by this new material. The order which he introduced
into primitive history still holds in its main lines today. It is, in
fact, winning recognition to the same degree in which Morgan’s
responsibility for the great advance is carefully concealed. ^([1])

Frederick Engels
London, June 16, 1891

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

Footnotes

 

[1] On the voyage back from New York in September, 1888, I met a former
member of Congress for the district of Rochester, who had known Lewis
Morgan. Unfortunately, he could not tell me very much about him. He said
that Morgan had lived in Rochester as a private individual, occupied
only with his studies. His brother was a colonel, and had held a post in
the War Department in Washington; it was through him that Morgan had
managed to interest the Government in his researches and to get several
of his works published at public expense. While he was a member of
Congress, my informant had also on more than one occasion used his
influence on Morgan’s behalf.

 

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

I. Stages of Prehistoric Culture

------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

MORGAN is the first man who, with expert knowledge, has attempted to
introduce a definite order into the history of primitive man; so long as
no important additional material makes changes necessary, his
classification will undoubtedly remain in force.

Of the three main epochs – savagery, barbarism, and civilization – he is
concerned, of course, only with the first two and the transition to the
third. He divides both savagery and barbarism into lower, middle, and
upper stages according to the progress made in the production of food;
for, he says:

Upon their skill in this direction, the whole question of human
supremacy on the earth depended. Mankind are the only beings who may be
said to have gained an absolute control over the production of food....
It is accordingly probable that the great epochs of human progress have
been identified, more or less directly, with the enlargement of the
sources of subsistence.

[Morgan, op. cit., p. 19. -Ed.]

The development of the family takes a parallel course, but here the
periods have not such striking marks of differentiation.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

1. Savagery

(a.) LOWER STAGE. Childhood of the human race [Australopithecus]. Man
still lived in his original habitat, in tropical or subtropical forests,
and was partially at least a tree-dweller, for otherwise his survival
among huge beasts of prey cannot be explained. Fruit, nuts and roots
served him for food. The development of articulate speech is the main
result of this period. Of all the peoples known to history none was
still at this primitive level. Though this period may have lasted
thousands of years, we have no direct evidence to prove its existence;
but once the evolution of man from the animal kingdom is admitted, such
a transitional stage must necessarily be assumed.^([A])

(b.) MIDDLE STAGE. Begins with the utilization of fish for food
(including crabs, mussels, and other aquatic animals), and with the use
of fire. The two are complementary, since fish becomes edible only by
the use of fire. With this new source of nourishment, men now became
independent of climate and locality; even as savages, they could, by
following the rivers and coasts, spread over most of the earth. Proof of
these migrations is the distribution over every continent of the crudely
worked, unsharpened flint tools of the earlier Stone Age, known as
“palaeoliths,” all or most of which date from this period. New
environments, ceaseless exercise of his inventive faculty, and the
ability to produce fire by friction, led man to discover new kinds of
food: farinaceous roots and tubers, for instance, were baked in hot
ashes or in ground ovens. With the invention of the first weapons, club
and spear, game could sometimes be added to the fare. But the tribes
which figure in books as living entirely, that is, exclusively, by
hunting never existed in reality; the yield of the hunt was far too
precarious. At this stage, owing to the continual uncertainty of food
supplies, cannibalism seems to have arisen, and was practiced from now
onwards for a long time. The Australian aborigines and many of the
Polynesians are still in this middle stage of savagery today.^([B])

(c.) UPPER STAGE. Begins with the invention of the bow and arrow,
whereby game became a regular source of food, and hunting a normal form
of work. Bow, string, and arrow already constitute a very complex
instrument, whose invention implies long, accumulated experience and
sharpened intelligence, and therefore knowledge of many other inventions
as well. We find, in fact, that the peoples acquainted with the bow and
arrow but not yet with pottery (from which Morgan dates the transition
to barbarism) are already making some beginnings towards settlement in
villages and have gained some control over the production of means of
subsistence; we find wooden vessels and utensils, finger-weaving
(without looms) with filaments of bark; plaited baskets of bast or
osier; sharpened (neolithic) stone tools. With the discovery of fire and
the stone ax, dug-out canoes now become common; beams and planks arc
also sometimes used for building houses. We find all these advances, for
instance, among the Indians of northwest America, who are acquainted
with the bow and arrow but not with pottery. The bow and arrow was for
savagery what the iron sword was for barbarism and fire-arms for
civilization – the decisive weapon.^([C])

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

2. Barbarism

(a.) LOWER STAGE. Dates from the introduction of pottery. In many cases
it has been proved, and in all it is probable, that the first pots
originated from the habit of covering baskets or wooden vessels with
clay to make them fireproof; in this way it was soon discovered that the
clay mold answered the purpose without any inner vessel.

Thus far we have been able to follow a general line of development
applicable to all peoples at a given period without distinction of
place. With the beginning of barbarism, however, we have reached a stage
when the difference in the natural endowments of the two hemispheres of
the earth comes into play. The characteristic feature of the period of
barbarism is the domestication and breeding of animals and the
cultivation of plants. Now, the Eastern Hemisphere, the so-called Old
World, possessed nearly all the animals adaptable to domestication, and
all the varieties of cultivable cereals except one; the Western
Hemisphere, America, had no mammals that could be domesticated except
the llama, which, moreover, was only found in one part of South America,
and of all the cultivable cereals only one, though that was the best,
namely, maize. Owing to these differences in natural conditions, the
population of each hemisphere now goes on its own way, and different
landmarks divide the particular stages in each of the two cases.

(b.) MIDDLE STAGE. Begins in the Eastern Hemisphere with domestication
of animals; in the Western, with the cultivation, by means of
irrigation, of plants for food, and with the use of adobe (sun-dried)
bricks and stone for building.

We will begin with the Western Hemisphere, as here this stage was never
superseded before the European conquest.

At the time when they were discovered, the Indians at the lower stage of
barbarism (comprising all the tribes living east of the Mississippi)
were already practicing some horticulture of maize, and possibly also of
gourds, melons, and other garden plants, from which they obtained a very
considerable part of their food. They lived in wooden houses in villages
protected by palisades. The tribes in the northwest, particularly those
in the region of the Columbia River, were still at the upper stage of
savagery and acquainted neither with pottery nor with any form of
horticulture. The so-called Pueblo Indians of New Mexico, however, and
the Mexicans, Central Americans, and Peruvians at the time of their
conquest were at the middle stage of barbarism. They lived in houses
like fortresses, made of adobe brick or of stone, and cultivated maize
and other plants, varying according to locality and climate, in
artificially irrigated plots of ground, which supplied their main source
of food; some animals even had also been domesticated – the turkey and
other birds by the Mexicans, the llama by the Peruvians. They could also
work metals, but not iron; hence they were still unable to dispense with
stone weapons and tools. The Spanish conquest then cut short any further
independent development.

In the Eastern Hemisphere the middle stage of barbarism began with the
domestication of animals providing milk and meat, but horticulture seems
to have remained unknown far into this period.^([D]) It was, apparently,
the domestication and breeding of animals and the formation of herds of
considerable size that led to the differentiation of the Aryans and
Semites^([E]) from the mass of barbarians. The European and Asiatic
Aryans still have the same names for cattle, but those for most of the
cultivated plants are already different.

In suitable localities, the keeping of herds led to a pastoral life: the
Semites lived upon the grassy plains of the Euphrates and Tigris
[Mesopotamia], and the Aryans upon those of India and of the Oxus and
Jaxartes, of the Don and the Dnieper. It must have been on the borders
of such pasture lands that animals were first domesticated. To later
generations, consequently, the pastoral tribes appear to have come from
regions which, so far from being the cradle of mankind, were almost
uninhabitable for their savage ancestors and even for man at the lower
stages of barbarism. But having once accustomed themselves to pastoral
life in the grassy plains of the rivers, these barbarians of the middle
period would never have dreamed of returning willingly to the native
forests of their ancestors. Even when they were forced further to the
north and west, the Semites and Aryans could not move into the forest
regions of western Asia and of Europe until by cultivation of grain they
had made it possible to pasture and especially to winter their herds on
this less favorable land. It is more than probable that among these
tribes the cultivation of grain originated from the need for cattle
fodder and only later became important as a human food supply.

The plentiful supply of milk and meat and especially the beneficial
effect of these foods on the growth of the children account perhaps for
the superior development of the Aryan and Semitic races. It is a fact
that the Pueblo Indians of New Mexico, who are reduced to an almost
entirely vegetarian diet, have a smaller brain than the Indians at the
lower stage of barbarism, who eat more meat and fish.^([F]) In any case,
cannibalism now gradually dies out, surviving only as a religious act or
as a means of working magic, which is here almost the same thing.

(c.) UPPER STAGE. Begins with the smelting of iron ore, and passes into
civilization with the invention of alphabetic writing and its use for
literary records [beginning in Mesopotamia in around 3000 B.C.E.]. This
stage (as we have seen, only the Eastern Hemisphere passed through it
independently) is richer in advances in production than all the
preceding stages together. To it belong the Greeks of the heroic age,
the tribes of Italy shortly before the foundation of Rome, the Germans
of Tacitus and the Norsemen of the Viking age.^([G])

Above all, we now first meet the iron plowshare drawn by cattle, which
made large-scale agriculture, the cultivation of fields, possible, and
thus created a practically unrestricted food supply in comparison with
previous conditions. This led to the clearance of forest land for
tillage and pasture, which in turn was impossible on a large scale
without the iron ax and the iron spade. Population rapidly increased in
number, and in small areas became dense. Prior to field agriculture,
conditions must have been very exceptional if they allowed half a
million people to be united under a central organization; probably such
a thing never occurred.

We find the upper stage of barbarism at its highest in the Homeric
poems, particularly in the Iliad. Fully developed iron tools, the
bellows, the hand-mill, the potter’s wheel, the making of oil and wine,
metal work developing almost into a fine art, the wagon and the
war-chariot, ship-building with beams and planks, the beginnings of
architecture as art, walled cities with towers and battlements, the
Homeric epic and a complete mythology – these are the chief legacy
brought by the Greeks from barbarism into civilization. When we compare
the descriptions which Caesar and even Tacitus give of the Germans, who
stood at the beginning of the cultural stage from which the Homeric
Greeks were just preparing to make the next advance, we realize how rich
was the development of production within the upper stage of barbarism.

The sketch which I have given here, following Morgan, of the development
of mankind through savagery and barbarism to the beginnings of
civilization, is already rich enough in new features; what is more, they
cannot be disputed, since they are drawn directly from the process of
production. Yet my sketch will seem flat and feeble compared with the
picture to be unrolled at the end of our travels; only then will the
transition from barbarism to civilization stand out in full light and in
all its striking contrasts. For the time being, Morgan’s division may be
summarized thus:

_SAVAGERY_ – the period in which man’s appropriation of products in
their natural state predominates; the products of human art are chiefly
instruments which assist this appropriation.

_BARBARISM_ – the period during which man learns to breed domestic
animals and to practice agriculture, and acquires methods of increasing
the supply of natural products by human activity.

_CIVILIZATION_ – the period in which man learns a more advanced
application of work to the products of nature, the period of industry
proper and of art.

 

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Editorial Footnotes

The intent of these footnotes are both to help the modern reader
critically assess this work in face of recent scientific evidence and to
show how effective Engels' dialectical method was that many of his
conclusions remain true to this day. The following chapters do not have
editorial footnotes because they are not needed as much as they are in
this chapter (and this editor is not as knowledgable on those other
subjects!). It should be noted that Engels predominant focus on European
cultures is due to his lack of data on other cultures. These notes were
written by MIA volunteer Brian Baggins (July, 2000).

A In 1880, the evidence for this was astoundingly scarce, yet Engels’
conclusions (most importantly articulate, not modern, but not ape
speech) remain correct to this day. Throughout the 20th-century,
groundbreaking new archeological finds opened up our understanding of
this period. These characteristics are descriptive of the first human
genus: Australopithecus (the first fossil evidence was found in 1924 at
Taung, SA) who came into existance 5-6 million years ago on the content
of Africa, and became extinct in the Early Pleistocene period (1.6
million to 900,000 years ago). These humans primarily were dependent on
fruits, roots, etc. but likely supplemented this as scavengers. They did
not live in caves or dwellings of their own choosing, but were primarily
jungle dwellers, likely residing in trees.

B Engels here describes the practices of homo erectus, and again his
conclusions are lucid despite the lack of much evidence in his 19th
century. Collection of their own food was predominant, the use of fire
is widely accepted, they hunted animals to some extent, and most
importantly these practices allowed for the migration of humanity. One
million years ago homo erectus left Africa and settled in the Middle
East (which was later the cradle of civilization, not surprising
considering it was the great crossroads of human migration), splitting
up with migrations from Southern Europe to throughout Southern Asia (the
extent of the ice caps had not yet reseeded so settlement of the
northern regions was not yet possible).

Engels does however make two mistakes in his conclusions: cannibalism
was very likely nonexistent (its practice in human history is
questionable) and Polynesians and Australians are not homo erectus, but
homo sapiens.

C Characteristics descriptive of homo sapiens, i.e. modern human beings,
who first emerged 100,000 years ago, and who very likely had their
origins in Africa (it is thought that the homo erectus became extinct
throughout the world, and homo sapiens emerged from the genus of homo
erectus that had survived in Africa).

D The data of the 1880s has been proved partially inaccurate. While it
is true that the Mesopotamians domesticated animals around the same time
they were also the first farmers in world history (in around 10,000
B.C.E.). The exact sequence is unknown.

E It is important to point out Engels’ coupling of Aryans and Semites.
Information on Mesopotamia was limited to biblical text until the
mid-19th century — it was not until the 1850s onwords when archeology
began to explore and gain historical evidence in Mesopotamia. This
coupling therefore is likely a combination of both biblical text
(referring to the biblical peoples Aryans and Semites instead of the
region Mesopotamia) and contemporary archeological work (the data of his
conclusions).

Another facet of this combination was Engels lack of prejudice. By the
19th-century Aryans were thought to be a unique human race and were
cited as scientific evidence of racial superiority (even later this
would evolve into the theory that the Germans were the most “pure”
Aryans). This popular theory would not be disapproved by anthropologists
until the 20th century. The fact that Engels couples them together
evidences a noteworthy lack of the prevailent racism of the time.

F The theory that the larger brain is more intelligent was disproven by
the end of the 19th century. Intelligence can be generally compared by
brain size relative to body size. Because the Pueblo Indians were
smaller humans, naturally their brains were smaller. The same is true
for Africans, who are larger and so their brains are larger.

G This is mistaken. The Mesopotamian (3500-1000 B.C.E.), Egyptian
(3000-500 B.C.E.), Harrapan (2500-1000 B.C.E.), & Chinese (2000 B.C.E. –
1800 C.E.) civilizations long preceded the Europeans in this stage: the
Greeks were the first in Europe at around 500 B.C.E.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

II. The Family

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The Consanguine Family: The First Stage of the Family
The Punaluan Family
The Pairing Family
The Monogamous Family

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

MORGAN, who spent a great part of his life among the Iroquois Indians –
settled to this day in New York State – and was adopted into one of
their tribes (the Senecas), found in use among them a system of
consanguinity which was in contradiction to their actual family
relationships. There prevailed among them a form of monogamy easily
terminable on both sides, which Morgan calls the “pairing family.” The
issue of the married pair was therefore known and recognized by
everybody: there could be no doubt about whom to call father, mother,
son, daughter, brother, sister. But these names were actually used quite
differently. The Iroquois calls not only his own children his sons and
daughters, but also the children of his brothers; and they call him
father. The children of his sisters, however, he calls his nephews and
nieces, and they call him their uncle. The Iroquois woman, on the other
hand, calls her sisters’ children, as well as her own, her sons and
daughters, and they call her mother. But her brothers’ children she
calls her nephews and nieces, and she is known as their aunt. Similarly,
the children of brothers call one another brother and sister, and so do
the children of sisters. A woman's own children and the children of her
brother, on the other hand, call one another cousins. And these are not
mere empty names, but expressions of actual conceptions of nearness and
remoteness, of equality and difference in the degrees of consanguinity:
these conceptions serve as the foundation of a fully elaborated system
of consanguinity through which several hundred different relationships
of one individual can be expressed. What is more, this system is not
only in full force among all American Indians (no exception has been
found up to the present), but also retains its validity almost unchanged
among the aborigines of India, the Dravidian tribes in the Deccan and
the Gaura tribes in Hindustan. To this day the Tamils of southern India
and the Iroquois Seneca Indians in New York State still express more
than two hundred degrees of consanguinity in the same manner. And among
these tribes of India, as among all the American Indians, the actual
relationships arising out of the existing form of the family contradict
the system of consanguinity.

How is this to be explained? In view of the decisive part played by
consanguinity in the social structure of all savage and barbarian
peoples, the importance of a system so widespread cannot be dismissed
with phrases. When a system is general throughout America and also
exists in Asia among peoples of a quite different race, when numerous
instances of it are found with greater or less variation in every part
of Africa and Australia, then that system has to be historically
explained, not talked out of existence, as McLennan, for example, tried
to do. The names of father, child, brother, sister are no mere
complimentary forms of address; they involve quite definite and very
serious mutual obligations which together make up an essential part of
the social constitution of the peoples in question.

The explanation was found. In the Sandwich Islands (Hawaii) there still
existed in the first half of the nineteenth century a form of family in
which the fathers and mothers, brothers and sisters, sons and daughters,
uncles and aunts, nephews and nieces were exactly what is required by
the American and old Indian system of consanguinity. But now comes a
strange thing. Once again, the system of consanguinity in force in
Hawaii did not correspond to the actual form of the Hawaiian family. For
according to the Hawaiian system of consanguinity all children of
brothers and sisters are without exception brothers and sisters of one
another and are considered to be the common children not only of their
mother and her sisters or of their father and his brothers, but of all
the brothers and sisters of both their parents without distinction.
While, therefore, the American system of consanguinity presupposes a
more primitive form of the family which has disappeared in America, but
still actually exists in Hawaii, the Hawaiian system of consanguinity,
on the other hand, points to a still earlier form of the family which,
though we can nowhere prove it to be still in existence, nevertheless
must have existed; for otherwise the corresponding system of
consanguinity could never have arisen.

The family [says Morgan] represents an active principle. It is never
stationary, but advances from a lower to a higher form as society
advances from a lower to a higher condition.... Systems of
consanguinity, on the contrary, are passive; recording the progress made
by the family at long intervals apart, and only changing radically when
the family has radically changed.

[Morgan, op. cit., p. 444. – Ed.]

“And,” adds Marx, “the same is true of the political, juridical,
religious, and philosophical systems in general.” While the family
undergoes living changes, the system of consanguinity ossifies; while
the system survives by force of custom, the family outgrows it. But just
as Cuvier could deduce from the marsupial bone of an animal skeleton
found near Paris that it belonged to a marsupial animal and that extinct
marsupial animals once lived there, so with the same certainty we can
deduce from the historical survival of a system of consanguinity that an
extinct form of family once existed which corresponded to it.

The systems of consanguinity and the forms of the family we have just
mentioned differ from those of today in the fact that every child has
more than one father and mother. In the American system of
consanguinity, to which the Hawaiian family corresponds, brother and
sister cannot be the father and mother of the same child; but the
Hawaiian system of consanguinity, on the contrary, presupposes a family
in which this was the rule. Here we find ourselves among forms of family
which directly contradict those hitherto generally assumed to be alone
valid. The traditional view recognizes only monogamy, with, in addition,
polygamy on the part of individual men, and at the very most polyandry
on the part of individual women; being the view of moralizing
philistines, it conceals the fact that in practice these barriers raised
by official society are quietly and calmly ignored. The study of
primitive history, however, reveals conditions where the men live in
polygamy and their wives in polyandry at the same time, and their common
children are therefore considered common to them all – and these
conditions in their turn undergo a long series of changes before they
finally end in monogamy. The trend of these changes is to narrow more
and more the circle of people comprised within the common bond of
marriage, which was originally very wide, until at last it includes only
the single pair, the dominant form of marriage today.

Reconstructing thus the past history of the family, Morgan, in agreement
with most of his colleagues, arrives at a primitive stage when
unrestricted sexual freedom prevailed within the tribe, every woman
belonging equally to every man and every man to every woman. Since the
eighteenth century there had been talk of such a primitive state, but
only in general phrases. Bachofen – and this is one of his great merits
– was the first to take the existence of such a state seriously and to
search for its traces in historical and religious survivals. Today we
know that the traces he found do not lead back to a social stage of
promiscuous sexual intercourse, but to a much later form – namely, group
marriage. The primitive social stage of promiscuity, if it ever existed,
belongs to such a remote epoch that we can hardly expect to prove its
existence directly by discovering its social fossils among backward
savages. Bachofen's merit consists in having brought this question to
the forefront for examination. [1]

Lately it has become fashionable to deny the existence of this initial
stage in human sexual life. Humanity must be spared this “shame.” It is
pointed out that all direct proof of such a stage is lacking, and
particular appeal is made to the evidence from the rest of the animal
world; for, even among animals, according to the numerous facts
collected by Letourneau (_Evolution du manage et de la faults_, 1888),
complete promiscuity in sexual intercourse marks a low stage of
development. But the only conclusion I can draw from all these facts, so
far as man and his primitive conditions of life are concerned, is that
they prove nothing whatever. That vertebrates mate together for a
considerable period is sufficiently explained by physiological causes –
in the case of birds, for example, by the female’s need of help during
the brooding period; examples of faithful monogamy among birds prove
nothing about man, for the simple reason that men are not descended from
birds. And if strict monogamy is the height of all virtue, then the palm
must go to the tapeworm, which has a complete set of male and female
sexual organs in each of its 50-200 proglottides, or sections, and
spends its whole life copulating in all its sections with itself.
Confining ourselves to mammals, however, we find all forms of sexual
life – promiscuity, indications of group marriage, polygyny, monogamy.
Polyandry alone is lacking – it took human beings to achieve that. Even
our nearest relations, the quadrumana, exhibit every possible variation
in the grouping of males and females; and if we narrow it down still
more and consider only the four anthropoid apes, all that Letourneau has
to say about them is that they are sometimes monogamous, sometimes
polygamous, while Saussure, quoted by Giraud-Teulon, maintains that they
are monogamous. The more recent assertions of the monogamous habits of
the anthropoid apes which are cited by Westermarck (_The History of
Human Marriage,_ London 1891), are also very far from proving anything.
In short, our evidence is such that honest Letourneau admits: “Among
mammals there is no strict relation between the degree of intellectual
development and the form of sexual life.” And Espinas (_Des societes
animates_, 1877), says in so many words:

The herd is the highest social group which we can observe among animals.
It is composed, so it appears, of families, but from the start the
family and the herd are in conflict with one another and develop in
inverse proportion.

As the above shows, we know practically nothing definite about the
family and other social groupings of the anthropoid apes; the evidence
is flatly contradictory. Which is not to be wondered at. The evidence
with regard to savage human tribes is contradictory enough, requiring
very critical examination and sifting; and ape societies are far more
difficult to observe than human. For the present, therefore, we must
reject any conclusion drawn from such completely unreliable reports.

The sentence quoted from Espinas, however, provides a better starting
point. Among the higher animals the herd and the family are not
complementary to one another, but antagonistic. Espinas shows very well
how the jealousy of the males during the mating season loosens the ties
of every social herd or temporarily breaks it up.

When the family bond is close and exclusive, herds form only in
exceptional cases. When on the other hand free sexual intercourse or
polygamy prevails, the herd comes into being almost spontaneously....
Before a herd can be formed, family ties must be loosened and the
individual must have become free again. This is the reason why organized
flocks are so rarely found among birds.... We find more or less
organized societies among mammals, however, precisely because here the
individual is not merged in the family.... In its first growth,
therefore, the common feeling of the herd has no greater enemy than the
common feeling of the family. We state it without hesitation: only by
absorbing families which had undergone a radical change could a social
form higher than the family have developed; at the same time, these
families were thereby enabled later to constitute themselves afresh
under infinitely more favorable circumstances.

[Espinas, op. cit., quoted by Giraud-Teulon, Origines du mariage et de
la famille,
1884, pp. 518-20].

Here we see that animal societies are, after all, of some value for
drawing conclusions about human societies; but the value is only
negative. So far as our evidence goes, the higher vertebrates know only
two forms of family – polygyny or separate couples; each form allows
only one adult male, only one husband. The jealousy of the male, which
both consolidates and isolates the family, sets the animal family in
opposition to the herd. The jealousy of the males prevents the herd, the
higher social form, from coming into existence, or weakens its cohesion,
or breaks it up during the mating period; at best, it attests its
development. This alone is sufficient proof that animal families and
primitive human society are incompatible, and that when primitive men
were working their way up from the animal creation, they either had no
family at all or a form that does not occur among animals. In small
numbers, an animal so defenseless as evolving man might struggle along
even in conditions of isolation, with no higher social grouping than the
single male and female pair, such as Westermarck, following the reports
of hunters, attributes to the gorillas and the chimpanzees. For man's
development beyond the level of the animals, for the achievement of the
greatest advance nature can show, something more was needed: the power
of defense lacking to the individual had to be made good by the united
strength and co-operation of the herd. To explain the transition to
humanity from conditions such as those in which the anthropoid apes live
today would be quite impossible; it looks much more as if these apes had
strayed off the line of evolution and were gradually dying out or at
least degenerating. That alone is sufficient ground for rejecting all
attempts based on parallels drawn between forms of family and those of
primitive man. Mutual toleration among the adult males, freedom from
jealousy, was the first condition for the formation of those larger,
permanent groups in which alone animals could become men. And what, in
fact, do we find to be the oldest and most primitive form of family
whose historical existence we can indisputably prove and which in one or
two parts of the world we can still study today? Group marriage, the
form of family in which whole groups of men and whole groups of women
mutually possess one another, and which leaves little room for jealousy.
And at a later stage of development we find the exceptional form of
polyandry, which positively revolts every jealous instinct and is
therefore unknown among animals. But as all known forms of group
marriage are accompanied by such peculiarly complicated regulations that
they necessarily point to earlier and simpler forms of sexual relations,
and therefore in the last resort to a period of promiscuous intercourse
corresponding to the transition from the animal to the human, the
references to animal marriages only bring us back to the very point from
which we were to be led away for good and all.

What, then, does promiscuous sexual intercourse really mean? It means
the absence of prohibitions and restrictions which are or have been in
force. We have already seen the barrier of jealousy go down. If there is
one thing certain, it is that the feeling of jealousy develops
relatively late. The same is true of the conception of incest. Not only
were brother and sister originally man and wife; sexual intercourse
between parents and children is still permitted among many peoples
today. Bancroft (_The Native Races of the Pacific States of North
America_, 1875, Vol. I), testifies to it among the Kadiaks on the
Behring Straits, the Kadiaks near Alaska, and the Tinneh in the interior
of British North America; Letourneau compiled reports of it among the
Chippewa Indians, the Cucus in Chile, the Caribs, the Karens in Burma;
to say nothing of the stories told by the old Greeks and Romans about
the Parthians, Persians, Scythians, Huns, and so on. Before incest was
invented – for incest is an invention, and a very valuable one, too –
sexual intercourse between parents and children did not arouse any more
repulsion than sexual intercourse between other persons of different
generations, and that occurs today even in the most philistine countries
without exciting any great horror; even “old maids” of over sixty, if
they are rich enough, sometimes marry young men in their thirties. But
if we consider the most primitive known forms of family apart from their
conceptions of incest – conceptions which are totally different from
ours and frequently in direct contradiction to them-then the form of
sexual intercourse can only be described as promiscuous – promiscuous in
so far as the restrictions later established by custom did not yet
exist. But in everyday practice that by no means necessarily implies
general mixed mating. Temporary pairings of one man with one woman were
not in any way excluded, just as in the cases of group marriages today
the majority of relationships are of this character. And when
Westermarck, the latest writer to deny the existence of such a primitive
state, applies the term “marriage” to every relationship in which the
two sexes remain mated until the birth of the offspring, we must point
out that this kind of marriage can very well occur under the conditions
of promiscuous intercourse without contradicting the principle of
promiscuity – the absence of any restriction imposed by custom on sexual
intercourse. Westermarck, however, takes the standpoint that promiscuity
“involves a suppression of individual inclinations,” and that therefore
“the most genuine form of it is prostitution.” In my opinion, any
understanding of primitive society is impossible to people who only see
it as a brothel. We will return to this point when discussing group
marriage.

According to Morgan, from this primitive state of promiscuous
intercourse there developed, probably very early:

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

1. The Consanguine Family, The First Stage of the Family

Here the marriage groups are separated according to generations: all the
grandfathers and grandmothers within the limits of the family are all
husbands and wives of one another; so are also their children, the
fathers and mothers; the latter’s children will form a third circle of
common husbands and wives; and their children, the great-grandchildren
of the first group, will form a fourth. In this form of marriage,
therefore, only ancestors and progeny, and parents and children, are
excluded from the rights and duties (as we should say) of marriage with
one another. Brothers and sisters, male and female cousins of the first,
second, and more remote degrees, are all brothers and sisters of one
another, and precisely for that reason they are all husbands and wives
of one another. At this stage the relationship of brother and sister
also includes as a matter of course the practice of sexual intercourse
with one another. ^([2]) In its typical form, such a family would
consist of the descendants of a single pair, the descendants of these
descendants in each generation being again brothers and sisters, and
therefore husbands and wives, of one another. ^([3])

The consanguine family is extinct. Even the most primitive peoples known
to history provide no demonstrable instance of it. But that it must have
existed, we are compelled to admit: for the Hawaiian system of
consanguinity still prevalent today throughout the whole of Polynesia
expresses degrees of consanguinity which could only arise in this form
of family; and the whole subsequent development of the family
presupposes the existence of the consanguine family as a necessary
preparatory stage.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

Footnotes

 

[1] Bachofen proves how little he understood his own discovery, or
rather his guess, by using the term "hetaerism" to describe this
primitive state. For the Greeks, when they introduced the word,
hetaerism meant intercourse of men, unmarried or living in monogamy,
with unmarried women, it always presupposes a definite form of marriage
outside which this intercourse takes place and includes at least the
possibility of prostitution. The word was never used in any other sense,
and it is in this sense that I use it with Morgan. Bachofen everywhere
introduces into his extremely important discoveries the most incredible
mystifications through his notion that in their historical development
the relations between men and women had their origin in men's
contemporary religious conceptions, not in their actual conditions of
life.

[2] In a letter written in the spring of 1882, Marx expresses himself in
the strongest terms about the complete misrepresentation of primitive
times in Wager's text to the Nibelangen: &ldquo; Have such things been
heard, that brother embraced sister as a bride?&rdquo; To Wagner and his
&ldquo; lecherous gods&rdquo; who, quite in the modern manner, spice
their love affairs with a little incest, Marx replies: &ldquo; In
primitive times the sister was the wife, and that was moral.&rdquo;

 

[3] NOTE in Fourth edition: A French friend of mine who is an admirer of
Wagner is not in agreement with this note. He observes that already in
the Elder Edda, on which Wagner based his story, in the Œgisdrekka, Loki
makes the reproach to Freya: In the sight of the gods thou didst embrace
thine own brother." Marriage between brother and sister, he argues, was
therefore forbidden already at that time. The OEgisdrekka is the
expression of a time when belief in the old myths had completely broken
down; it is purely a satire on the gods, in the style of Lucian. If Loki
as Mephisto makes such a reproach to Freya, it tells rather against
Wagner. Loki also says some lines later to Niordhr: &ldquo; With thy
sister didst thou breed son.&rdquo; (vidh systur thinni gaztu slikan
mog) Niordhr is not, indeed, an Asa, but a Vana, and says in the
Ynglinga saga that marriages between brothers and sisters are usual in
Vanaland, which was not the case among the Asas. This would seem to show
that the Vanas were more ancient gods the Asas. At any rate, Niordhr
lives among the OEgisdrekka is rather a proof that at the time when the
Norse sagas of the gods arose, marriages between brothers and sisters,
at any rate among the gods, did not yet excite any horror. If one wants
to find excuses for Wagner, it would perhaps be better to cite Goethe
instead of the Edda, for in his ballad of the God and the Bayadere
Goethe commits a similar mistake in regard to the religious surrender of
women, which he makes far too similar to modern prostitution.

 

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

2. The Punaluan Family

 

If the first advance in organization consisted in the exclusion of
parents and children from sexual intercourse with one another, the
second was the exclusion of sister and brother. On account of the
greater nearness in age, this second advance was infinitely more
important, but also more difficult, than the first. It was effected
gradually, beginning probably with the exclusion from sexual intercourse
of own brothers and sisters (children of, the same mother) first in
isolated cases and then by degrees as a general rule (even in this
century exceptions were found in Hawaii), and ending with the
prohibition of marriage even between collateral brothers and sisters,
or, as we should say, between first, second, and third cousins. It
affords, says Morgan, “a good illustration of the operation of the
principle of natural selection.” There can be no question that the
tribes among whom inbreeding was restricted by this advance were bound
to develop more quickly and more fully than those among whom marriage
between brothers and sisters remained the rule and the law. How
powerfully the influence of this advance made itself felt is seen in the
institution which arose directly out of it and went far beyond it -- the
gens, which forms the basis of the social order of most, if not all,
barbarian peoples of the earth and from which in Greece and Rome we step
directly into civilization.

After a few generations at most, every original family was bound to
split up. The practice of living together in a primitive communistic
household, which prevailed without exception till late in the middle
stage of barbarism, set a limit, varying with the conditions but fairly
definite in each locality, to the maximum size of the family community.
As soon as the conception arose that sexual intercourse between children
of the same mother was wrong, it was bound to exert its influence when
the old households split up and new ones were founded (though these did
not necessarily coincide with the family group). One or more lines of
sisters would form the nucleus of the one household and their own
brothers the nucleus of the other. It must have been in some such manner
as this that the form which Morgan calls the punaluan family originated
out of the consanguine family. According to the Hawaiian custom, a
number of sisters, own or collateral (first, second or more remote
cousins) were the common wives of their common husbands, from among
whom, however, their own brothers were excluded; these husbands now no
longer called themselves brothers, for they were no longer necessarily
brothers, but punalua – that is, intimate companion, or partner.
Similarly, a line of own or collateral brothers had a number of women,
not their sisters, as common wives, and these wives called one another
punalua. This was the classic form of a type of family, in which later a
number of variations was possible, but whose essential feature was:
mutually common possession of husbands and wives within a definite
family circle, from which, however, the brothers of the wives, first own
and later also collateral, and conversely also the sisters of the
husbands, were excluded.

This form of the family provides with the most complete exactness the
degrees of consanguinity expressed in the American system. The children
of my mother’s sisters are still her children, just as the children of
my father’s brothers are also his children; and they are all my brothers
and sisters. But the children of my mother’s brothers are now her
nephews and nieces, the children of my father's sisters are his nephews
and nieces, and they are all my male and female cousins. For while the
husbands of my mother’s sisters are still her husbands, and the wives of
my father&rquo;s brothers are still his wives (in right, if not always
in fact), the social ban on sexual intercourse between brothers and
sisters has now divided the children of brothers and sisters, who had
hitherto been treated as own brothers and sisters, into two classes:
those in the one class remain brothers and sisters as before
(collateral, according to our system); those in the other class, the
children of my mother’s brother in the one case and of my father’s
sister in the other, cannot be brothers and sisters any longer, they can
no longer have common parents, neither father nor mother nor both, and
therefore now for the first time the class of nephews and nieces, male
and female cousins becomes necessary, which in the earlier composition
of the family would have been senseless. The American system of
consanguinity, which appears purely nonsensical in any form of family
based on any variety of monogamy, finds, down to the smallest details,
its rational explanation and its natural foundation in the punaluan
family. The punaluan family or a form similar to it must have been at
the very least as widespread as this system of consanguinity.

Evidence of this form of family, whose existence has actually been
proved in Hawaii, would probably have been received from all over
Polynesia if the pious missionaries, like the Spanish monks of former
days in America, had been able to see in such unchristian conditions
anything more than a sheer “abomination.” ^([1])

Caesar’s report of the Britons, who were at that time in the middle
stage of barbarism, “every ten or twelve have wives in common,
especially brothers with brothers and parents with children,” is best
explained as group marriage. Barbarian mothers do not have ten or twelve
sons of their own old enough to keep wives in common, but the American
system of consanguinity, which corresponds to the punaluan family,
provides numerous brothers, because all a man’s cousins, near and
distant, are his brothers. Caesar’s mention of “parents with children”
may be due to misunderstanding on his part; it is not, however,
absolutely impossible under this system that father and son or mother
and daughter should be included in the same marriage group, though not
father and daughter or mother and son. This or a similar form of group
marriage also provides the simplest explanation of the accounts in
Herodotus and other ancient writers about community of wives among
savages and barbarian peoples. The same applies also to the reports of
Watson and Kaye in their book, _The People of India_, about the Teehurs
in Oudh (north of the Ganges): “Both sexes have but a nominal tie on
each other, and they change connection without compunction; living
together, almost indiscriminately, in many large families.”

In the very great majority of cases the institution of the gens seems to
have originated directly out of the punaluan family. It is true that the
Australian classificatory system also provides an origin for it: the
Australians have gentes, but not yet the punaluan family; instead, they
have a cruder form of group marriage. In all forms of group family it is
uncertain who is the father of a child; but it is certain who its mother
is. Though she calls all the children of the whole family her children
and has a mother’s duties towards them, she nevertheless knows her own
children from the others. It is therefore clear that in so far as group
marriage prevails, descent can only be proved on the mother’s side and
that therefore only the female line is recognized. And this is in fact
the case among all peoples in the period of savagery or in the lower
stage of barbarism. It is the second great merit of Bachofen that he was
the first to make this discovery. To denote this exclusive recognition
of descent through the mother and the relations of inheritance which in
time resulted from it, he uses the term “mother-right,” which for the
sake of brevity I retain. The term is, however, ill-chosen, since at
this stage of society there cannot yet be any talk of “right” in the
legal sense.

If we now take one of the two standard groups of the punaluan family,
namely a line of own and collateral sisters (that is, own sisters’
children in the first, second or third degree), together with their
children and their own collateral brothers on the mother’s side (who,
according to our assumption, are not their husbands), we have the exact
circle of persons whom we later find as members of a gens, in the
original form of that institution. They all have a common ancestral
mother, by virtue of their descent from whom the female offspring in
each generation are sisters. The husbands of these sisters, however, can
no longer be their brothers and therefore cannot be descended from the
same ancestral mother; consequently, they do not belong to the same
consanguine group, the later gens. The children of these sisters,
however, do belong to this group, because descent on the mother’s side
alone counts, since it alone is certain. As soon as the ban had been
established on sexual intercourse between all brothers and sisters,
including the most remote collateral relatives on the mother’s side,
this group transformed itself into a gens – that is, it constituted
itself a firm circle of blood relations in the female line, between whom
marriage was prohibited; and henceforward by other common institutions
of a social and religious character it increasingly consolidated and
differentiated itself from the other gentes of the same tribe. More of
this later. When we see, then, that the development of the gens follows,
not only necessarily, but also perfectly naturally from the punaluan
family, we may reasonably infer that at one time this form of family
almost certainly existed among all peoples among whom the presence of
gentile institutions can be proved – that is, practically all barbarians
and civilized peoples.

At the time Morgan wrote his book, our knowledge of group marriage was
still very limited. A little information was available about the group
marriages of the Australians, who were organized in classes, and Morgan
had already, in 1871, published the reports he had received concerning
the punaluan family in Hawaii. The punaluan family provided, on the one
hand, the complete explanation of the system of consanguinity in force
among the American Indians, which had been the starting point of all
Morgan’s researches; on the other hand, the origin of the matriarchal
gens could be derived directly from the punaluan family; further, the
punaluan family represented a much higher stage of development than the
Australian classificatory system. It is therefore comprehensible that
Morgan should have regarded it as the necessary stage of development
before pairing marriage and should believe it to have been general in
earlier times. Since then we have become acquainted with a number of
other forms of group marriage, and we now know that Morgan here went too
far. However, in his punaluan family he had had the good fortune to
strike the highest, the classic form of group marriage, from which the
transition to a higher stage can be explained most simply.

For the most important additions to our knowledge of group marriage we
are indebted to the English missionary, Lorimer Fison, who for years
studied this form of the family in its classic home, Australia. He found
the lowest stage of development among the Australian aborigines of Mount
Gambier in South Australia. Here the whole tribe is divided into two
great exogamous classes or moieties, Kroki and Kumite. Sexual
intercourse within each of these moieties is strictly forbidden; on the
other hand, every man in the one moiety is the husband by birth of every
woman in the other moiety and she is by birth his wife. Not the
individuals, but the entire groups are married, moiety with moiety. And
observe that there is no exclusion on the ground of difference in age or
particular degrees of affinity, except such as is entailed by the
division of the tribe into two exogamous classes. A Kroki has every
Kumite woman lawfully to wife; but, as his own daughter according to
mother-right is also a Kumite, being the daughter of a Kumite woman, she
is by birth the wife of every Kroki, including, therefore, her father.
At any rate, there is no bar against this in the organization into
moieties as we know it. Either, then, this organization arose at a time
when, in spite of the obscure impulse towards the restriction of
inbreeding, sexual intercourse between parents and children was still
not felt to be particularly horrible – in which case the moiety system
must have originated directly out of a state of sexual promiscuity; or
else intercourse between parents and children was already forbidden by
custom when the moieties arose, and in that case the present conditions
point back to the consanguine family and are the first step beyond it.
The latter is more probable. There are not, to my knowledge, any
instances from Australia of sexual cohabitation between parents and
children, and as a rule the later form of exogamy, the matriarchal gens,
also tacitly presupposes the prohibition of this relationship as already
in force when the gens came into being.

The system of two moieties is found, not only at Mount Gambier in South
Australia, but also on the Darling River further to the east and in
Queensland in the northeast; it is therefore widely distributed. It
excludes marriages only between brothers and sisters, between the
children of brothers and between the children of sisters on the mother's
side, because these belong to the same moiety; the children of sisters
and brothers, however, may marry. A further step towards the prevention
of inbreeding was taken by the Kamilaroi on the Darling River in New
South Wales; the two original moieties are split up into four, and again
each of these four sections is married en bloc to another. The first two
sections are husbands and wives of one another by birth; according to
whether the mother belonged to the first or second section, the children
go into the third or fourth; the children of these last two sections,
which are also married to one another, come again into the first and
second sections. Thus one generation always belongs to the first and
second sections, the next to the third and fourth, and the generation
after that to the first and second again. Under this system, first
cousins (on the mother’s side) cannot be man and wife, but second
cousins can. This peculiarly complicated arrangement is made still more
intricate by having matriarchal gentes grafted onto it (at any rate
later), but we cannot go into the details of this now. What is
significant is how the urge towards the prevention of inbreeding asserts
itself again and again, feeling its way, however, quite instinctively,
without clear consciousness of its aim.

Group marriage which in these instances from Australia is still marriage
of sections, mass marriage of an entire section of men, often scattered
over the whole continent, with an equally widely distributed section of
women – this group marriage, seen close at hand, does not look quite so
terrible as the philistines, whose minds cannot get beyond brothels,
imagine it to be. On the contrary, for years its existence was not even
suspected and has now quite recently been questioned again. All that the
superficial observer sees in group marriage is a loose form of
monogamous marriage, here and there polygyny, and occasional
infidelities. It takes years, as it took Fison and Howlett, to discover
beneath these marriage customs, which in their actual practice should
seem almost familiar to the average European, their controlling law: the
law by which the Australian aborigine, wandering hundreds of miles from
his home among people whose language he does not understand,
nevertheless often finds in every camp and every tribe women who give
themselves to him without resistance and without resentment; the law by
which the man with several wives gives one up for the night to his
guest. Where the European sees immorality and lawlessness, strict law
rules in reality. The women belong to the marriage group of the
stranger, and therefore they are his wives by birth; that same law of
custom which gives the two to one another forbids under penalty of
outlawry all intercourse outside the marriage groups that belong
together. Even when wives are captured, as frequently occurs in many
places, the law of the exogamous classes is still carefully observed.

Marriage by capture, it may be remarked, already shows signs of the
transition to monogamous marriage, at least in the form of pairing
marriage. When the young man has captured or abducted a girl, with the
help of his friends, she is enjoyed by all of them in turn, but
afterwards she is regarded as the wife of the young man who instigated
her capture. If, on the other hand, the captured woman runs away from
her husband and is caught by another man, she becomes his wife and the
first husband loses his rights. Thus while group marriage continues to
exist as the general form, side by side with group marriage and within
it exclusive relationships begin to form, pairings for a longer or
shorter period, also polygyny; thus group marriage is dying out here,
too, and the only question is which will disappear first under European
influence: group marriage or the Australian aborigines who practice it.
Marriage between entire sections, as it prevails in Australia, is in any
case a very low and primitive form of group marriage, whereas the
punaluan family, so far as we know, represents its highest stage of
development. The former appears to be the form corresponding to the
social level of vagrant savages, while the latter already presupposes
relatively permanent settlements of communistic communities and leads
immediately to the successive higher phase of development. But we shall
certainly find more than one intermediate stage between these two forms;
here lies a newly discovered field of research which is still almost
completely unexplored.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

Footnotes

 

[1] There can no longer be any doubt that the traces which Bachofen
thought he had found of unrestricted sexual intercourse, or what he
calls “spontaneous generation in the slime,” go back to group marriage.
“If Bachofen considers these punaluan marriages ‘lawless,’ a man of that
period would consider most of the present-day marriages between near and
remote cousins on the father’s or mother's side to be incestuous, as
being marriages between blood brothers and sisters.” (Marx.)

 

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

3. The Pairing Family

 

A certain amount of pairing, for a longer or shorter period, already
occurred in group marriage or even earlier; the man had a chief wife
among his many wives (one can hardly yet speak of a favorite wife), and
for her he was the most important among her husbands. This fact has
contributed considerably to the confusion of the missionaries, who have
regarded group marriage sometimes as promiscuous community of wives,
sometimes as unbridled adultery. But these customary pairings were bound
to grow more stable as the gens developed and the classes of “brothers“
and “sisters” between whom marriage was impossible became more numerous.
The impulse given by the gens to the prevention of marriage between
blood relatives extended still further. Thus among the Iroquois and most
of the other Indians at the lower stage of barbarism we find that
marriage is prohibited between all relatives enumerated in their system
– which includes several hundred degrees of kinship. The increasing
complication of these prohibitions made group marriages more and more
impossible; they were displaced by the pairing family. In this stage,
one man lives with one woman, but the relationship is such that polygamy
and occasional infidelity remain the right of the men, even though for
economic reasons polygamy is rare, while from the woman the strictest
fidelity is generally demanded throughout the time she lives with the
man, and adultery on her part is cruelly punished. The marriage tie can,
however, be easily dissolved by either partner; after separation, the
children still belong, as before, to the mother alone.

In this ever extending exclusion of blood relatives from the bond of
marriage, natural selection continues its work. In Morgan’s words:

The influence of the new practice, which brought unrelated persons into
the marriage relation, tended to create a more vigorous stock physically
and mentally.... When two advancing tribes, with strong mental and
physical characters, are brought together and blended into one people by
the accidents of barbarous life, the new skull and brain would widen and
lengthen to the sum of the capabilities of both.

[Morgan, Op. cit., p. 468. – Ed.]

Tribes with gentile constitution were thus bound to gain supremacy over
more backward tribes, or else to carry them along by their example.

Thus the history of the family in primitive times consists in the
progressive narrowing of the circle, originally embracing the whole
tribe, within which the two sexes have a common conjugal relation. The
continuous exclusion, first of nearer, then of more and more remote
relatives, and at last even of relatives by marriage, ends by making any
kind of group marriage practically impossible. Finally, there remains
only the single, still loosely linked pair, the molecule with whose
dissolution marriage itself ceases. This in itself shows what a small
part individual sex-love, in the modern sense of the word, played in the
rise of monogamy. Yet stronger proof is afforded by the practice of all
peoples at this stage of development. Whereas in the earlier forms of
the family men never lacked women, but, on the contrary, had too many
rather than too few, women had now become scarce and highly sought
after. Hence it is with the pairing marriage that there begins the
capture and purchase of women – widespread symptoms, but no more than
symptoms, of the much deeper change that had occurred. These symptoms,
mere methods of procuring wives, the pedantic Scot, McLennan, has
transmogrified into special classes of families under the names of
“marriage by capture” and “marriage by purchase.” In general, whether
among the American Indians or other peoples (at the same stage), the
conclusion of a marriage is the affair, not of the two parties
concerned, who are often not consulted at all, but of their mothers. Two
persons entirely unknown to each other are often thus affianced; they
only learn that the bargain has been struck when the time for marrying
approaches. Before the wedding the bridegroom gives presents to the
bride's gentile relatives (to those on the mother's side, therefore, not
to the father and his relations), which are regarded as gift payments in
return for the girl. The marriage is still terminable at the desire of
either partner, but among many tribes, the Iroquois, for example, public
opinion has gradually developed against such separations; when
differences arise between husband and wife, the gens relatives of both
partners act as mediators, and only if these efforts prove fruitless
does a separation take place, the wife then keeping the children and
each partner being free to marry again.

The pairing family, itself too weak and unstable to make an independent
household necessary or even desirable, in no wise destroys the
communistic household inherited from earlier times. Communistic
housekeeping, however, means the supremacy of women in the house; just
as the exclusive recognition of the female parent, owing to the
impossibility of recognizing the male parent with certainty, means that
the women – the mothers – are held in high respect. One of the most
absurd notions taken over from eighteenth-century enlightenment is that
in the beginning of society woman was the slave of man. Among all
savages and all barbarians of the lower and middle stages, and to a
certain extent of the upper stage also, the position of women is not
only free, but honorable. As to what it still is in the pairing
marriage, let us hear the evidence of Ashur Wright, for many years
missionary among the Iroquois Senecas:

As to their family system, when occupying the old long-houses
[communistic households comprising several families], it is probable
that some one clan [gens] predominated, the women taking in husbands,
however, from the other clans [gentes] .... Usually, the female portion
ruled the house.... The stores were in common; but woe to the luckless
husband or lover who was too shiftless to do his share of the providing.
No matter how many children, or whatever goods he might have in the
house, he might at any time be ordered to pick up his blanket and budge;
and after such orders it would not be healthful for him to attempt to
disobey. The house would be too hot for him; and ... he must retreat to
his own clan [gens]; or, as was often done, go and start a new
matrimonial alliance in some other. The women were the great power among
the clans [gentes], as everywhere else. They did not hesitate, when
occasion required, “to knock off the horns,” as it was technically
called, from the head of a chief, and send him back to the ranks of the
warriors.

[Quoted by Morgan, Op. cit., P. 464. – Ed.]

The communistic household, in which most or all of the women belong to
one and the same gens, while the men come from various gentes, is the
material foundation of that supremacy of the women which was general in
primitive times, and which it is Bachofen’s third great merit to have
discovered. The reports of travelers and missionaries, I may add, to the
effect that women among savages and barbarians are overburdened with
work in no way contradict what has been said. The division of labor
between the two sexes is determined by quite other causes than by the
position of woman in society. Among peoples where the women have to work
far harder than we think suitable, there is often much more real respect
for women than among our Europeans. The lady of civilization, surrounded
by false homage and estranged from all real work, has an infinitely
lower social position than the hard-working woman of barbarism, who was
regarded among her people as a real lady (lady, frowa, Frau – mistress)
and who was also a lady in character.

Whether pairing marriage has completely supplanted group marriage in
America today is a question to be decided by closer investigation among
the peoples still at the upper stage of savagery in the northwest, and
particularly in South America. Among the latter, so many instances of
sexual license are related that one can hardly assume the old group
marriage to have been completely overcome here. At any rate, all traces
of it have not yet disappeared. In at least forty North American tribes
the man who marries an eldest sister has the right to take all her other
sisters as his wives as soon as they are old enough – a relic of the
time when a whole line of sisters had husbands in common. And Bancroft
reports of the Indians of the California peninsula (upper stage of
savagery) that they have certain festivals when several “tribes” come
together for the purpose of promiscuous sexual intercourse. These
“tribes” are clearly gentes, who preserve in these feasts a dim memory
of the time when the women of one gens had all the men of the other as
their common husbands, and conversely. The same custom still prevails in
Australia. We find among some peoples that the older men, the chieftains
and the magician-priests, exploit the community of wives and monopolize
most of the women for themselves; at certain festivals and great
assemblies of the people, however, they have to restore the old
community of women and allow their wives to enjoy themselves with the
young men. Westermarck (_History of Human Marriage_, 1891, pp. 28, 29)
quotes a whole series of instances of such periodic Saturnalian feasts,
when for a short time the old freedom of sexual intercourse is again
restored: examples are given among the Hos, the Santals, the Punjas and
Kotars in India, among some African peoples, and so forth. Curiously
enough, Westermarck draws the conclusion that these are survivals, not
of the group marriage, which he totally rejects, but of the mating
season which primitive man had in common with the other animals.

Here we come to Bachofen’s fourth great discovery – the widespread
transitional form between group marriage and pairing. What Bachofen
represents as a penance for the transgression of the old divine laws –
the penance by which the woman purchases the right of chastity – is in
fact only a mystical expression of the penance by which the woman buys
herself out of the old community of husbands and acquires the right to
give herself to one man only. This penance consists in a limited
surrender: the Babylonian women had to give themselves once a year in
the temple of Mylitta; other peoples of Asia Minor sent their girls for
years to the temple of Anaitis, where they had to practice free love
with favorites of their own choosing before they were allowed to marry.
Similar customs in religious disguise are common to almost all Asiatic
peoples between the Mediterranean and the Ganges. The sacrifice of
atonement by which the woman purchases her freedom becomes increasingly
lighter in course of time, as Bachofen already noted:

Instead of being repeated annually, the offering is made once only; the
hetaerism of the matrons is succeeded by the hetaerism of the maidens;
hetaerism during marriage by hetaerism before marriage; surrender to all
without choice by surrender to some.

(Mutterrecht, p. xix.)

Among other peoples the religious disguise is absent. In some cases –
among the Thracians, Celts, and others, in classical times, many of the
original inhabitants of India, and to this day among the Malayan
peoples, the South Sea Islanders and many American Indians – the girls
enjoy the greatest sexual freedom up to the time of their marriage. This
is especially the case almost everywhere in South America, as everyone
who has gone any distance into the interior can testify. Thus Agassiz
(_A Journey in Brazil_, Boston and New York, 1868, p. 266) tells this
story of a rich family of Indian extraction: when he was introduced to
the daughter, he asked after her father, presuming him to be her
mother's husband, who was fighting as an officer in the war against
Paraguay; but the mother answered with a smile: "Nao tem pai, e filha da
fortuna" (She has no father. She is a child of chance):

It is the way the Indian or half-breed women here always speak of their
illegitimate children . . . without an intonation of sadness or of
blame.... So far is this from being an unusual case, that... the
opposite seems the exception. Children are frequently quite ignorant of
their parentage. They know about their mother, for all the care and
responsibility falls upon her, but they have no knowledge of their
father; nor does it seem to occur to the woman that she or her children
have any claim upon him.

What seems strange here to civilized people is simply the rule according
to mother-right and in group marriage.

Among other peoples, again, the friends and relatives of the bridegroom,
or the wedding guests, claim their traditional right to the bride at the
wedding itself, and the bridegroom's turn only comes last; this was the
custom in the Balearic Islands and among the Augilers of Africa in
ancient times; it is still observed among the Bareas of Abyssinia. In
other cases, an official personage, the head of the tribe or the gens,
cacique, shaman, priest, prince or whatever he may be called, represents
the community and exercises the right of the first night with the bride.
Despite all necromantic whitewashing, this jus prime noctis [Right of
first night. – Ed.] still persists today as a relic of group marriage
among most of the natives of the Alaska region (Bancroft, Native Races,
I, p. 8i), the Tahus of North Mexico (Ibid., P. 584) and other peoples;
and at any rate in the countries originally Celtic, where it was handed
down directly from group marriage, it existed throughout the whole of
the middle ages, for example, in Aragon. While in Castile the peasants
were never serfs, in Aragon there was serfdom of the most shameful kind
right up till the decree of Ferdinand the Catholic in 1486. This
document states:

We judge and declare that the aforementioned lords (senors, barons) ...
when the peasant takes himself a wife, shall neither sleep with her on
the first night; nor shall they during the wedding-night, when the wife
has laid herself in her bed, step over it and the aforementioned wife as
a sign of lordship; nor shall the aforementioned lords use the daughter
or the son of the peasant, with payment or without payment, against
their will.

(Quoted in the original Catalan by Sugenheim,
Serfdom, Petersburg, 1861, p. 35)

Bachofen is also perfectly right when he consistently maintains that the
transition from what he calls “Hetaerism” or “Sumpfzeugung” to monogamy
was brought about primarily through the women. The more the traditional
sexual relations lost the native primitive character of forest life,
owing to the development of economic conditions with consequent
undermining of the old communism and growing density of population, the
more oppressive and humiliating must the women have felt them to be, and
the greater their longing for the right of chastity, of temporary or
permanent marriage with one man only, as a way of release. This advance
could not in any case have originated with the men, if only because it
has never occurred to them, even to this day, to renounce the pleasures
of actual group marriage. Only when the women had brought about the
transition to pairing marriage were the men able to introduce strict
monogamy – though indeed only for women.

The first beginnings of the pairing family appear on the dividing line
between savagery and barbarism; they are generally to be found already
at the upper stage of savagery, but occasionally not until the lower
stage of barbarism. The pairing family is the form characteristic of
barbarism, as group marriage is characteristic of savagery and monogamy
of civilization. To develop it further, to strict monogamy, other causes
were required than those we have found active hitherto. In the single
pair the group was already reduced to its final unit, its two-atom
molecule: one man and one woman. Natural selection, with its progressive
exclusions from the marriage community, had accomplished its task; there
was nothing more for it to do in this direction. Unless new, social
forces came into play, there was no reason why a new form of family
should arise from the single pair. But these new forces did come into
play.

We now leave America, the classic soil of the pairing family. No sign
allows us to conclude that a higher form of family developed here, or
that there was ever permanent monogamy anywhere in America prior to its
discovery and conquest. But not so in the Old World.

Here the domestication of animals and the breeding of herds had
developed a hitherto unsuspected source of wealth and created entirely
new social relations. Up to the lower stage of barbarism, permanent
wealth had consisted almost solely of house, clothing, crude ornaments
and the tools for obtaining and preparing food – boat, weapons, and
domestic utensils of the simplest kind. Food had to be won afresh day by
day. Now, with their herds of horses, camels, asses, cattle, sheep,
goats, and pigs, the advancing pastoral peoples – the Semites on the
Euphrates and the Tigris, and the Aryans in the Indian country of the
Five Streams (Punjab), in the Ganges region, and in the steppes then
much more abundantly watered of the Oxus and the Jaxartes – had acquired
property which only needed supervision and the rudest care to reproduce
itself in steadily increasing quantities and to supply the most abundant
food in the form of milk and meat. All former means of procuring food
now receded into the background; hunting, formerly a necessity, now
became a luxury.

But to whom did this new wealth belong? Originally to the gens, without
a doubt. Private property in herds must have already started at an early
period, however. It is difficult to say whether the author of the
so-called first book of Moses regarded the patriarch Abraham as the
owner of his herds in his own right as head of a family community or by
right of his position as actual hereditary head of a gens. What is
certain is that we must not think of him as a property owner in the
modern sense of the word. And it is also certain that at the threshold
of authentic history we already find the herds everywhere separately
owned by heads of families, as are the artistic products of barbarism –
metal implements, luxury articles and, finally, the human cattle – the
slaves.

For now slavery had also been invented. To the barbarian of the lower
stage, a slave was valueless. Hence the treatment of defeated enemies by
the American Indians was quite different from that at a higher stage.
The men were killed or adopted as brothers into the tribe of the
victors; the women were taken as wives or otherwise adopted with their
surviving children. At this stage human labor-power still does not
produce any considerable surplus over and above its maintenance costs.
That was no longer the case after the introduction of cattle-breeding,
metalworking, weaving and, lastly, agriculture. just as the wives whom
it had formerly been so easy to obtain had now acquired an exchange
value and were bought, so also with the forces of labor, particularly
since the herds had definitely become family possessions. The family did
not multiply so rapidly as the cattle. More people were needed to look
after them; for this purpose use could be made of the enemies captured
in war, who could also be bred just as easily as the cattle themselves.

Once it had passed into the private possession of families and there
rapidly begun to augment, this wealth dealt a severe blow to the society
founded on pairing marriage and the matriarchal gens. Pairing marriage
had brought a new element into the family. By the side of the natural
mother of the child it placed its natural and attested father, with a
better warrant of paternity, probably, than that of many a “father”
today. According to the division of labor within the family at that
time, it was the man’s part to obtain food and the instruments of labor
necessary for the purpose. He therefore also owned the instruments of
labor, and in the event of husband and wife separating, he took them
with him, just as she retained her household goods. Therefore, according
to the social custom of the time, the man was also the owner of the new
source of subsistence, the cattle, and later of the new instruments of
labor, the slaves. But according to the custom of the same society, his
children could not inherit from him. For as regards inheritance, the
position was as follows:

At first, according to mother-right – so long, therefore, as descent was
reckoned only in the female line – and according to the original custom
of inheritance within the gens, the gentile relatives inherited from a
deceased fellow member of their gens. His property had to remain within
the gens. His effects being insignificant, they probably always passed
in practice to his nearest gentile relations – that is, to his blood
relations on the mother's side. The children of the dead man, however,
did not belong to his gens, but to that of their mother; it was from her
that they inherited, at first conjointly with her other blood relations,
later perhaps with rights of priority; they could not inherit from their
father, because they did not belong to his gens, within which his
property had to remain. When the owner of the herds died, therefore, his
herds would go first to his brothers and sisters and to his sister’s
children, or to the issue of his mother’s sisters. But his own children
were disinherited.

Thus, on the one hand, in proportion as wealth increased, it made the
man’s position in the family more important than the woman’s, and on the
other hand created an impulse to exploit this strengthened position in
order to overthrow, in favor of his children, the traditional order of
inheritance. This, however, was impossible so long as descent was
reckoned according to mother-right. Mother-right, therefore, had to be
overthrown, and overthrown it was. This was by no means so difficult as
it looks to us today. For this revolution – one of the most decisive
ever experienced by humanity – could take place without disturbing a
single one of the living members of a gens. All could remain as they
were. A simple decree sufficed that in the future the offspring of the
male members should remain within the gens, but that of the female
should be excluded by being transferred to the gens of their father. The
reckoning of descent in the female line and the matriarchal law of
inheritance were thereby overthrown, and the male line of descent and
the paternal law of inheritance were substituted for them. As to how and
when this revolution took place among civilized peoples, we have no
knowledge. It falls entirely within prehistoric times. But that it did
take place is more than sufficiently proved by the abundant traces of
mother-right which have been collected, particularly by Bachofen. How
easily it is accomplished can be seen in a whole series of American
Indian tribes, where it has only recently taken place and is still
taking place under the influence, partly of increasing wealth and a
changed mode of life (transference from forest to prairie), and partly
of the moral pressure of civilization and missionaries. Of eight
Missouri tribes, six observe the male line of descent and inheritance,
two still observe the female. Among the Shawnees, Miamis and Delawares
the custom has grown up of giving the children a gentile name of their
father's gens in order to transfer them into it, thus enabling them to
inherit from him.

Man“s innate casuistry! To change things by changing their names! And to
find loopholes for violating tradition while maintaining tradition, when
direct interest supplied sufficient impulse. (Marx.)

The result was hopeless confusion, which could only be remedied and to a
certain extent was remedied by the transition to father-right. “In
general, this seems to be the most natural transition.” (Marx.) For the
theories proffered by comparative jurisprudence regarding the manner in
which this change was effected among the civilized peoples of the Old
World – though they are almost pure hypotheses see M. Kovalevsky,
_Tableau des origines et de l'evolution de la famille et de la
propriete_. Stockholm, 1890.

The overthrow of mother-right was the world historical defeat of the
female sex. The man took command in the home also; the woman was
degraded and reduced to servitude, she became the slave of his lust and
a mere instrument for the production of children. This degraded position
of the woman, especially conspicuous among the Greeks of the heroic and
still more of the classical age, has gradually been palliated and glozed
over, and sometimes clothed in a milder form; in no sense has it been
abolished.

The establishment of the exclusive supremacy of the man shows its
effects first in the patriarchal family, which now emerges as an
intermediate form. Its essential characteristic is not polygyny, of
which more later, but “the organization of a number of persons, bond and
free, into a family, under paternal power, for the purpose of holding
lands, and for the care of flocks and herds.... (In the Semitic form)
the chiefs, at least, lived in polygamy.... Those held to servitude, and
those employed as servants, lived in the marriage relation.”

[Morgan, op. cit., p. 474]

Its essential features are the incorporation of unfree persons, and
paternal power; hence the perfect type of this form of family is the
Roman. The original meaning of the word “family” (familia) is not that
compound of sentimentality and domestic strife which forms the ideal of
the present-day philistine; among the Romans it did not at first even
refer to the married pair and their children, but only to the slaves.
Famulus means domestic slave, and familia is the total number of slaves
belonging to one man. As late as the time of Gaius, the familia, id est
patrimonium (family, that is, the patrimony, the inheritance) was
bequeathed by will. The term was invented by the Romans to denote a new
social organism, whose head ruled over wife and children and a number of
slaves, and was invested under Roman paternal power with rights of life
and death over them all.

This term, therefore, is no older than the iron-clad family system of
the Latin tribes, which came in after field agriculture and after
legalized servitude, as well as after the separation of Greeks and
Latins.

[Morgan, Op. cit., p. 478]

Marx adds:

The modern family contains in germ not only slavery (servitus), but also
serfdom, since from the beginning it is related to agricultural
services. It contains in miniature all the contradictions which later
extend throughout society and its state.

Such a form of family shows the transition of the pairing family to
monogamy. In order to make certain of the wife’s fidelity and therefore
of the paternity of the children, she is delivered over unconditionally
into the power of the husband; if he kills her, he is only exercising
his rights.

With the patriarchal family, we enter the field of written history a
field where comparative jurisprudence can give valuable help. And it has
in fact brought an important advance in our knowledge. We owe to Maxim
Kovalevsky (_Tableau etc. de la mine et de propriete_, Stockholm, 1890,
pp. 60-100), the proof that the patriarchal household community, as we
still find it today among the Serbs and the Bulgars under the name of
zadruga (which may be roughly translated "bond of friendship") or
bratstvo (brotherhood), and in a modified form among the Oriental
peoples, formed the transitional stage between the matriarchal family
deriving from group marriage and the single family of the modern world.
For the civilized peoples of the Old World, for the Aryans and Semites
at any rate, this seems to be established.

The Southern Slav zadruga provides the best instance of such a family
community still in actual existence. It comprises several generations of
the descendants of one father, together with their wives, who all live
together in one homestead, cultivate their fields in common, feed and
clothe themselves from a common stock, and possess in common the surplus
from their labor. The community is under the supreme direction of the
head of the house (domacin), who acts as its representative outside, has
the right to sell minor objects, and controls the funds, for which, as
for the regular organization of business, he is responsible. He is
elected, and it is not at all necessary that he should be the oldest in
the community. The women and their work are under the control of the
mistress of the house (domacica), who is generally the wife of the
domacin. She also has an important and often a decisive voice in the
choice of husbands for the girls. Supreme power rests, however, with the
family council, the assembly of all the adult members of the household,
women as well as men. To this assembly the master of the house renders
account; it takes all important decisions, exercises jurisdiction over
the members, decides on sales and purchases of any importance,
especially of land and so on.

It is only within the last ten years or so that such great family
communities have been proved to be still in existence in Russia; it is
now generally recognized that they are as firmly rooted in the customs
of the Russian people as the obshchina or village community. They appear
in the oldest Russian code of laws, the Pravda of Yaroslav, under the
same name as in the Dalmatian laws (vervj), and references to them can
also be traced in Polish and Czech historical sources.

Among the Germans also, according to Heusler (_Institutionen des
deutschen Rechts_), the economic unit was originally not the single
family in the modern sense, but the “house community,” which consisted
of several generations or several single families, and often enough
included unfree persons as well. The Roman family is now also considered
to have originated from this type, and consequently the absolute power
of the father of the house, and the complete absence of rights among the
other members of the family in relation to him, have recently been
strongly questioned. It is supposed that similar family communities also
existed among the Celts in Ireland; in France, under the name of
parconneries, they survived in Nivernais until the French Revolution,
and in the Franche Comte they have not completely died out even today
[1884]. In the district of Louhans (Saone et Loire) large peasant houses
can be seen in which live several generations of the same family; the
house has a lofty common hall reaching to the roof, and surrounding it
the sleeping-rooms, to which stairs of six or eight steps give access.

In India, the household community with common cultivation of the land is
already mentioned by Nearchus in the time of Alexander the Great, and it
still exists today in the same region, in the Punjab and the whole of
northwest India. Kovalevsky was himself able to prove its existence in
the Caucasus. In Algeria it survives among the Kabyles. It is supposed
to have occurred even in America, and the calpullis which Zurita
describes in old Mexico have been identified with it; on the other hand,
Cunow has proved fairly clearly (in the journal _Ausland_, 1890, Nos.
42-44) that in Peru at the time of the conquest there was a form of
constitution based on marks (called, curiously enough, marca), with
periodical allotment of arable land and consequently with individual
tillage. In any case, the patriarchal household community with common
ownership and common cultivation of the land now assumes an entirely
different significance than hitherto. We can no longer doubt the
important part it played, as a transitional form between the matriarchal
family and the single family, among civilized and other peoples of the
Old World. Later we will return to the further conclusion drawn by
Kovalevsky that it was also the transitional form out of which developed
the village, or mark, community with individual tillage and the
allotment, first periodical and then permanent, of arable and pasture
land.

With regard to the family life within these communities, it must be
observed that at any rate in Russia the master of the house has a
reputation for violently abusing his position towards the younger women
of the community, especially his daughters-in-law, whom he often
converts into his harem; the Russian folk-songs have more than a little
to say about this.

Before we go on to monogamy, which developed rapidly with the overthrow
of mother-right, a few words about polygyny and polyandry. Both forms
can only be exceptions, historical luxury products, as it were, unless
they occur side by side in the same country, which is, of course, not
the case. As the men excluded from polygyny cannot console themselves
with the women left over from polyandry, and as hitherto, regardless of
social institutions, the number of men and women has been fairly equal,
it is obviously impossible for either of these forms of marriage to be
elevated to the general form. Polygyny on the part of one individual man
was, in fact, obviously a product of slavery and confined to a few
people in exceptional positions. In the Semitic patriarchal family it
was only the patriarch himself, and a few of his sons at most, who lived
in polygyny; the rest had to content themselves with one wife. This
still holds throughout the whole of the Orient; polygyny is the
privilege of the wealthy and of the nobility, the women being recruited
chiefly through purchase as slaves; the mass of the people live in
monogamy.

A similar exception is the polyandry of India and Tibet, the origin of
which in group marriage requires closer examination and would certainly
prove interesting. It seems to be much more easy-going in practice than
the jealous harems of the Mohammedans. At any rate, among the Nairs in
India, where three or four men have a wife in common, each of them can
have a second wife in common with another three or more men, and
similarly a third and a fourth and so on. It is a wonder that McLennan
did not discover in these marriage clubs, to several of which one could
belong and which he himself describes, a new class of club marriage!
This marriage-club system, however, is not real polyandry at all; on the
contrary, as Giraud-Teulon has already pointed out, it is a specialized
form of group marriage; the men live in polygyny, the women in
polyandry.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

4. The Monogamous Family

 

It develops out of the pairing family, as previously shown, in the
transitional period between the upper and middle stages of barbarism;
its decisive victory is one of the signs that civilization is beginning.
It is based on the supremacy of the man, the express purpose being to
produce children of undisputed paternity; such paternity is demanded
because these children are later to come into their father’s property as
his natural heirs. It is distinguished from pairing marriage by the much
greater strength of the marriage tie, which can no longer be dissolved
at either partner’s wish. As a rule, it is now only the man who can
dissolve it, and put away his wife. The right of conjugal infidelity
also remains secured to him, at any rate by custom (the Code Napoleon
explicitly accords it to the husband as long as he does not bring his
concubine into the house), and as social life develops he exercises his
right more and more; should the wife recall the old form of sexual life
and attempt to revive it, she is punished more severely than ever.

We meet this new form of the family in all its severity among the
Greeks. While the position of the goddesses in their mythology, as Marx
points out, brings before us an earlier period when the position of
women was freer and more respected, in the heroic age we find the woman
already being humiliated by the domination of the man and by competition
from girl slaves. Note how Telemachus in the Odyssey silences his
mother. [The reference is to a passage where Telemachus, son of Odysseus
and Penelope, tells his mother to get on with her weaving and leave the
men to mind their own business – Ed.] In Homer young women are booty and
are handed over to the pleasure of the conquerors, the handsomest being
picked by the commanders in order of rank; the entire Iliad, it will be
remembered, turns on the quarrel of Achilles and Agamemnon over one of
these slaves. If a hero is of any importance, Homer also mentions the
captive girl with whom he shares his tent and his bed. These girls were
also taken back to Greece and brought under the same roof as the wife,
as Cassandra was brought by Agamemnon in AEschylus; the sons begotten of
them received a small share of the paternal inheritance and had the full
status of freemen. Teucer, for instance, is a natural son of Telamon by
one of these slaves and has the right to use his father’s name. The
legitimate wife was expected to put up with all this, but herself to
remain strictly chaste and faithful. In the heroic age a Greek woman is,
indeed, more respected than in the period of civilization, but to her
husband she is after all nothing but the mother of his legitimate
children and heirs, his chief housekeeper and the supervisor of his
female slaves, whom he can and does take as concubines if he so fancies.
It is the existence of slavery side by side with monogamy, the presence
of young, beautiful slaves belonging unreservedly to the man, that
stamps monogamy from the very beginning with its specific character of
monogamy for the woman only, but not for the man. And that is the
character it still has today.

Coming to the later Greeks, we must distinguish between Dorians and
Ionians. Among the former – Sparta is the classic example – marriage
relations are in some ways still more archaic than even in Homer. The
recognized form of marriage in Sparta was a pairing marriage, modified
according to the Spartan conceptions of the state, in which there still
survived vestiges of group marriage. Childless marriages were dissolved;
King Anaxandridas (about 650 B.C.), whose first wife was childless, took
a second and kept two households; about the same time, King Ariston, who
had two unfruitful wives, took a third, but dismissed one of the other
two. On the other hand, several brothers could have a wife in common; a
friend who preferred his friend’s wife could share her with him; and it
was considered quite proper to place one’s wife at the disposal of a
sturdy “stallion,” as Bismarck would say, even if he was not a citizen.
A passage in Plutarch, where a Spartan woman refers an importunate wooer
to her husband, seems to indicate, according to Schamann, even greater
freedom. Real adultery, secret infidelity by the woman without the
husband’s knowledge, was therefore unheard of. On the other hand,
domestic slavery was unknown in Sparta, at least during its best period;
the unfree helots were segregated on the estates and the Spartans were
therefore less tempted to take the helots’ wives. Inevitably in these
conditions women held a much more honored position in Sparta than
anywhere else in Greece. The Spartan women and the elite of the Athenian
hetairai are the only Greek women of whom the ancients speak with
respect and whose words they thought it worth while to record.

The position is quite different among the Ionians; here Athens is
typical. Girls only learned spinning, weaving, and sewing, and at most a
little reading and writing. They lived more or less behind locked doors
and had no company except other women. The women’s apartments formed a
separate part of the house, on the upper floor or at the back, where
men, especially strangers, could not easily enter, and to which the
women retired when men visited the house. They never went out without
being accompanied by a female slave; indoors they were kept under
regular guard. Aristophanes speaks of Molossian dogs kept to frighten
away adulterers, and, at any rate in the Asiatic towns, eunuchs were
employed to keep watch over the women-making and exporting eunuchs was
an industry in Chios as early as Herodotus’ time, and, according to
Wachsmuth, it was not only the barbarians who bought the supply. In
Euripides a woman is called an oikourema, a thing (the word is neuter)
for looking after the house, and, apart from her business of bearing
children, that was all she was for the Athenian – his chief female
domestic servant. The man had his athletics and his public business,
from which women were barred; in addition, he often had female slaves at
his disposal and during the most flourishing days of Athens an extensive
system of prostitution which the state at least favored. It was
precisely through this system of prostitution that the only Greek women
of personality were able to develop, and to acquire that intellectual
and artistic culture by which they stand out as high above the general
level of classical womanhood as the Spartan women by their qualities of
character. But that a woman had to be a hetaira before she could be a
woman is the worst condemnation of the Athenian family.

This Athenian family became in time the accepted model for domestic
relations, not only among the Ionians, but to an increasing extent among
all the Greeks of the mainland and colonies also. But, in spite of locks
and guards, Greek women found plenty of opportunity for deceiving their
husbands. The men, who would have been ashamed to show any love for
their wives, amused themselves by all sorts of love affairs with
hetairai; but this degradation of the women was avenged on the men and
degraded them also, till they fell into the abominable practice of
sodomy [_Knabenliebe_] and degraded alike their gods and themselves with
the myth of Ganymede.

This is the origin of monogamy as far as we can trace it back among the
most civilized and highly developed people of antiquity. It was not in
any way the fruit of individual sex-love, with which it had nothing
whatever to do; marriages remained as before marriages of convenience.
It was the first form of the family to be based, not on natural, but on
economic conditions – on the victory of private property over primitive,
natural communal property. The Greeks themselves put the matter quite
frankly: the sole exclusive aims of monogamous marriage were to make the
man supreme in the family, and to propagate, as the future heirs to his
wealth, children indisputably his own. Otherwise, marriage was a burden,
a duty which had to be performed, whether one liked it or not, to gods,
state, and one’s ancestors. In Athens the law exacted from the man not
only marriage but also the performance of a minimum of so-called
conjugal duties.

Thus when monogamous marriage first makes its appearance in history, it
is not as the reconciliation of man and woman, still less as the highest
form of such a reconciliation. Quite the contrary. Monogamous marriage
comes on the scene as the subjugation of the one sex by the other; it
announces a struggle between the sexes unknown throughout the whole
previous prehistoric period. In an old unpublished manuscript, written
by Marx and myself in 1846, [The reference here is to the words: “The
first division of labor is that between man and woman for the
propagation of children.” And today I can add: The first class
opposition that appears in history coincides with the development of the
antagonism between man and woman in monogamous marriage, and the first
class oppression coincides with that of the female sex by the male.
Monogamous marriage was a great historical step forward; nevertheless,
together with slavery and private wealth, it opens the period that has
lasted until today in which every step forward is also relatively a step
backward, in which prosperity and development for some is won through
the misery and frustration of others. It is the cellular form of
civilized society, in which the nature of the oppositions and
contradictions fully active in that society can be already studied.

The old comparative freedom of sexual intercourse by no means
disappeared with the victory of pairing marriage or even of monogamous
marriage:

The old conjugal system, now reduced to narrower limits by the gradual
disappearance of the punaluan groups, still environed the advancing
family, which it was to follow to the verge of civilization.... It
finally disappeared in the new form of hetaerism, which still follows
mankind in civilization as a dark shadow upon the family.

[Morgan, op. cit., p. 511 – Ed.]

By “hetaerism” Morgan understands the practice, co-existent with
monogamous marriage, of sexual intercourse between men and unmarried
women outside marriage, which, as we know, flourishes in the most varied
forms throughout the whole period of civilization and develops more and
more into open prostitution. This hetaerism derives quite directly from
group marriage, from the ceremonial surrender by which women purchased
the right of chastity. Surrender for money was at first a religious act;
it took place in the temple of the goddess of love, and the money
originally went into the temple treasury. The temple slaves of Anaitis
in Armenia and of Aphrodite in Corinth, like the sacred dancing-girls
attached to the temples of India, the so-called bayaderes (the word is a
corruption of the Portuguese word bailadeira, meaning female dancer),
were the first prostitutes. Originally the duty of every woman, this
surrender was later performed by these priestesses alone as
representatives of all other women. Among other peoples, hetaerism
derives from the sexual freedom allowed to girls before marriage –
again, therefore, a relic of group marriage, but handed down in a
different way. With the rise of the inequality of property – already at
the upper stage of barbarism, therefore – wage-labor appears
sporadically side by side with slave labor, and at the same time, as its
necessary correlate, the professional prostitution of free women side by
side with the forced surrender of the slave. Thus the heritage which
group marriage has bequeathed to civilization is double-edged, just as
everything civilization brings forth is double-edged, double-tongued,
divided against itself, contradictory: here monogamy, there hetaerism,
with its most extreme form, prostitution. For hetaerism is as much a
social institution as any other; it continues the old sexual freedom –
to the advantage of the men. Actually not merely tolerated, but gaily
practiced, by the ruling classes particularly, it is condemned in words.
But in reality this condemnation never falls on the men concerned, but
only on the women; they are despised and outcast, in order that the
unconditional supremacy of men over the female sex may be once more
proclaimed as a fundamental law of society.

But a second contradiction thus develops within monogamous marriage
itself. At the side of the husband who embellishes his existence with
hetaerism stands the neglected wife. And one cannot have one side of
this contradiction without the other, any more than a man has a whole
apple in his hand after eating half. But that seems to have been the
husbands’ notion, until their wives taught them better. With monogamous
marriage, two constant social types, unknown hitherto, make their
appearance on the scene – the wife’s attendant lover and the cuckold
husband. The husbands had won the victory over the wives, but the
vanquished magnanimously provided the crown. Together with monogamous
marriage and hetaerism, adultery became an unavoidable social
institution – denounced, severely penalized, but impossible to suppress.
At best, the certain paternity of the children rested on moral
conviction as before, and to solve the insoluble contradiction the Code
Napoleon, Art- 312, decreed: “L’enfant confu pendant le marriage a pour
pere le mari,” the father of a child conceived during marriage is-the
husband. Such is the final result of three thousand years of monogamous
marriage.

Thus, wherever the monogamous family remains true to its historical
origin and clearly reveals the antagonism between the man and the woman
expressed in the man’s exclusive supremacy, it exhibits in miniature the
same oppositions and contradictions as those in which society has been
moving, without power to resolve or overcome them, ever since it split
into classes at the beginning of civilization. I am speaking here, of
course, only of those cases of monogamous marriage where matrimonial
life actually proceeds according to the original character of the whole
institution, but where the wife rebels against the husband’s supremacy.
Not all marriages turn out thus, as nobody knows better than the German
philistine, who can no more assert his rule in the home than he can in
the state, and whose wife, with every right, wears the trousers he is
unworthy of. But, to make up for it, he considers himself far above his
French companion in misfortune, to whom, oftener than to him, something
much worse happens.

However, monogamous marriage did not by any means appear always and
everywhere in the classically harsh form it took among the Greeks. Among
the Romans, who, as future world-conquerors, had a larger, if a less
fine, vision than the Greeks, women were freer and more respected. A
Roman considered that his power of life and death over his wife
sufficiently guaranteed her conjugal fidelity. Here, moreover, the wife
equally with the husband could dissolve the marriage at will. But the
greatest progress in the development of individual marriage certainly
came with the entry of the Germans into history, and for the reason that
the German – on account of their poverty, very probably – were still at
a stage where monogamy seems not yet to have become perfectly distinct
from pairing marriage. We infer this from three facts mentioned by
Tacitus. First, though marriage was held in great reverence – “they
content themselves with one wife, the women live hedged round with
chastity’” – polygamy was the rule for the distinguished members and the
leaders of the tribe, a condition of things similar to that among the
Americans, where pairing marriage was the rule. Secondly, the transition
from mother-right to father-right could only have been made a short time
previously, for the brother on the mother’s side -the nearest gentile
male relation according to mother-right –was still considered almost
closer of kin than the father, corresponding again to the standpoint of
the American Indians, among whom Marx, as he often said, found the key
to the understanding of our own primitive age. And, thirdly, women were
greatly respected among the Germans, and also influential in public
affairs, which is in direct contradiction to the supremacy of men in
monogamy. In almost all these points the Germans agree with the
Spartans, among whom also, as we saw, pairing marriage had not yet been
completely overcome. Thus, here again an entirely new influence came to
power in the world with the Germans. The new monogamy, which now
developed from the mingling of peoples amid the ruins of the Roman
world, clothed the supremacy of the men in milder forms and gave women a
position which, outwardly at any rate, was much more free and respected
than it had ever been in classical antiquity. Only now were the
conditions realized in which through monogamy-within it, parallel to it,
or in opposition to it, as the case might be-the greatest moral advance
we owe to it could be achieved: modern individual sex-love, which had
hitherto been unknown to the entire world.

This advance, however, undoubtedly sprang from the fact that the Germans
still lived in pairing families and grafted the corresponding position
of women onto the monogamous system, so far as that was possible. It
most decidedly did not spring from the legendary virtue and wonderful
moral purity of the German character, which was nothing more than the
freedom of the pairing family from the crying moral contradictions of
monogamy. On the contrary, in the course of their migrations the Germans
had morally much deteriorated, particularly during their southeasterly
wanderings among the nomads of the Black Sea steppes, from whom they
acquired, not only equestrian skill, but also gross, unnatural vices, as
Ammianus expressly states of the Taifalians and Procopius of the
Herulians.

But if monogamy was the only one of all the known forms of the family
through which modern sex-love could develop, that does not mean that
within monogamy modern sexual love developed exclusively or even chiefly
as the love of husband and wife for each other. That was precluded by
the very nature of strictly monogamous marriage under the rule of the
man. Among all historically active classes-that is, among all ruling
classes-matrimony remained what it had been since the pairing marriage,
a matter of convenience which was arranged by the parents. The first
historical form of sexual love as passion, a passion recognized as
natural to all human beings (at least if they belonged to the ruling
classes), and as the highest form of the sexual impulse-and that is what
constitutes its specific character-this first form of individual sexual
love, the chivalrous love of the middle ages, was by no means conjugal.
Quite the contrary. In its classic form among the Provençals, it heads
straight for adultery, and the poets of love celebrated adultery. The
flower of Provençal love poetry are the Albas (aubades, songs of dawn).
They describe in glowing colors how the knight lies in bed beside his
love-the wife of another man-while outside stands the watchman who calls
to him as soon as the first gray of dawn (alba) appears, so that he can
get away unobserved; the parting scene then forms the climax of the
poem. The northern French and also the worthy Germans adopted this kind
of poetry together with the corresponding fashion of chivalrous love;
old Wolfram of Eschenbach has left us three wonderfully beautiful songs
of dawn on this same improper subject, which I like better than his
three long heroic poems.

Nowadays there are two ways of concluding a bourgeois marriage. In
Catholic countries the parents, as before, procure a suitable wife for
their young bourgeois son, and the consequence is, of course, the
fullest development of the contradiction inherent in monogamy: the
husband abandons himself to hetaerism and the wife to adultery. Probably
the only reason why the Catholic Church abolished divorce was because it
had convinced itself that there is no more a cure for adultery than
there is for death. In Protestant countries, on the other hand, the rule
is that the son of a bourgeois family is allowed to choose a wife from
his own class with more or less freedom; hence there may be a certain
element of love in the marriage, as, indeed, in accordance with
Protestant hypocrisy, is always assumed, for decency’s sake. Here the
husband’s hetaerism is a more sleepy kind of business, and adultery by
the wife is less the rule. But since, in every kind of marriage, people
remain what they were before, and since the bourgeois of Protestant
countries are mostly philistines, all that this Protestant monogamy
achieves, taking the average of the best cases, is a conjugal
partnership of leaden boredom, known as “domestic bliss." The best
mirror of these two methods of marrying is the novel-the French novel
for the Catholic manner, the German for the Protestant. In both, the
hero “gets” them: in the German, the young man gets the girl; in the
French, the husband gets the horns. Which of them is worse off is
sometimes questionable. This is why the French bourgeois is as much
horrified by the dullness of the German novel as the German philistine
is by the “immorality” of the French. However, now that “Berlin is a
world capital,” the German novel is beginning with a little less
timidity to use as part of its regular stock-in-trade the hetaerism and
adultery long familiar to that town.

In both cases, however, the marriage is conditioned by the class
position of the parties and is to that extent always a marriage of
convenience. In both cases this marriage of convenience turns often
enough into crassest prostitution-sometimes of both partners, but far
more commonly of the woman, who only differs from the ordinary courtesan
in that she does not let out her body on piece-work as a wage-worker,
but sells it once and for all into slavery. And of all marriages of
convenience Fourier’s words hold true: “As in grammar two negatives make
an affirmative, so in matrimonial morality two prostitutions pass for a
virtue.” [Charles Fourier, Theorie de l’Uniti Universelle. Paris,
1841-45, Vol. III, p. 120. – Ed.] Sex-love in the relationship with a
woman becomes, and can only become, the real rule among the oppressed
classes, which means today among the proletariat-whether this relation
is officially sanctioned or not. But here all the foundations of typical
monogamy are cleared away. Here there is no property, for the
preservation and inheritance of which monogamy and male supremacy were
established; hence there is no incentive to make this male supremacy
effective. What is more, there are no means of making it so. Bourgeois
law, which protects this supremacy, exists only for the possessing class
and their dealings with the proletarians. The law costs money and, on
account of the worker’s poverty, it has no validity for his relation to
his wife. Here quite other personal and social conditions decide. And
now that large-scale industry has taken the wife out of the home onto
the labor market and into the factory, and made her often the
bread-winner of the family, no basis for any kind of male supremacy is
left in the proletarian household – except, perhaps, for something of
the brutality towards women that has spread since the introduction of
monogamy. The proletarian family is therefore no longer monogamous in
the strict sense, even where there is passionate love and firmest
loyalty on both sides, and maybe all the blessings of religious and
civil authority. Here, therefore, the eternal attendants of monogamy,
hetaerism and adultery, play only an almost vanishing part. The wife has
in fact regained the right to dissolve the marriage, and if two people
cannot get on with one another, they prefer to separate. In short,
proletarian marriage is monogamous in the etymological sense of the
word, but not at all in its historical sense.

Our jurists, of course, find that progress in legislation is leaving
women with no further ground of complaint. Modern civilized systems of
law increasingly acknowledge, first, that for a marriage to be legal, it
must be a contract freely entered into by both partners, and, secondly,
that also in the married state both partners must stand on a common
footing of equal rights and duties. If both these demands are
consistently carried out, say the jurists, women have all they can ask.

This typically legalist method of argument is exactly the same as that
which the radical republican bourgeois uses to put the proletarian in
his place. The labor contract is to be freely entered into by both
partners. But it is considered to have been freely entered into as soon
as the law makes both parties equal on paper. The power conferred on the
one party by the difference of class position, the pressure thereby
brought to bear on the other party – the real economic position of both
– that is not the law’s business. Again, for the duration of the labor
contract both parties are to have equal rights, in so far as one or the
other does not expressly surrender them. That economic relations compel
the worker to surrender even the last semblance of equal rights – here
again, that is no concern of the law.

In regard to marriage, the law, even the most advanced, is fully
satisfied as soon as the partners have formally recorded that they are
entering into the marriage of their own free consent. What goes on in
real life behind the juridical scenes, how this free consent comes about
– that is not the business of the law and the jurist. And yet the most
elementary comparative jurisprudence should show the jurist what this
free consent really amounts to. In the countries where an obligatory
share of the paternal inheritance is secured to the children by law and
they cannot therefore be disinherited – in Germany, in the countries
with French law and elsewhere – the children are obliged to obtain their
parents’ consent to their marriage. In the countries with English law,
where parental consent to a marriage is not legally required, the
parents on their side have full freedom in the testamentary disposal of
their property and can disinherit their children at their pleasure. It
is obvious that, in spite and precisely because of this fact, freedom of
marriage among the classes with something to inherit is in reality not a
whit greater in England and America than it is in France and Germany.

As regards the legal equality of husband and wife in marriage, the
position is no better. The legal inequality of the two partners,
bequeathed to us from earlier social conditions, is not the cause but
the effect of the economic oppression of the woman. In the old
communistic household, which comprised many couples and their children,
the task entrusted to the women of managing the household was as much a
public and socially necessary industry as the procuring of food by the
men. With the patriarchal family, and still more with the single
monogamous family, a change came. Household management lost its public
character. It no longer concerned society. It became a private service;
the wife became the head servant, excluded from all participation in
social production. Not until the coming of modern large-scale industry
was the road to social production opened to her again – and then only to
the proletarian wife. But it was opened in such a manner that, if she
carries out her duties in the private service of her family, she remains
excluded from public production and unable to earn; and if she wants to
take part in public production and earn independently, she cannot carry
out family duties. And the wife’s position in the factory is the
position of women in all branches of business, right up to medicine and
the law. The modern individual family is founded on the open or
concealed domestic slavery of the wife, and modern society is a mass
composed of these individual families as its molecules.

In the great majority of cases today, at least in the possessing
classes, the husband is obliged to earn a living and support his family,
and that in itself gives him a position of supremacy, without any need
for special legal titles and privileges. Within the family he is the
bourgeois and the wife represents the proletariat. In the industrial
world, the specific character of the economic oppression burdening the
proletariat is visible in all its sharpness only when all special legal
privileges of the capitalist class have been abolished and complete
legal equality of both classes established. The democratic republic does
not do away with the opposition of the two classes; on the contrary, it
provides the clear field on which the fight can be fought out. And in
the same way, the peculiar character of the supremacy of the husband
over the wife in the modern family, the necessity of creating real
social equality between them, and the way to do it, will only be seen in
the clear light of day when both possess legally complete equality of
rights. Then it will be plain that the first condition for the
liberation of the wife is to bring the whole female sex back into public
industry, and that this in turn demands the abolition of the monogamous
family as the economic unit of society.

 

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

 

We thus have three principal forms of marriage which correspond broadly
to the three principal stages of human development. For the period of
savagery, group marriage; for barbarism, pairing marriage; for
civilization, monogamy, supplemented by adultery and prostitution.
Between pairing marriage and monogamy intervenes a period in the upper
stage of barbarism when men have female slaves at their command and
polygamy is practiced.

As our whole presentation has shown, the progress which manifests itself
in these successive forms is connected with the peculiarity that women,
but not men, are increasingly deprived of the sexual freedom of group
marriage. In fact, for men group marriage actually still exists even to
this day. What for the woman is a crime, entailing grave legal and
social consequences, is considered honorable in a man or, at the worse,
a slight moral blemish which he cheerfully bears. But the more the
hetaerism of the past is changed in our time by capitalist commodity
production and brought into conformity with it, the more, that is to
say, it is transformed into undisguised prostitution, the more
demoralizing are its effects. And it demoralizes men far more than
women. Among women, prostitution degrades only the unfortunate ones who
become its victims, and even these by no means to the extent commonly
believed. But it degrades the character of the whole male world. A long
engagement, particularly, is in nine cases out of ten a regular
preparatory school for conjugal infidelity.

We are now approaching a social revolution in which the economic
foundations of monogamy as they have existed hitherto will disappear
just as surely as those of its complement-prostitution. Monogamy arose
from the concentration of considerable wealth in the hands of a single
individuals man-and from the need to bequeath this wealth to the
children of that man and of no other. For this purpose, the monogamy of
the woman was required, not that of the man, so this monogamy of the
woman did not in any way interfere with open or concealed polygamy on
the part of the man. But by transforming by far the greater portion, at
any rate, of permanent, heritable wealth – the means of production –
into social property, the coming social revolution will reduce to a
minimum all this anxiety about bequeathing and inheriting. Having arisen
from economic causes, will monogamy then disappear when these causes
disappear?

One might answer, not without reason: far from disappearing, it will, on
the contrary, be realized completely. For with the transformation of the
means of production into social property there will disappear also
wage-labor, the proletariat, and therefore the necessity for a certain –
statistically calculable – number of women to surrender themselves for
money. Prostitution disappears; monogamy, instead of collapsing, at last
becomes a reality – also for men.

In any case, therefore, the position of men will be very much altered.
But the position of women, of all women, also undergoes significant
change. With the transfer of the means of production into common
ownership, the single family ceases to be the economic unit of society.
Private housekeeping is transformed into a social industry. The care and
education of the children becomes a public affair; society looks after
all children alike, whether they are legitimate or not. This removes all
the anxiety about the “consequences,” which today is the most essential
social – moral as well as economic – factor that prevents a girl from
giving herself completely to the man she loves. Will not that suffice to
bring about the gradual growth of unconstrained sexual intercourse and
with it a more tolerant public opinion in regard to a maiden’s honor and
a woman’s shame? And, finally, have we not seen that in the modern world
monogamy and prostitution are indeed contradictions, but inseparable
contradictions, poles of the same state of society? Can prostitution
disappear without dragging monogamy with it into the abyss?

Here a new element comes into play, an element which, at the time when
monogamy was developing, existed at most in germ: individual sex-love.

Before the Middle Ages we cannot speak of individual sex-love. That
personal beauty, close intimacy, similarity of tastes and so forth
awakened in people of opposite sex the desire for sexual intercourse,
that men and women were not totally indifferent regarding the partner
with whom they entered into this most intimate relationship – that goes
without saying. But it is still a very long way to our sexual love.
Throughout the whole of antiquity, marriages were arranged by the
parents, and the partners calmly accepted their choice. What little love
there was between husband and wife in antiquity is not so much
subjective inclination as objective duty, not the cause of the marriage,
but its corollary. Love relationships in the modern sense only occur in
antiquity outside official society. The shepherds of whose joys and
sorrows in love Theocratus and Moschus sing, the Daphnis and Chloe of
Longus are all slaves who have no part in the state, the free citizen’s
sphere of life. Except among slaves, we find love affairs only as
products of the disintegration of the old world and carried on with
women who also stand outside official society, with hetairai – that is,
with foreigners or freed slaves: in Athens from the eve of its decline,
in Rome under the Caesars. If there were any real love affairs between
free men and free women, these occurred only in the course of adultery.
And to the classical love poet of antiquity, old Anacreon, sexual love
in our sense mattered so little that it did not even matter to him which
sex his beloved was.

Our sexual love differs essentially from the simple sexual desire, the
Eros, of the ancients. In the first place, it assumes that the person
loved returns the love; to this extent the woman is on an equal footing
with the man, whereas in the Eros of antiquity she was often not even
asked. Secondly, our sexual love has a degree of intensity and duration
which makes both lovers feel that non-possession and separation are a
great, if not the greatest, calamity; to possess one another, they risk
high stakes, even life itself. In the ancient world this happened only,
if at all, in adultery. And, finally, there arises a new moral standard
in the judgment of a sexual relationship. We do not only ask, was it
within or outside marriage? But also, did it spring from love and
reciprocated love or not? Of course, this new standard has fared no
better in feudal or bourgeois practice than all the other standards of
morality – it is ignored. But neither does it fare any worse. It is
recognized just as much as they are – in theory, on paper. And for the
present it cannot ask anything more.

At the point where antiquity broke off its advance to sexual love, the
Middle Ages took it up again: in adultery. We have already described the
knightly love which gave rise to the songs of dawn. From the love which
strives to break up marriage to the love which is to be its foundation
there is still a long road, which chivalry never fully traversed. Even
when we pass from the frivolous Latins to the virtuous Germans, we find
in the Nibelungenlied that, although in her heart Kriemhild is as much
in love with Siegfried as he is with her, yet when Gunther announces
that he has promised her to a knight he does not name, she simply
replies: “You have no need to ask me; as you bid me, so will I ever be;
whom you, lord, give me as husband, him will I gladly take in troth.” It
never enters her head that her love can be even considered. Gunther asks
for Brunhild in marriage, and Etzel for Kriemhild, though they have
never seen them. Similarly, in Gutrun, Sigebant of Ireland asks for the
Norwegian Ute, whom he has never seen, Hetel of Hegelingen for Hilde of
Ireland, and, finally, Siegfried of Moorland, Hartmut of Ormany and
Herwig of Seeland for Gutrun, and here Gutrun’s acceptance of Herwig is
for the first time voluntary. As a rule, the young prince’s bride is
selected by his parents, if they are still living, or, if not, by the
prince himself, with the advice of the great feudal lords, who have a
weighty word to say in all these cases. Nor can it be otherwise. For the
knight or baron, as for the prince of the land himself, marriage is a
political act, an opportunity to increase power by new alliances; the
interest of the house must be decisive, not the wishes of an individual.
What chance then is there for love to have the final word in the making
of a marriage?

The same thing holds for the guild member in the medieval towns. The
very privileges protecting him, the guild charters with all their
clauses and rubrics, the intricate distinctions legally separating him
from other guilds, from the members of his own guild or from his
journeymen and apprentices, already made the circle narrow enough within
which he could look for a suitable wife. And who in the circle was the
most suitable was decided under this complicated system most certainly
not by his individual preference but by the family interests.

In the vast majority of cases, therefore, marriage remained, up to the
close of the middle ages, what it had been from the start – a matter
which was not decided by the partners. In the beginning, people were
already born married –married to an entire group of the opposite sex. In
the later forms of group marriage similar relations probably existed,
but with the group continually contracting. In the pairing marriage it
was customary for the mothers to settle the marriages of their children;
here, too, the decisive considerations are the new ties of kinship,
which are to give the young pair a stronger position in the gens and
tribe. And when, with the preponderance of private over communal
property and the interest in its bequeathal, father-right and monogamy
gained supremacy, the dependence of marriages on economic considerations
became complete. The form of marriage by purchase disappears, the actual
practice is steadily extended until not only the woman but also the man
acquires a price – not according to his personal qualities, but
according to his property. That the mutual affection of the people
concerned should be the one paramount reason for marriage, outweighing
everything else, was and always had been absolutely unheard of in the
practice of the ruling classes; that sort of thing only happened in
romance – or among the oppressed classes, who did not count.

Such was the state of things encountered by capitalist production when
it began to prepare itself, after the epoch of geographical discoveries,
to win world power by world trade and manufacture. One would suppose
that this manner of marriage exactly suited it, and so it did. And yet –
there are no limits to the irony of history – capitalist production
itself was to make the decisive breach in it. By changing all things
into commodities, it dissolved all inherited and traditional
relationships, and, in place of time-honored custom and historic right,
it set up purchase and sale, “free” contract. And the English jurist, H.
S. Maine, thought he had made a tremendous discovery when he said that
our whole progress in comparison with former epochs consisted in the
fact that we had passed “from status to contract," from inherited to
freely contracted conditions – which, in so far as it is correct, was
already in The Communist Manifesto [Chapter II].

But a contract requires people who can dispose freely of their persons,
actions, and possessions, and meet each other on the footing of equal
rights. To create these “free” and “equal” people was one of the main
tasks of capitalist production. Even though at the start it was carried
out only half-consciously, and under a religious disguise at that, from
the time of the Lutheran and Calvinist Reformation the principle was
established that man is only fully responsible for his actions when he
acts with complete freedom of will, and that it is a moral duty to
resist all coercion to an immoral act. But how did this fit in with the
hitherto existing practice in the arrangement of marriages? Marriage,
according to the bourgeois conception, was a contract, a legal
transaction, and the most important one of all, because it disposed of
two human beings, body and mind, for life. Formally, it is true, the
contract at that time was entered into voluntarily: without the assent
of the persons concerned, nothing could be done. But everyone knew only
too well how this assent was obtained and who were the real contracting
parties in the marriage. But if real freedom of decision was required
for all other contracts, then why not for this? Had not the two young
people to be coupled also the right to dispose freely of themselves, of
their bodies and organs? Had not chivalry brought sex-love into fashion,
and was not its proper bourgeois form, in contrast to chivalry’s
adulterous love, the love of husband and wife? And if it was the duty of
married people to love each other, was it not equally the duty of lovers
to marry each other and nobody else? Did not this right of the lovers
stand higher than the right of parents, relations, and other traditional
marriage-brokers and matchmakers? If the right of free, personal
discrimination broke boldly into the Church and religion, how should it
halt before the intolerable claim of the older generation to dispose of
the body, soul, property, happiness, and unhappiness of the younger
generation?

These questions inevitably arose at a time which was loosening all the
old ties of society and undermining all traditional conceptions. The
world had suddenly grown almost ten times bigger; instead of one
quadrant of a hemisphere, the whole globe lay before the gaze of the
West Europeans, who hastened to take the other seven quadrants into
their possession. And with the old narrow barriers of their homeland f
ell also the thousand-year-old barriers of the prescribed medieval way
of thought. To the outward and the inward eye of man opened an
infinitely wider horizon. What did a young man care about the approval
of respectability, or honorable guild privileges handed down for
generations, when the wealth of India beckoned to him, the gold and the
silver mines of Mexico and Potosi? For the bourgeoisie, it was the time
of knight-errantry; they, too, had their romance and their raptures of
love, but on a bourgeois footing and, in the last analysis, with
bourgeois aims.

So it came about that the rising bourgeoisie, especially in Protestant
countries, where existing conditions had been most severely shaken,
increasingly recognized freedom of contract also in marriage, and
carried it into effect in the manner described. Marriage remained class
marriage, but within the class the partners were conceded a certain
degree of freedom of choice. And on paper, in ethical theory and in
poetic description, nothing was more immutably established than that
every marriage is immoral which does not rest on mutual sexual love and
really free agreement of husband and wife. In short, the love marriage
was proclaimed as a human right, and indeed not only as a droit de
l’homme, one of the rights of man, but also, for once in a way, as droit
de la fem?", one of the rights of woman.

This human right, however, differed in one respect from all other
so-called human rights. While the latter, in practice, remain restricted
to the ruling class (the bourgeoisie), and are directly or indirectly
curtailed for the oppressed class (the proletariat), in the case of the
former the irony of history plays another of its tricks. The ruling
class remains dominated by the familiar economic influences and
therefore only in exceptional cases does it provide instances of really
freely contracted marriages, while among the oppressed class, as we have
seen, these marriages are the rule.

Full freedom of marriage can therefore only be generally established
when the abolition of capitalist production and of the property
relations created by it has removed all the accompanying economic
considerations which still exert such a powerful influence on the choice
of a marriage partner. For then there is no other motive left except
mutual inclination.

And as sexual love is by its nature exclusive – although at present this
exclusiveness is fully realized only in the woman – the marriage based
on sexual love is by its nature individual marriage. We have seen how
right Bachofen was in regarding the advance from group marriage to
individual marriage as primarily due to the women. Only the step from
pairing marriage to monogamy can be put down to the credit of the men,
and historically the essence of this was to make the position of the
women worse and the infidelities of the men easier. If now the economic
considerations also disappear which made women put up with the habitual
infidelity of their husbands – concern for their own means of existence
and still more for their children’s future – then, according to all
previous experience, the equality of woman thereby achieved will tend
infinitely more to make men really monogamous than to make women
polyandrous.

But what will quite certainly disappear from monogamy are all the
features stamped upon it through its origin in property relations; these
are, in the first place, supremacy of the man, and, secondly,
indissolubility. The supremacy of the man in marriage is the simple
consequence of his economic supremacy, and with the abolition of the
latter will disappear of itself. The indissolubility of marriage is
partly a consequence of the economic situation in which monogamy arose,
partly tradition from the period when the connection between this
economic situation and monogamy was not yet fully understood and was
carried to extremes under a religious form. Today it is already broken
through at a thousand points. If only the marriage based on love is
moral, then also only the marriage in which love continues. But the
intense emotion of individual sex-love varies very much in duration from
one individual to another, especially among men, and if affection
definitely comes to an end or is supplanted by a new passionate love,
separation is a benefit for both partners as well as for society – only
people will then be spared having to wade through the useless mire of a
divorce case.

What we can now conjecture about the way in which sexual relations will
be ordered after the impending overthrow of capitalist production is
mainly of a negative character, limited for the most part to what will
disappear. But what will there be new? That will be answered when a new
generation has grown up: a generation of men who never in their lives
have known what it is to buy a woman’s surrender with money or any other
social instrument of power; a generation of women who have never known
what it is to give themselves to a man from any other considerations
than real love, or to refuse to give themselves to their lover from fear
of the economic consequences. When these people are in the world, they
will care precious little what anybody today thinks they ought to do;
they will make their own practice and their corresponding public opinion
about the practice of each individual – and that will be the end of it.

Let us, however, return to Morgan, from whom we have moved a
considerable distance. The historical investigation of the social
institutions developed during the period of civilization goes beyond the
limits of his book. How monogamy fares during this epoch, therefore,
only occupies him very briefly. He, too, sees in the further development
of the monogamous family a step forward, an approach to complete
equality of the sexes, though he does not regard this goal as attained.
But, he says:

When the fact is accepted that the family has passed through four
successive forms, and is now in a fifth, the question at once arises
whether this form can be permanent in the future. The only answer that
can be given is that it must advance as society advances, and change as
society changes, even as it has done in the past. It is the creature of
the social system, and will reflect its culture. As the monogamian
family has improved greatly since the commencement of civilization, and
very sensibly in modern times, it is at least supposable that it is
capable of still further improvement until the equality of the sexes is
attained. Should the monogamian family in the distant future fail to
answer the requirements of society ... it is impossible to predict the
nature of its successor.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

III. The Iroquois Gens

------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

 

We now come to another discovery made by Morgan, which is at least as
important as the reconstruction of the family in its primitive form from
the systems of consanguinity. The proof that the kinship organizations
designated by animal names in a tribe of American Indians are
essentially identical with the genea of the Greeks and the gentes of the
Romans; that the American is the original form and the Greek and Roman
forms are later and derivative; that the whole social organization of
the primitive Greeks and Romans into gens, phratry, and tribe finds its
faithful parallel in that of the American Indians; that the gens is an
institution common to all barbarians until their entry into civilization
and even afterwards (so far as our sources go up to the present) – this
proof has cleared up at one stroke the most difficult questions in the
most ancient periods of Greek and Roman history, providing us at the
same time with an unsuspected wealth of information about the
fundamental features of social constitution in primitive times – before
the introduction of the state. Simple as the matter seems once it is
understood, Morgan only made his discovery quite recently. In his
previous work, published in 1871, [1] he had not yet penetrated this
secret, at whose subsequent revelation the English anthropologists,
usually so self-confident, became for a time as quiet as mice.

The Latin word gens, which Morgan uses as a general term for such
kinship organizations, comes, like its Greek equivalent, genos, from the
common Aryan root gan (in German, where, following the law [2] Aryan g
is regularly replaced by k, kan), which means to beget. Gens,, Genos,
Sanscrit janas, Gothic kuni (following the same law as above), Old Norse
and Anglo-Saxon kyn, English kin, Middle High German kunne., all signify
lineage, descent. Gens in Latin and genos in Greek are, however, used
specifically to denote the form of kinship organization which prides
itself on its common descent (in this case from a common ancestral
father) and is bound together by social and religious institutions into
a distinct community, though to all our historians its origin and
character have hitherto remained obscure.

We have already seen, in connection with the punaluan family [see
Chapter 2, above], what is the composition of a gens in its original
form. It consists of all the persons who in punaluan marriage, according
to the conceptions necessarily prevailing under it, form the recognized
descendants of one particular ancestral mother, the founder of the gens.
In this form of family, as paternity is uncertain, only the female line
counts. Since brothers may not marry their sisters but only women of
different descent, the children begotten by them with these alien women
cannot, according to mother-right, belong to the father's gens.
Therefore only the offspring of the daughters in each generation remain
within the kinship organization; the offspring of the sons go into the
gentes of their mothers. What becomes of this consanguine group when it
has constituted itself a separate group, distinct from similar groups
within the tribe?

As the classic form of this original gens, Morgan takes the gens among
the Iroquois, and especially in the Seneca tribe. In this tribe there
are eight gentes, named after animals: (1) Wolf, (2) Bear, (3) Turtle,
(4) Beaver, (5) Deer, (6) Snipe, (7) Heron, (8) Hawk. In every gens the
following customs are observed:

1. The gens elects its sachem (head of the gens in peace) and its chief
(leader in war). The sachem had to be chosen from among the members of
the gens, and his office was hereditary within the gens, in the sense
that it had to be filled immediately as often as a vacancy occurred; the
military leader could be chosen from outside the gens, and for a time
the office might even be vacant. A son was never chosen to succeed his
father as sachem, since mother- right prevailed among the Iroquois and
the son consequently belonged to a different gens; but the office might
and often did pass to a brother of the previous sachem or to his
sister's son. All voted in the elections, both men and women. The
election, however, still required the confirmation of the seven
remaining gentes, and only then was the new sachem ceremonially invested
with his office by the common council of the whole Iroquois confederacy.
The significance of this will appear later. The authority of the sachem
within the gens was paternal, and purely moral in character; he had no
means of coercion. By virtue of his office he was also a member of the
tribal council of the Senecas and also of the federal council of all the
Iroquois. The war-chief could only give orders on military expeditions.

2. The gens deposes the sachem and war-chief at will. This also is done
by men and women jointly. After a sachem or chief had been deposed, they
became simple braves, private persons, like the other members. The
tribal council also had the power to depose sachems, even against the
will of the gens.

3. No member is permitted to marry within the gens. This is the
fundamental law of the gens, the bond which holds it together. It is the
negative expression of the very positive blood relationship, by virtue
of which the individuals it comprises become a gens. By his discovery of
this simple fact Morgan has revealed for the first time the nature of
the gens. How little the gens was understood before is obvious from the
earlier reports about savages and barbarians, in which the various
bodies out of which the gentile organization is composed are ignorantly
and indiscriminately referred to as tribe, clan, thum, and so forth, and
then sometimes designated as bodies within which marriage is prohibited.
Thus was created the hopeless confusion which gave Mr. McLennan his
chance to appear as Napoleon, establishing order by his decree: All
tribes are divided into those within which marriage is prohibited
(exogamous) and those within which it is permitted (endogamous). Having
now made the muddle complete, he could give himself up to the
profoundest inquiries as to which of his two absurd classes was the
older exogamy or endogamy. All this nonsense promptly stopped of itself
with the discovery of the gens and of its basis in consanguinity,
involving the exclusion of its members from intermarriage with one
another. It goes without saying that at the stage at which we find the
Iroquois the prohibition of marriage within the gens was stringently
observed.

4. The property of deceased persons passed to the other members of the
gens; it had to remain in the gens. As an Iroquois had only things of
little value to leave, the inheritance was shared by his nearest gentile
relations; in the case of a man, by his own brothers and sisters and
maternal uncle; in the case of a woman, by her children and own sisters,
but not by her brothers. For this reason man and wife could not inherit
from one another, nor children from their father.

5. The members of the gens owed each other help, protection, and
especially assistance in avenging injury by strangers. The individual
looked for his security to the protection of the gens, and could rely
upon receiving it; to wrong him was to wrong his whole gens. From the
bonds of blood uniting the gens sprang the obligation of blood revenge,
which the Iroquois unconditionally recognized. If any person from
outside the gens killed a gentile member, the obligation of blood
revenge rested on the entire gens of the slain man. First, mediation was
tried; the gens of the slayer sat in council, and made proposals of
settlement to the council of the gens of the slain, usually offering
expressions of regret and presents of considerable value. If these were
accepted, the matter was disposed of. In the contrary case, the wronged
gens appointed one or more avengers, whose duty it was to pursue and
kill the slayer. If this was accomplished, the gens of the slayer had no
ground of complaint; accounts were even and closed.

6. The gens has special names or classes of names, which may not be used
by any other gens in the whole tribe, so that the name of the individual
indicates the gens to which he belongs. A gentile name confers of itself
gentile rights.

7. The gens can adopt strangers and thereby admit them into the whole
tribe. Thus among the Senecas the prisoners of war who were not killed
became through adoption into a gens members of the tribe, receiving full
gentile and tribal rights. The adoption took place on the proposal of
individual members of the gens; if a man adopted, he accepted the
stranger as brother or sister; if a woman, as son or daughter. The
adoption had to be confirmed by ceremonial acceptance into the tribe.
Frequently a gens which was exceptionally reduced in numbers was
replenished by mass adoption from another gens, with its consent. Among
the Iroquois the ceremony of adoption into the gens was performed at a
public council of the tribe, and therefore was actually a religious
rite.

8. Special religious ceremonies can hardly be found among the Indian
gentes; the religious rites of the Indians are, however, more or less
connected with the gens. At the six yearly religious festivals of the
Iroquois the sachems and war-chiefs of the different gentes were
included ex officio among the “Keepers of the Faith” and had priestly
functions.

9. The gens has a common burial place. Among the Iroquois of New York
State, who are hedged in on all sides by white people, this has
disappeared, but it existed formerly. It exists still among other
Indians - for example, among the Tuscaroras, who are closely related to
the Iroquois; although they are Christians, each gens has a separate row
in the cemetery; the mother is therefore buried in the same row as her
children, but not the father. And among the Iroquois also the whole gens
of the deceased attends the burial, prepares the grave, the funeral
addresses, etc.

10. The gens has a council: the democratic assembly of all male and
female adult gentiles, all with equal votes. This council elected
sachems, war-chiefs and also the other "Keepers of the Faith," and
deposed them; it took decisions regarding blood revenge or payment of
atonement for murdered gentiles; it adopted strangers into the gens. In
short, it was the sovereign power in the gens. Such were the rights and
privileges of a typical Indian gens.

All the members of an Iroquois gens were personally free, and they were
bound to defend each other's freedom; they were equal in privileges and
in personal rights, the sachem and chiefs claiming no superiority; and
they were a brotherhood bound together by the ties of kin. Liberty,
equality, and fraternity, though never formulated, were cardinal
principles of the gens. These facts are material, because the gens was
the unit of a social and governmental system, the foundation upon which
Indian society was organized.... It serves to explain that sense of
independence and personal dignity universally an attribute of Indian
character. [3]

The Indians of the whole of North America at the time of its discovery
were organized in gentes under mother-right. The gentes had disappeared
only in some tribes, as among the Dakotas; in others, as among the
Ojibwas and the Omahas, they were organized according to father-right.

Among very many Indian tribes with more than five or six gentes, we find
every three, four, or more gentes united in a special group, which
Morgan, rendering the Indian name faithfully by its Greek equivalent,
calls a "phratry" (brotherhood). Thus the Senecas have two phratries:
the first comprises gentes 1 to 4, the second gentes 5 to 8. Closer
investigation shows that these phratries generally represent the
original gentes into which the tribe first split up; for since marriage
was prohibited within the gens, there had to be at least two gentes in
any tribe to enable it to exist independently.

In the measure in which the tribe increased, each gens divided again
into two or more gentes, each of which now appears as a separate gens,
while the original gens, which includes all the daughter gentes,
continues as the phratry. Among the Senecas and most other Indians, the
gentes within one phratry are brother gentes to one another, while those
in the other phratry are their cousin gentes-terms which in the American
system of consanguinity have, as we have seen, a very real and
expressive meaning. Originally no Seneca was allowed to marry within his
phratry, but this restriction has long since become obsolete and is now
confined to the gens. According to Senecan tradition, the Bear and the
Deer were the two original gentes, from which the others branched off.
After this new institution had once taken firm root, it was modified as
required; if the gentes in one phratry died out, entire gentes were
sometimes transferred into it from other phratries to make the numbers
even. Hence we find gentes of the same name grouped in different
phratries in different tribes.

Among the Iroquois, the functions of the phratry are partly social,
partly religious.

(1) In the ball game one phratry plays against another. Each phratry
puts forward its best players, while the other members, grouped
according to phratries, look on and bet against one another on the
victory of their players.

(2) In the tribal council the sachems and the war-chiefs of each phratry
sit together, the two groups facing one another; each speaker addresses
the representatives of each phratry as a separate body.

(3) If a murder had been committed in the tribe, and the slayer and the
slain belonged to different phratries, the injured gens often appealed
to its brother gentes; these held a council of the phratry and appealed
in a body to the other phratry that it also should assemble its council
to effect a settlement. Here the phratry reappears as the original gens,
and with greater prospect of success than the weaker single gens, its
offspring.

(4) At the death of prominent persons the opposite phratry saw to the
interment and the burial ceremonies, while the phratry of the dead
person attended as mourners. If a sachem died, the opposite phratry
reported to the federal council of the Iroquois that the office was
vacant.

(5) The council of the phratry also played a part in the election of a
sachem. That the election would be confirmed by the brother gentes was
more or less taken for granted, but the gentes of the opposite phratry
might raise an objection. In this case the council of the opposite
phratry was assembled; if it maintained the objection, the election was
void.

(6) The Iroquois formerly had special religious mysteries, called
medicine lodges by the white men. Among the Senecas, these mysteries
were celebrated by two religious brotherhoods, into which new members
were admitted by formal initiation; there was one such brotherhood in
each of the two phratries.

(7) If, as is almost certain, the four lineages occupying the four
quarters of Tlascala at the time of the conquest were four phratries, we
here have proof that the phratries were also military units, like the
phratries among the Greeks and similar kinship organizations among the
Germans; these four lineages went into battle as separate groups, each
with its own uniform and flag, and under its own leader.

As several gentes make up a phratry, so in the classic form several
phratries make up a tribe; in some cases, when tribes have been much
weakened, the intermediate form, the phratry, is absent. What
distinguishes an Indian tribe in America?

1. Its own territory and name. In addition to its actual place of
settlement, every tribe further possessed considerable territory for
hunting and lashing. Beyond that lay a broad strip of neutral land
reaching to the territory of the neighboring tribe; it was smaller
between tribes related in language, larger between tribes not so
related. It is the same as the boundary forest of the Germans, the waste
made by Caesar's Suevi around their territory, the isarnholt (in Danish,
jarnved, limes Danicus) between Danes and Germans, the Sachsenwald
(Saxon wood) and branibor (Slav, "protecting wood") between Germans and
Slavs, from which Brandenburg takes its name. The territory delimited by
these uncertain boundaries was the common land of the tribe, recognized
as such by neighboring tribes and defended by the tribe itself against
attacks. In most cases the uncertainty of the boundaries only became a
practical disadvantage when there had been a great increase in
population. The names of the tribes seem generally to have arisen by
chance rather than to have been deliberately chosen; in the course of
time it often happened that a tribe was called by another name among the
neighboring tribes than that which it used itself, just as the Germans
were first called Germans by the Celts.

2. A distinct dialect peculiar to the tribe alone. Tribe and dialect are
substantially coextensive; the formation through segmentation of new
tribes and dialects was still proceeding in America until quite
recently, and most probably has not entirely stopped even today. When
two weakened tribes have merged into one, the exceptional case occurs of
two closely related dialects being spoken in the same tribe. The average
strength of American tribes is under 2,000 members; the Cherokees,
however, number about 26,000, the greatest number of Indians in the
United States speaking the same dialect.

3. The right to install into office the Sachems and war-chiefs elected
by the Gentes and the right to depose them, even against the will of
their gens. As these sachems and war-chiefs are members of the council
of the tribe, these rights of the tribe in regard to them explain
themselves. Where a confederacy of tribes had been formed, with all the
tribes represented in a federal council, these rights were transferred
to the latter.

4. The possession of common religious conceptions (Mythology) and
ceremonies. “After the fashion of barbarians the American Indians were a
religious people.” [4] Their mythology has not yet been studied at all
critically. They already embodied their religious ideas-spirits of every
kind-in human form; but the lower stage of barbarism, which they had
reached, still knows no plastic representations, so-called idols. Their
religion is a cult of nature and of elemental forces, in process of
development to polytheism. The various tribes had their regular
festivals, with definite rites, especially dances and games. Dancing
particularly was an essential part of all religious ceremonies; each
tribe held its own celebration separately.

5. A tribal council for the common affairs of the tribe. It was composed
of all the sachems and war-chiefs of the different gentes, who were
genuinely representative because they could be deposed at any time. It
held its deliberations in public, surrounded by the other members of the
tribe, who had the right to join freely in the discussion and to make
their views heard. The decision rested with the council. As a rule,
everyone was given a hearing who asked for it; the women could also have
their views expressed by a speaker of their own choice. Among the
Iroquois the final decision had to be unanimous, as was also the case in
regard to many decisions of the German mark communities. The tribal
council was responsible especially for the handling of relations with
other tribes; it received and sent embassies, declared war and made
peace. If war broke out, it was generally carried on by volunteers. In
principle, every tribe was considered to be in a state of war with every
other tribe with which it had not expressly concluded a treaty of peace.
Military expeditions against such enemies were generally organized by
prominent individual warriors; they held a war-dance, and whoever joined
in the dance announced thereby his participation in the expedition. The
column was at once formed, and started off. The defense of the tribal
territory when attacked was also generally carried out by volunteers.
The departure and return of such columns were always an occasion of
public festivities. The consent of the tribal council was not required
for such expeditions, and was neither asked nor given. They find their
exact counterpart in the private war expeditions of the German retinues
described by Tacitus, only with the difference that among the Germans
the retinues have already acquired a more permanent character, forming a
firm core already organized in peacetime to which the other volunteers
are attached in event of war. These war parties are seldom large; the
most important expeditions of the Indians, even to great distances, were
undertaken with insignificant forces. If several such parties united for
operations on a large scale, each was under the orders only of its own
leader. Unity in the plan of campaign was secured well or ill by a
council of these leaders. It is the same manner of warfare as we find
described by Ammianus Marcellinus among the Alemanni on the Upper Rhine
in the fourth century.

6. Among some tribes we find a head chief, whose powers, however, are
very slight. He is one of the sachems, and in situations demanding swift
action he has to take provisional measures, until the council can
assemble and make a definite decision. His function represents the first
feeble attempt at the creation of an official with executive power,
though generally nothing more came of it; as we shall see, the executive
official developed in most cases, if not in all, out of the chief
military commander.

The great majority of the American Indians did not advance to any higher
form of association than the tribe. Living in small tribes, separated
from one another by wide tracts between their frontiers, weakened by
incessant wars, they occupied an immense territory with few people. Here
and there alliances between related tribes came into being in the
emergency of the moment and broke up when the emergency had passed. But
in certain districts tribes which were originally related and had then
been dispersed, joined together again in permanent federations, thus
taking the first step towards the formation of nations. In the United
States we find the most developed form of such a federation among the
Iroquois. Emigrating from their homes west of the Mississippi, where
they probably formed a branch of the great Dakota family, they settled
after long wanderings in what is now the State of New York. They were
divided into five tribes: Senecas, Cayugas, Onondagas, Oneidas and
Mohawks. They subsisted on fish, game, and the products of a crude
horticulture, and lived in villages, which were generally protected by a
stockade. Never more than twenty thousand strong, they had a number of
gentes common to all the five tribes, spoke closely related dialects of
the same language, and occupied a continuous stretch of territory which
was divided up among the five tribes. As they had newly conquered this
territory, these tribes were naturally accustomed to stand together
against the Inhabitants they had driven out. From this developed, at the
beginning of the fifteenth century at latest, a regular “everlasting
league,” a sworn confederacy, which in the consciousness of its new
strength immediately assumed an aggressive character, and at the height
of its power, about 1675, conquered wide stretches of the surrounding
country, either expelling the inhabitants or making them pay tribute.
The Iroquois confederacy represents the most advanced social
organization achieved by any Indians still at the lower stage of
barbarism (excluding, therefore, the Mexicans, New Mexicans and
Peruvians).

The main provisions of the confederacy were as follows:

1. Perpetual federation of the five consanguineous tribes on the basis
of complete equality and independence in all internal matters of the
tribe. This bond of kin represented the real basis of the confederacy.
Of the five tribes, three were known as father tribes and were brother
tribes to one another; the other two were known as son tribes, and were
likewise brother tribes to one another. Three gentes, the oldest, still
had their living representatives in all five tribes, and another three
in three tribes; the members of each of these gentes were all brothers
of one another throughout all the five tribes. Their common language, in
which there were only variations of dialect, was the expression and the
proof of their common descent.

2. The organ of the confederacy was federal council of fifty sachems,
all equal in rank and authority; the decisions of this council were
final in all matters relating to the confederacy.

3. The fifty sachems were distributed among the tribes and gentes at the
foundation of the confederacy to hold the new offices specially created
for federal purposes. They were elected by the respective gentes
whenever a vacancy occurred and could be deposed by the gentes at any
time; but the right of investing them with their office belonged to the
federal council.

4. These federal sachems were also sachems in their respective tribes,
and had a seat and a vote in the tribal council.

5. All decisions of the federal council had to be unanimous.

6. Voting was by tribes, so that for a decision to be valid every tribe
and all members of the council in every tribe had to signify their
agreement.

7. Each of the five tribal councils could convene the federal council,
but it could not convene itself.

8. The meetings of the council were held in the presence of the
assembled people; every Iroquois could speak; the council alone decided.

9. The confederacy had no official head or chief executive officer.

10. On the other hand, the council had two principal war-chiefs, with
equal powers and equal authority (the two "kings" of the Spartans, the
two consuls in Rome).

------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

That was the whole public constitution under which the Iroquois lived
for over four hundred years and are still living today. I have described
it fully, following Morgan, because here we have the opportunity of
studying the organization of a society which still has no state. The
state presupposes a special public power separated from the body of the
people, and Maurer, who with a true instinct recognizes that the
constitution of the German mark is a purely social institution,
differing essentially from the state, though later providing a great
part of its basis, consequently investigates in all his writings the
gradual growth of the public power out of, and side by side with, the
primitive constitutions of marks, villages, homesteads, and towns. Among
the North American Indians we see how an originally homogeneous tribe
gradually spreads over a huge continent; how through division tribes
become nations, entire groups of tribes; how the languages change until
they not only become unintelligible to other tribes, but also lose
almost every trace of their original identity; how at the same time
within the tribes each gens splits up into several gentes, how the old
mother gentes are preserved as phratries, while the names of these
oldest gentes nevertheless remain the same in widely distant tribes that
have long been separated-the Wolf and the Bear are still gentile names
among a majority of all Indian tribes. And the constitution described
above applies in the main to them all, except that many of them never
advanced as far as the confederacy of related tribes.

But once the gens is given as the social unit, we also see how the whole
constitution of gentes, phratries, and tribes is almost necessarily
bound to develop from this unit, because the development is natural.
Gens, phratry, and tribe are all groups of different degrees of
consanguinity, each self-contained and ordering its own affairs, but
each supplementing the other. And the affairs which fall within their
sphere comprise all the public affairs of barbarians of the lower stage.
When we find a people with the gens as their social unit, we may
therefore also look for an organization of the tribe similar to that
here described; and when there are adequate sources, as in the case of
the Greeks and the Romans, we shall not only find it, but we shall also
be able to convince ourselves that where the sources fail us, comparison
with the American social constitution helps us over the most difficult
doubts and riddles.

And a wonderful constitution it is, this gentile constitution, in all
its childlike simplicity! No soldiers, no gendarmes or police, no
nobles, kings, regents, prefects, or judges, no prisons, no lawsuits -
and everything takes its orderly course. All quarrels and disputes are
settled by the whole of the community affected, by the gens or the
tribe, or by the gentes among themselves; only as an extreme and
exceptional measure is blood revenge threatened-and our capital
punishment is nothing but blood revenge in a civilized form, with all
the advantages and drawbacks of civilization. Although there were many
more matters to be settled in common than today - the household is
maintained by a number of families in common, and is communistic, the
land belongs to the tribe, only the small gardens are allotted
provisionally to the households - yet there is no need for even a trace
of our complicated administrative apparatus with all its ramifications.
The decisions are taken by those concerned, and in most cases everything
has been already settled by the custom of centuries. There cannot be any
poor or needy - the communal household and the gens know their
responsibilities towards the old, the sick, and those disabled in war.
All are equal and free - the women included. There is no place yet for
slaves, nor, as a rule, for the subjugation of other tribes. When, about
the year 1651, the Iroquois had conquered the Eries and the “Neutral
Nation,” they offered to accept them into the confederacy on equal
terms; it was only after the defeated tribes had refused that they were
driven from their territory. And what men and women such a society
breeds is proved by the admiration inspired in all white people who have
come into contact with unspoiled Indians, by the personal dignity,
uprightness, strength of character, and courage of these barbarians.

We have seen examples of this courage quite recently in Africa. The
Zulus a few years ago and the Nubians a few months ago – both of them
tribes in which gentile institutions have not yet died out – did what no
European army can do. Armed only with lances and spears, without
firearms, under a hail of bullets from the breech-loaders of the English
infantry - acknowledged the best in the world at fighting in close order
– they advanced right up to the bayonets and more than once threw the
lines into disorder and even broke them, in spite of the enormous
inequality of weapons and in spite of the fact that they have no
military service and know nothing of drill. Their powers of endurance
and performance are shown by the complaint of the English that a Kaffir
travels farther and faster in twenty-four hours than a horse. His
smallest muscle stands out hard and firm like whipcord, says an English
painter.

That is what men and society were before the division into classes. And
when we compare their position with that of the overwhelming majority of
civilized men today, an enormous gulf separates the present-day
proletarian and small peasant from the free member of the old gentile
society.

That is the one side. But we must not forget that this organization was
doomed. It did not go beyond the tribe. The confederacy of tribes
already marks the beginning of its collapse, as will soon be apparent,
and was already apparent in the attempts at subjugation by the Iroquois.
Outside the tribe was outside the law. Wherever there was not an
explicit treaty of peace, tribe was at war with tribe, and wars were
waged with the cruelty which distinguishes man from other animals, and
which was only mitigated later by self-interest. The gentile
constitution in its best days, as we saw it in America, presupposed an
extremely undeveloped state of production and therefore an extremely
sparse population over a wide area. Man’s attitude to nature was
therefore one of almost complete subjection to a strange
incomprehensible power, as is reflected in his childish religious
conceptions. Man was bounded by his tribe, both in relation to strangers
from outside the tribe and to himself; the tribe, the gens, and their
institutions were sacred and inviolable, a higher power established by
nature, to which the individual subjected himself unconditionally in
feeling, thought, and action. However impressive the people of this
epoch appear to us, they are completely undifferentiated from one
another; as Marx says, they are still attached to the navel string of
the primitive community. [5] The power of this primitive community had
to be broken, and it was broken. But it was broken by influences which
from the very start appear as a degradation, a fall from the simple
moral greatness of the old gentile society. The lowest interests – base
greed, brutal appetites, sordid avarice, selfish robbery of the common
wealth – inaugurate the new, civilized, class society. It is by the
vilest means – theft, violence, fraud, treason – that the old classless
gentile society is undermined and overthrown. And the new society
itself, during all the two and a half thousand years of its existence,
has never been anything else but the development of the small minority
at the expense of the great exploited and oppressed majority; today it
is so more than ever before.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

Footnotes

 

[1] Systems of Consanguinity and Affinity of the Human Family,
Smithsonian Publications, 1871.-Ed.

 

[2] Engels refers here to Grimm's law of the shifting of consonants in
the Indo-European languages.-Ed.

 

[3] Morgan, _Ancient Society_, pp. 85-86.-Ed.

 

[4] Ibid., p. 117 -Ed.

 

[5] “Those ancient social organisms of production are, as compared with
bourgeois society, extremely simple and transparent. But they are
founded either on the immature development of man individually, who has
not yet severed the umbilical cord that unified him with his fellow men
in a primitive tribal community, or upon direct relations of domination
and subjection.” – (Karl Marx, Capital Vol. I, p. 51, New York.) Ed.

 

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

IV. The Greek Gens

------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

From prehistoric times Greeks and Pelasgians alike, and other peoples of
kindred stock, had been organized in the same organic series as the
Americans: gens, phratry, tribe, confederacy of tribes. The phratry
might be absent, as among the Dorians, and the confederacy of tribes was
not necessarily fully developed everywhere as yet; but in every case the
gens was the unit. At the time of their entry into history, the Greeks
are on the threshold of civilization; between them and the American
tribes, of whom we spoke above, lie almost two entire great periods of
development, by which the Greeks of the heroic age are ahead of the
Iroquois. The gens of the Greeks is therefore no longer the archaic gens
of the Iroquois; the impress of group marriage is beginning to be a good
deal blurred. Mother-right has given way to father-right; increasing
private wealth has thus made its first breach in the gentile
constitution. A second breach followed naturally from the first. After
the introduction of father-right the property of a rich heiress would
have passed to her husband and thus into another gens on her marriage,
but the foundation of all gentile law was now violated and in such a
case the girl was not only permitted but ordered to marry within the
gens, in order that her property should be retained for the gens.

According to Grote's History of Greece, the Athenian gens, in
particular, was held together by the following institutions and customs:

1. Common religious rites, and the exclusive privilege of priesthood in
honor of a particular god, the supposed ancestral father of the gens,
who in this attribute was designated by a special surname.

2. A common burial place (cf. Demosthenes' Eubulides).

3. Mutual right of inheritance.

4. Mutual obligations of help, protection, and assistance in case of
violence.

5. Mutual right and obligation to marry within the gens in certain
cases, especially for orphan girls and heiresses.

6. Possession, at least in some cases, of common property, with a
special archon (head man or president) and treasurer.

Next, several gentes were united in the phratry, but less closely;
though here also we find mutual rights and obligations of a similar
kind, particularly the common celebration of certain religious
ceremonies and the right to avenge the death of a phrator. Similarly,
all the phratries of a tribe held regularly recurring religious
festivals in common, at which a leader of the tribe (phylobasileus),
elected from the nobility (Eupatridai), officiated.

Thus far Grote. And Marx adds:

“In the Greek gens, the savage (e.g. Iroquois) shows through
unmistakably.” He becomes still more unmistakable when we investigate
further.

For the Greek gens has also the following characteristics:

7. Descent in the male line.

8. Prohibition of marriage within the gens except in the case of
heiresses. This exception, and its formulation as an ordinance, prove
the old rule to be valid. This is further substantiated by the
universally accepted principle that at her marriage the woman renounced
the religious rites of her gens and went over to those of her husband,
being also inscribed in his phratry. This custom and a famous passage in
Diccarchus both show that marriage outside the gens was the rule, and
Becker in Charicles directly assumes that nobody might marry within his
own gens.

9. The right of adoption into the gens. This was exercised through
adoption into the family, but required public formalities and was
exceptional.

10. The right to elect chieftains and to depose them. We know that every
gens had its archon; but it is nowhere stated that the office was
hereditary in certain families. Until the end of barbarism the
probability is always against strict heredity, which is quite
incompatible with conditions in which rich and poor had completely equal
rights within the gens.

Not only Grote, but also Niebuhr, Mommsen and all the other historians
of classical antiquity, have come to grief over the gens. Though they
correctly noted many of its characteristics, they always took it to be a
group of families, thus making it impossible for themselves to
understand the nature and origin of the gens. Under the gentile
constitution, the family was never an organizational unit, and could not
be so, for man and wife necessarily belonged to two different gentes.
The whole gens was incorporated within the phratry, and the whole
phratry within the tribe; but the family belonged half to the gens of
the man and half to the gens of the woman. In public law the state also
does not recognize the family; up to this day, the family only exists
for private law. And yet all our histories have hitherto started from
the absurd assumption, which, since the eighteenth century in
particular, has become inviolable, that the monogamous single family,
which is hardly older than civilization, is the core around which
society and state have gradually crystallized.

Mr. Grote will also please note [Marx throws in] that though the Greeks
derive their gentes from mythology, the gentes are older than the
mythology which _they themselves_ created with all its gods and
demigods.

Morgan prefers to quote Grote because he is not only an impressive but
also a trustworthy witness. Grote goes on to say that every Athenian
gens had a name derived from its supposed ancestor; that it was the
general custom before Solon, and even after Solon, in the absence of a
will, for the property of a deceased person to pass to the members of
his gens (gennetai), and that in the case of a murder it was the light
and the duty, first of the relatives of the murdered man, then of the
members of his gens, and lastly of his phratry, to prosecute the
criminal before the tribunals: “All that we hear of the most ancient
Athenian laws is based upon the gentile and phratric divisions.”
(Grote.)

The descent of the gentes from common ancestors has caused the “pedantic
philistines,” as Marx calls them, a lot of brain-racking. As they of
course declare the common ancestors to be pure myths, they are at an
utter loss to explain how the gens originated out of a number of
separate and originally quite unrelated families; yet they have to
perform this feat in order to explain how the gentes exist at all. So
they argue in circles, with floods of words, never getting any further
than the statement: the ancestral tree is a fairy tale, but the gens is
a reality. And finally Grote declares (interpolations by Marx):

We hear of this genealogy but rarely, because it is only brought before
the public in certain cases pre-eminent and venerable. But the humbler
gentes had their common rites [this is strange, Mr. Grote!], and common
superhuman ancestor and genealogy, as well as the more celebrated [this
is most strange, Mr. Grote, among _humbler_ gentes!]: the scheme and
ideal basis [my good sir, not _ideal_, but carnal, germanice
_fleishlich_!] was the same in all. [Quoted by Morgan, op. cit., p. 239.
- Ed.]

Marx summarizes Morgan's reply to this as follows:

“The system of consanguinity corresponding to the original form of the
gens and the Greeks, like other mortals, once possessed such a gens -
preserved the knowledge of the mutual relations between all members of a
gens to each other. They learned this, for them decisively important,
fact by practice from early childhood. This fell into desuetude with the
rise of the monogamian family. The gentile name created a pedigree
beside which that of the individual family was insignificant. This name
was now to preserve the fact of the common descent of those who bore it;
but the lineage of the gens went so far that its members could no longer
prove the actual relationship existing between them, except in a limited
number of cases through recent common ancestors. The name itself was the
evidence of a common descent, and conclusive proof, except in cases of
adoptin. The actual denial of all kinship between gentiles à la Grote
and Neibuhr, which transforms teh gens into a purely fictitious,
fanciful creation of the brain, is, on the other hand, worthy of ‘ideal’
scientists, that is, of cloistered bookworms. Because concatention of
the generations, especially with the incipience of monogamy, is removed
into the distance, and the reality of the past seems reflected in
mythological fantasy, the good old Philistines concluded, and still
conclude, that the fancied genealogy created real gentes!”

As among the Americans, the _phratry_ was a mother gens, split up into
several daughter gentes, and uniting them, often tracing them all to a
common ancestor. Thus, according to Grote,

“all the contemporary members of the phratry of Hekataeus had a common
god for their ancestor at the sixteenth degree.”

Hence, all the gentes of this phratry were literally brother gentes. The
phratry still occurs in Homer as a military unit in that famous passage
where Nestos advises Agamemnon: Draw up people by tribes and by
phratries so that phratry may support phratry, and tribe tribe. The
phratry has further the right and the duty of prosecuting for
blood-guilt incurred against a phrator; hence in earlier times it also
had the obligation of blood revenge. Further, it had common shrines and
festivals; in fact the elaboration of the whole Greek mythology out of
the traditional old Aryan nature-cult was essentially conditioned by the
phratries and gentes, and took place within them. The phratry also had a
chief (the phratriarchos) and, according to de Coulanges, assemblies. It
could pass binding resolutions, and act as a judicial and administrative
body. Even the later state, while it ignored the gens, left certain
public offices in the hands of the phratry.

Several related phratries form a tribe. In Attica there were four
tribes, each consisting of three phratries, each phratry numbering
thirty gentes. Such a rounded symmetry of groups presupposes conscious,
purposeful interference with the naturally developed order. As to how,
when, and why this occurred,. Greek history is silent; the historical
memory of the Greeks only went back to the heroic age.

As the Greeks were crowded together in a relatively small territory,
differences of dialect were less developed than in the wide American
forests; yet in Greece also it was only tribes of the same main dialect
that united in a larger organization, and even Attica, small as it was,
had a dialect of its own, which later, through its general use as the
language of prose, became the dominant dialect.

In the Homeric poems we find most of the Greek tribes already united
into small nations, within which, however, gentes, phratries, and tribes
retained their full independence. They already lived in towns fortified
with walls; the population increased with the increase of the herds, the
extension of agriculture and the beginnings of handicraft. The
differences in wealth thus became more pronounced, and with them the
aristocratic element within the old primitive democracy. The various
small nations waged incessant wars for the possession of the best land
and doubtless also for booty; the use of prisoners of war as slaves was
already a recognized institution.

The constitution of these tribes and small nations was as follows:

(1) The permanent authority was the council (boule), probably composed
originally of all the chiefs of the gentes; later, when their number
became too large, of a selection, whose choice provided an opportunity
of extending and strengthening the aristocratic element. Dionysius
actually speaks of the council in the heroic age as composed of nobles
(kratistoi). The ultimate decision in important matters rested with the
council. Thus in Æschylus the council of Thebes makes what is in the
circumstances the vital decision to give Eteocles an honorable burial,
but to throw out the corpse of Polynices to be devoured by dogs. When
the state was established, this council was merged into the senate.

(2) The assembly of the people (agora). We saw among the Iroquois how
the people, men and women, stood round the council when it was holding
its meetings, intervening in an orderly manner in its deliberations and
thus influencing its decisions. Among the Homeric Greeks, this Umstand
(standing round), to use an old German legal expression, had already
developed into a regular assembly of the people, as was also the case
among the Germans in primitive times. It was convened by the council to
decide important questions; every man bad the right to speak. The
decision was given by a show of hands (AEschylus, The Suppliants) or by
acclamation. The decision of the assembly was supreme and final, for,
says Schomann, in _Griechische Altertumer_,

“if the matter was one requiring the co-operation of the people for its
execution, Homer does not indicate any means by which the people could
be forced to co-operate against their will.”

For at this time, when every adult male member of the tribe was a
warrior, there was as yet no public power separate from the people which
could have been used against the people. Primitive democracy was still
in its full strength, and it is in relation to that fact that the power
and the position both of the council and of the basileus must first be
judged.

(3) The leader of the army (basileus). Marx makes the following comment:

European scholars, born lackeys most of them, make the _basileus_ into a
monarch in the modern sense. Morgan, the Yankee republican, protests.
Very ironically, but truly, he says of the oily-tongued Gladstone and
his Juventus Mundi:

“Mr. Gladstone, who presents to his readers the Grecian chiefs of the
heroic age as kings and princes, with the superadded qualities of
gentlemen, is forced to admit that ‘on the whole we seem to have the
custom or law of primogeniture sufficiently, but not oversharply
defined.’”

[Morgan, op. cit., p. 255 - Ed.]

Mr. Gladstone will probably agree that such an ambiguous law of
primogeniture may be “sufficiently, but not oversharply defined” as
being just as good as none at all.

In what sense the offices of sachem and chieftain were hereditary among
the Iroquois and other Indians, we have already seen. All offices were
elective, generally within a gens, and to that extent hereditary to the
gens. In the course of time, preference when filling vacancies was given
to the nearest gentile relation-brother or sister's son - unless there
were reasons for passing him over. The fact that among the Greeks, under
father-right, the office of basileus generally passed to the son, or one
of the sons, only proves that the probabilities were in favor of the
sons succeeding to the office by popular election; it is no proof at all
of legal hereditary succession without popular election. All that we
have here is the first beginnings among the Iroquois and Greeks of
distinct noble families within the gentes and, in the case of the
Greeks, the first beginnings also of a future hereditary leadership or
monarchy. The probability is, therefore, that among the Greeks the
basileus had either to be elected by the people or at least confirmed in
his office by the recognized organs of the people, the council or agora,
as was the case with the Roman “king” (rex).

In the Iliad, Agamemnon, the ruler of men, does not appear as the
supreme king of the Greeks, but as supreme commander of a federal army
before a besieged town. It is to this supremacy of command that
Odysseus, after disputes had broken out among the Greeks, refers in a
famous passage: “Evil is the rule of many; let one be commander,” etc.
(The favorite line about the scepter is a later addition.)

Odysseus is here not giving a lecture on a form of government, but
demanding obedience to the supreme commander in war. Since they are
appearing before Troy only as an army, the proceedings in the agora
secure to the Greeks all necessary democracy. When Achilles speaks of
presents – that is, the division of the booty – he always leaves the
division, not to Agamemnon or any other basileus, but to the “sons of
the Achacans,” that is, the people. Such epithets as “descended from
Zeus,” “nourished by Zeus,” prove nothing, for every gens is descended
from a god, that of the leader of the tribe being already descended from
a “superior” god, in this case Zeus. Even those without personal
freedom, such as the swineherd Eumaecus and others, are “divine” (dioi
and theioi), and that too in the Odyssey, which is much later than the
Iliad; and again in the Odyssey the name Heros is given to the herald
Mulius as well as to the blind bard Demodocus. Since, in short, council
and assembly of the people function together with the basileus, the word
basileia, which Greek writers employ to denote the so-called Homeric
kingship (chief command in the army being the principal characteristic
of the office), only means – military democracy. (Marx.)

In addition to his military functions, the basileus also held those of
priest and judge, the latter not clearly defined, the former exercised
in his capacity as supreme representative of the tribe or confederacy of
tribes. There is never any mention of civil administrative powers; he
seems, however, to be a member of the council ex officio. It is there
fore quite correct etymologically to translate basileus as king, since
king (kuning) is derived from kuni, kunne, and means head of a gens. But
the old Greek basileus does not correspond in any way to the present
meaning of the word “king.” Thucydides expressly refers to the old
basileia as patrike, i.e. derived from gentes, and says it had strictly
defined, and therefore limited, functions. And Aristotle says that the
basileia of the heroic age was a leadership over free men and that the
basileus was military leader, judge and high priest; he thus had no
governmental power in the later sense. ^([1])

Thus in the Greek constitution of the heroic age we see the old gentile
order as still a living force. But we also see the beginnings of its
disintegration: father-right, with transmission of the property to the
children, by which accumulation of wealth within the family was favored
and the family itself became a power as against the gens; reaction of
the inequality of wealth on the constitution by the formation of the
first rudiments of hereditary nobility and monarchy; slavery, at first
only of prisoners of war, but already preparing the way for the
enslavement of fellow-members of the tribe and even of the gens; the old
wars between tribe and tribe already degenerating into systematic
pillage by land and sea for the acquisition of cattle, slaves and
treasure, and becoming a regular source of wealth; in short, riches
praised and respected as the highest good and the old gentile order
misused to justify the violent seizure of riches. Only one thing was
wanting: an institution which not only secured the newly acquired riches
of individuals against the communistic traditions of the gentile order,
which not only sanctified the private property formerly so little
valued, and declared this sanctification to be the highest purpose of
all human society; but an institution which set the seal of general
social recognition on each new method of acquiring property and thus
amassing wealth at continually increasing speed; an institution which
perpetuated, not only this growing cleavage of society into classes, but
also the right of the possessing class to exploit the non-possessing,
and the rule of the former over the latter.

And this institution came. The state was invented.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

Footnotes

 

[1] Like the Greek basileus, so also the Aztec military chief has been
made out to be a modern prince. The reports of the Spaniards, which were
at first misinterpretations and exaggerations, and later actual lies,
were submitted for the first time to historical criticism by Morgan. He
proves that the Mexicans were at the middle stage of barbarism, though
more advanced than the New Mexican Pueblo Indians, and that their
constitution, so far as it can be recognized in the distorted reports,
corresponded to this stage: a confederacy of three tribes, which had
subjugated a number of other tribes and exacted tribute from them, and
which was governed by a federal council and a federal military leader,
out of whom the Spaniards made an “emperor.”

 

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

V. The Rise of the Athenian State

------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

How the state developed, how the organs of the gentile constitution were
partly transformed in this development, partly pushed aside by the
introduction of new organs, and at last superseded entirely by real
state authorities, while the true “people in arms,” organized for its
self-defense in its gentes, phratries, and tribes, was replaced by an
armed “public force” in the service of these state authorities and
therefore at their command for use also against the people – this
process, at least in its first stages, can be followed nowhere better
than in ancient Athens. The changes in form have been outlined by
Morgan, but their economic content and cause must largely be added by
myself.

In the Heroic age the four tribes of the Athenians were still settled in
Attica in separate territories; even the twelve phratries composing them
seem still to have had distinct seats in the twelve towns of Cecrops.
The constitution was that of the heroic age: assembly of the people,
council of the people, basileus. As far as written history takes us
back, we find the land already divided up and privately owned, which is
in accordance with the relatively advanced commodity production and the
corresponding trade in commodities developed towards the end of the
upper stage of barbarism. In addition to grain, wine and oil were
produced; to a continually increasing extent, the sea trade in the
Aegean was captured from the Phoenicians, and most of it passed into
Athenian hands. Through the sale and purchase of land, and the
progressive division of labor between agriculture and handicraft, trade,
and shipping, it was inevitable that the members of the different
gentes, phratries, and tribes very soon became intermixed, and that into
the districts of the phratry and tribe moved inhabitants, who, although
fellow countrymen, did not belong to these bodies and were therefore
strangers in their own place of domicile. For when times were quiet,
each tribe and each phratry administered its own affairs without sending
to Athens to consult the council of the people or the basileus. But
anyone not a member of the phratry or tribe was, of course, excluded
from taking any part in this administration, even though living in the
district.

The smooth functioning of the organs of the gentile constitution was
thus thrown so much out of gear that even in the heroic age remedies had
to be found. The constitution ascribed to Theseus was introduced. The
principal change which it made was to set up a central authority in
Athens – that is, part of the affairs hitherto administered by the
tribes independently were declared common affairs and entrusted to the
common council sitting in Athens. In taking this step, the Athenians
went further than any native people of America had ever done: instead of
neighboring tribes forming a simple confederacy, they fused together
into one single nation. Hence arose a common Athenian civil law, which
stood above the legal customs of the tribes and gentes.

The Athenian citizen, as such, acquired definite rights and new
protection in law even on territory which was not that of his tribe. The
first step had been taken towards undermining the gentile constitution;
for this was the first step to the later admission of citizens who did
not belong to any tribe in all Attica, but were, and remained,
completely outside the Athenian gentile constitution. By a second
measure ascribed to Theseus, the entire people, regardless of gens,
phratry or tribe, was divided into three classes: eupatridai, or nobles,
geomoroi, or farmers, and demiourgoi, or artisans, and the right to hold
office was vested exclusively in the nobility. Apart from the tenure of
offices by the nobility, this division remained inoperative, as it did
not create any other legal distinctions between the classes. It is,
however, important because it reveals the new social elements which had
been developing unobserved. It shows that the customary appointment of
members of certain families to the offices of the gens had already grown
into an almost uncontested right of these families to office; it shows
that these families, already powerful through their wealth, were
beginning to form groupings outside their gentes as a separate,
privileged class, and that the state now taking form sanctioned this
presumption. It shows further that the division of labor between
peasants and artisans was now firmly enough established in its social
importance to challenge the old grouping of gentes and tribes. And,
finally, it proclaims the irreconcilable opposition between gentile
society and the state; the first attempt at forming a state consists in
breaking up the gentes by dividing their members into those with
privileges and those with none, and by further separating the latter
into two productive classes and thus setting them one against the other.

The further political history of Athens up to the time of Solon is only
imperfectly known. The office of basileus fell into disuse; the
positions at the head of the state were occupied by archons elected from
the nobility. The power of the nobility continuously increased, until
about the year 600 B.C. it became insupportable. And the principal means
for suppressing the common liberty were – money and usury. The nobility
had their chief seat in and around Athens, whose maritime trade, with
occasional piracy still thrown in, enriched them and concentrated in
their hands the wealth existing in the form of money. From here the
growing money economy penetrated like corrosive acid into the old
traditional life of the rural communities founded on natural economy.
The gentile constitution is absolutely irreconcilable with money
economy; the ruin of the Attic small farmers coincided with the
loosening of the old gentile bonds which embraced and protected them.
The debtorA’s bond and the lien on property (for already the Athenians
had invented the mortgage also) respected neither gens nor phratry,
while the old gentile constitution, for its part, knew neither money nor
advances of money nor debts in money. Hence the money rule of the
aristocracy now in full flood of expansion also created a new customary
law to secure the creditor against the debtor and to sanction the
exploitation of the small peasant by the possessor of money. All the
fields of Attica were thick with mortgage columns bearing inscriptions
stating that the land on which they stood was mortgaged to such and such
for so and so much. The fields not so marked had for the most part
already been sold on account of unpaid mortgages or interest, and had
passed into the ownership of the noble usurer; the peasant could count
himself lucky if he was allowed to remain on the land as a tenant and
live on one-sixth of the produce of his labor, while he paid five-sixths
to his new master as rent. And that was not all. If the sale of the land
did not cover the debt, or if the debt had been contracted without any
security, the debtor, in order to meet his creditor's claims, had to
sell his children into slavery abroad. Children sold by their father –
such was the first fruit of father-right and monogamy! And if the
blood-sucker was still not satisfied, he could sell the debtor himself
as a slave. Thus the pleasant dawn of civilization began for the
Athenian people.

Formerly, when the conditions of the people still corresponded to the
gentile constitution, such an upheaval was impossible; now it had
happened – nobody knew how. Let us go back for a moment to our Iroquois,
amongst whom the situation now confronting the Athenians, without their
own doing, so to speak, and certainly against their will, was
inconceivable. Their mode of producing the necessities of life,
unvarying from year to year, could never generate such conflicts as were
apparently forced on the Athenians from without; it could never create
an opposition of rich and poor, of exploiters and exploited. The
Iroquois were still very far from controlling nature, but within the
limits imposed on them by natural forces they did control their own
production. Apart from bad harvests in their small gardens, the
exhaustion of the stocks of fish in their lakes and rivers or of the
game in their woods, they knew what results they could expect, making
their living as they did. The certain result was a livelihood, plentiful
or scanty; but one result there could never be – social upheavals that
no one had ever intended, sundering of the gentile bonds, division of
gens and tribe into two opposing and warring classes. Production was
limited in the extreme, but – the producers controlled their product.
That was the immense advantage of barbarian production, which was lost
with the coming of civilization; to reconquer it, but on the basis of
the gigantic control of nature now achieved by man and of the free
association now made possible, will be the task of the next generations.

Not so among the Greeks. The rise of private property in herds and
articles of luxury led to exchange between individuals, to the
transformation of products into commodities. And here lie the seeds of
the whole subsequent upheaval. When the producers no longer directly
consumed their product themselves, but let it pass out of their hands in
the act of exchange, they lost control of it. They no longer knew what
became of it; the possibility was there that one day it would be used
against the producer to exploit and oppress him. For this reason no
society can permanently retain the mastery of its own production and the
control over the social effects of its process of production unless it
abolishes exchange between individuals.

But the Athenians were soon to learn how rapidly the product asserts its
mastery over the producer when once exchange between individuals has
begun and products have been transformed into commodities. With the
coming of commodity production, individuals began to cultivate the soil
on their own account, which soon led to individual ownership of land.
Money followed, the general commodity with which all others 101 were
exchangeable. But when men invented money, they did not think that they
were again creating a new social power, the one general power before
which the whole of society must bow. And it was this new power, suddenly
sprung to life without knowledge or will of its creators, which now, in
all the brutality of its youth, gave the Athenians the first taste of
its might.

What was to be done? The old gentile constitution had not only shown
itself powerless before the triumphal march of money; it was absolutely
incapable of finding any place within its framework for such things as
money, creditors, debtors, and forcible collection of debts. But the new
social power was there; pious wishes, and yearning for the return of the
good old days would not drive money and usury out of the world. Further,
a number of minor breaches had also been made in the gentile
constitution. All over Attica, and especially in Athens itself, the
members of the different gentes and phratries became still more
indiscriminately mixed with every generation, although even now an
Athenian was only allowed to sell land outside his gens, not the house
in which he lived. The division of labor between the different branches
of production – agriculture, handicrafts (in which there were again
innumerable subdivisions), trade, shipping, and so forth – had been
carried further with every advance of industry and commerce; the
population was now divided according to occupation into fairly permanent
groups, each with its new common interests; and since the gens and the
phratry made no provision for dealing with them, new offices had to be
created. The number of slaves had increased considerably, and even at
that time must have far exceeded the number of free Athenians; the
gentile constitution originally knew nothing of slavery and therefore
had no means of keeping these masses of bondsmen in order. Finally,
trade had brought to Athens a number of foreigners who settled there on
account of the greater facilities of making money; they also could claim
no rights or protection under the old constitution; and, though they
were received with traditional tolerance, they remained a disturbing and
alien body among the people.

In short, the end of the gentile constitution was approaching. Society
was outgrowing it more every day; even the worst evils that had grown up
under its eyes were beyond its power to check or remove. But in the
meantime the state had quietly been developing. The new groups formed by
the division of labor, first between town and country, then between the
different branches of town labor, had created new organs to look after
their interests; official posts of all kinds had been set up. And above
everything else the young state needed a power of its own, which in the
case of the seafaring Athenians could at first only be a naval power,
for the purpose of carrying on small wars and protecting its merchant
ships. At some unknown date before Solon, the naukrariai were set up,
small territorial districts, twelve to each tribe; each naukratia had to
provide, equip and man a warship and also contribute two horsemen. This
institution was a twofold attack on the gentile constitution. In the
first place, it created a public force which was now no longer simply
identical with the whole body of the armed people; secondly, for the
first time it divided the people for public purposes, not by groups of
kinship, but by common place of residence. We shall see the significance
of this.

The gentile constitution being incapable of bringing help to the
exploited people, there remained only the growing state. And the state
brought them its help in the form of the constitution of Solon, thereby
strengthening itself again at the expense of the old constitution. Solon
– the manner in which his reform, which belongs to the year 594 B.C.,
was carried through does not concern us here – opened the series of
so-called political revolutions; and he did so with an attack on
property. All revolutions hitherto have been revolutions to protect one
kind of property against another kind of property. They cannot protect
the one without violating the other. In the great French Revolution
feudal property was sacrificed to save bourgeois property; in that of
Solon, the property of the creditors had to suffer for the benefit of
the property of the debtors. The debts were simply declared void. We do
not know the exact details, but in his poems Solon boasts of having
removed the mortgage columns from the fields and brought back all the
people who had fled or been sold abroad on account of debt. This was
only possible by open violation of property. And, in fact, from the
first to the last, all so-called political revolutions have been made to
protect property – of one kind; and they have been carried out by
confiscating, also called stealing, property – of another kind. The
plain truth is that for two and a half thousand years it has been
possible to preserve private property only by violating property.

But now the need was to protect the free Athenians against the return of
such slavery. The first step was the introduction of general measures –
for example, the prohibition of debt contracts pledging the person of
the debtor. Further, in order to place at least some check on the
nobles’ ravening hunger for the land of the peasants, a maximum limit
was fixed for the amount of land that could be owned by one individual.
Then changes were made in the constitution, of which the most important
for us are the following:

The council was raised to four hundred members, one hundred for each
tribe; here, therefore, the tribe was still taken as basis. But that was
the one and only feature of the new state incorporating anything from
the old constitution. For all other purposes Solon divided the citizens
into four classes according to their property in land and the amount of
its yield: five hundred, three hundred and one hundred fifty medimni of
grain (one medimnus equals about 1.16 bushels) were the minimum yields
for the first three classes; those who owned less land or none at all
were placed in the fourth class. All offices could be filled only from
the three upper classes, and the highest offices only from the first.
The fourth class only had the right to speak and vote in the assembly of
the people; but it was in this assembly that all officers were elected,
here they had to render their account, here all laws were made; and here
the fourth class formed the majority. The privileges of the aristocracy
were partially renewed in the form of privileges of wealth, but the
people retained the decisive power. Further, the four classes formed the
basis of a new military organization. The first two classes provided the
cavalry; the third had to serve as heavy infantry; the fourth served
either as light infantry without armor or in the fleet, for which they
probably received wages.

A completely new element is thus introduced into the constitution:
private ownership. According to the size of their property in land, the
rights and duties of the citizens of the state are now assessed, and in
the same degree to which the classes based on property gain influence,
the old groups of blood relationship lose it; the gentile constitution
had suffered a new defeat.

However, the assessment of political rights on a property basis was not
an institution indispensable to the existence of the state. In spite of
the great part it has played in the constitutional history of states,
very many states, and precisely those most highly developed, have not
required it. In Athens also its role was only temporary; from the time
of Aristides all offices were open to every citizen.

During the next eighty years Athenian society gradually shaped the
course along which it developed in the following centuries. Usury on the
security of mortgaged land, which had been rampant in the period before
Solon, had been curbed, as had also the inordinate concentration of
property in land. Commerce and handicrafts, including artistic
handicrafts, which were being increasingly developed on a large scale by
the use of slave labor, became the main occupations. Athenians were
growing more enlightened. Instead of exploiting their fellow citizens in
the old brutal way, they exploited chiefly the slaves and the
non-Athenian customers. Movable property, wealth in the form of money,
of slaves and ships, continually increased, but it was no longer a mere
means to the acquisition of landed property, as in the old slow days: it
had become an end in itself. On the one hand the old power of the
aristocracy now had to contend with successful competition from the new
class of rich industrialists and merchants; but, on the other hand, the
ground was also cut away from beneath the last remains of the old
gentile constitution. The gentes, phratries, and tribes, whose members
were now scattered over all Attica and thoroughly intermixed, had thus
become useless as political bodies; numbers of Athenian citizens did not
belong to any gens at all; they were immigrants, who had indeed acquired
rights of citizenship, but had not been adopted into any of the old
kinship organizations; in addition, there was the steadily increasing
number of foreign immigrants who only had rights of protection.

Meanwhile, the fights went on between parties; the nobility tried to win
back their former privileges and for a moment regained the upper hand,
until the revolution of Cleisthenes (509 B.C.) overthrew them finally,
but with them also the last remnants of the gentile constitution.

In his new constitution, Cleisthenes ignored the four old tribes founded
on gentes and phratries. In their place appeared a completely new
organization on the basis of division of the citizens merely according
to their place of residence, such as had been already attempted in the
naukrariai. Only domicile was now decisive, not membership of a kinship
group. Not the people, but the territory was now divided: the
inhabitants became a mere political appendage of the territory.

The whole of Attica was divided into one hundred communal districts,
called “demes,” each of which was self-governing. The citizens resident
in each deme (demotes) elected their president (demarch) and treasurer,
as well as thirty judges with jurisdiction in minor disputes. They were
also given their own temple and patron divinity or hero, whose priests
they elected. Supreme power in the deme was vested in the assembly of
the demotes. As Morgan rightly observes, here is the prototype of the
self-governing American township. The modern state, in its highest
development, ends in the same unit with which the rising state in Athens
began.

Ten of these units (demes) formed a tribe, which, however, is now known
as a local tribe to distinguish it from the old tribe of kinship. The
local tribe was not only a self-governing political body, but also a
military body; it elected its phylarch, or tribal chief, who commanded
the cavalry, the taxiarch commanding the infantry, and the strategos,
who was in command over all the forces raised in the tribal area. It
further provided five warships with their crews and commanders, and
received as patron deity an Attic hero, after whom it was named. Lastly,
it elected fifty councilors to the Athenian council.

At the summit was the Athenian state, governed by the council composed
of the five hundred councilors elected by the ten tribes, and in the
last instance by the assembly of the people, at which every Athenian
citizen had the right to attend and to vote; archons and other officials
managed the various departments of administration and justice. In Athens
there was no supreme official with executive power.

Through this new constitution and the admission to civil rights of a
very large number of protected persons, partly immigrants, partly freed
slaves, the organs of the gentile constitution were forced out of public
affairs; they sank to the level of private associations and religious
bodies. But the moral influence of the old gentile period and its
traditional ways of thought were still handed down for a long time to
come, and only died out gradually. We find evidence of this in another
state institution.

We saw that an essential characteristic of the state is the existence of
a public force differentiated from the mass of the people. At this time,
Athens still had only a people’s army and a fleet provided directly by
the people; army and fleet gave protection against external enemies and
kept in check the slaves, who already formed the great majority of the
population. In relation to the citizens, the public power at first
existed only in the form of the police force, which is as old as the
state itself; for which reason the naive French of the eighteenth
century did not speak of civilized peoples, but of policed peoples
(nations policees). The Athenians then instituted a police force
simultaneously with their state, a veritable gendarmerie of bowmen, foot
and mounted Landjäger [the country's hunters] as they call them in South
Germany and Switzerland. But this gendarmerie consisted of slaves. The
free Athenian considered police duty so degrading that he would rather
be arrested by an armed slave than himself have any hand in such
despicable work. That was still the old gentile spirit. The state could
not exist without police, but the state was still young and could not
yet inspire enough moral respect to make honorable an occupation which,
to the older members of the gens, necessarily appeared infamous.

Now complete in its main features, the state was perfectly adapted to
the new social conditions of the Athenians, as is shown by the rapid
growth of wealth, commerce, and industry. The class opposition on which
the social and political institutions rested was no longer that of
nobility and common people, but of slaves and free men, of protected
persons and citizens. At the time of their greatest prosperity, the
entire free-citizen population of Athens, women and children included,
numbered about ninety thousand; besides them there were three hundred
and sixty-five thousand slaves of both sexes and forty-five thousand
protected persons - aliens and freedmen. There were therefore at least
eighteen slaves and more than two protected persons to every adult male
citizen. The reason for the large number of slaves was that many of them
worked together in manufactories, in large rooms, under overseers. But
with the development of commerce and industry wealth was accumulated and
concentrated in a few hands, and the mass of the free citizens were
impoverished. Their only alternatives were to compete against slave
labor with their own labor as handicraftsman, which was considered base
and vulgar and also offered very little prospect of success, or to
become social scrap. Necessarily, in the circumstances, they did the
latter, and, as they formed the majority, they thereby brought about the
downfall of the whole Athenian state. The downfall of Athens was not
caused by democracy, as the European lickspittle historians assert to
flatter their princes, but by slavery, which banned the labor of free
citizens.

The rise of the state among the Athenians is a particularly typical
example of the formation of a state; first, the process takes place in a
pure form, without any interference through use of violent force, either
from without or from within (the usurpation by Pisistratus left no trace
of its short duration); second, it shows a very highly developed form of
state, the democratic republic, arising directly out of gentile society;
and lastly we are sufficiently acquainted with all the essential
details.

 

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

VI. The Gens and the State in Rome

------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

According to the legendary account of the foundation of Rome, the first
settlement was established by a number of Latin _gentes_ [1] (one
hundred, says the legend), who were united in a tribe; these were soon
joined by a Sabellian tribe, also said to have numbered a hundred
gentes, and lastly by a third tribe of mixed elements, again said to
have been composed of a hundred gentes. The whole account reveals at the
first glance that very little was still primitive here except the gens,
and that even it was in some cases only an offshoot from a mother gens
still existing in its original home. The tribes clearly bear the mark of
their artificial composition, even though they are generally composed
out of related elements and after the pattern of the old tribe, which
was not made but grew; it is, however, not an impossibility that the
core of each of the three tribes was a genuine old tribe. The
intermediate group, the phratry, consisted of ten gentes and was called
a curia; there were therefore thirty curiae.

The Roman gens is recognized to be the same institution as the Greek
gens; and since the Greek gens is a further development of the social
unit whose original form is found among the American Indians, this, of
course, holds true of the Roman gens also. Here therefore we can be more
brief.

The Roman gens, at least in the earliest times of Rome, had the
following constitution:

1. Mutual right of inheritance among gentile members; the property
remained within the gens. Since father-right already prevailed in the
Roman gens as in the Greek, descendants in the female line were
excluded. According to the Law of the Twelve Tables, the oldest written
Roman law known to us, the children, as natural heirs, had the first
title to the estate; in default of children, then the agnates
(descendants in the male line); in default of agnates, the gentiles. In
all cases the property remained within the gens. Here we see gentile
custom gradually being penetrated by the new legal provisions springing
from increased wealth and monogamy: the original equal right of
inheritance of all members of the gens is first restricted in practice
to the agnates-probably very early, as already mentioned -- finally, to
the children and their issue in the male line; in the Twelve Tables this
appears, of course, in the reverse order.

2. Possession of a common burial place. On their immigration to Rome
from Regilli, the patrician gens of the Claudii received a piece of land
for their own use and also a common burial place in the town. Even in
the time of Augustus, the head of Varus, who had fallen in the battle of
the Teutoburg Forest, was brought to Rome and interred in the
gentilitius tumulusi the gens (Quinctilia) therefore still had its own
burial mound.

3. Common religious rites. These, the sacra gentilitia, are well known.

4. Obligation not to marry within the gens. This seems never to have
become written law in Rome, but the custom persisted. Of all the
countless Roman married couples whose names have been preserved, there
is not one where husband and wife have the same gentile name. The law of
inheritance also proves the observance of this rule. The woman loses her
agnatic rights on marriage and leaves her gens; neither she nor her
children can inherit from her father or his brothers, because otherwise
the inheritance would be lost to the father’s gens. There is no sense in
this rule unless a woman may not marry a member of her own gens.

5. Common land. In primitive times the gens had always owned common
land, ever since the tribal land began to be divided up. Among the Latin
tribes, we find the land partly in the possession of the tribe, partly
of the gens, and partly of the households, which at that time can hardly
have been single families. Romulus is said to have made the first
allotments of land to individuals, about two and one-half acres (two
jugera) to a person. But later we still find land owned by the gentes,
to say nothing of the state land, round which the whole internal history
of the republic centers.

6. Obligation of mutual protection and help among members of the gens.
Only vestiges remain in written history; from the very start the Roman
state made its superior power so manifest that the right of protection
against injury passed into its hands. When Appius Claudius was arrested,
the whole of his gens, even those who were his personal enemies, put on
mourning. At the time of the second Punic war the gentes joined together
to ransom their members who had been taken prisoner; the senate
prohibited them from doing so.

7. Right to bear the gentile name. Persisted till the time of the
emperors; freedmen were allowed to use the gentile name of their former
master, but without gentile rights.

8. Right to adopt strangers into the gens. This was done through
adoption into a family (as among the Indians), which carried with it
acceptance into the gens.

9. The right to elect the chief and to depose him is nowhere mentioned.
But since in the earliest days of Rome all offices were filled by
election or nomination, from the elected king downwards, and since the
priests of the curiae were also elected by the curiae themselves, we may
assume the same procedure for the presidents (Incises) of the gentes
however firmly established the election from one and the same family
within the gens may have already become.

Such were the rights of a Roman gens. Apart from the already completed
transition to father-right, they are the perfect counterpart of the
rights and duties in an Iroquois gens; here again “the Iroquois shows
through unmistakably” (p. 90).

The confusion that still exists today, even among our leading
historians, on the subject of the Roman gens, may be illustrated by one
example. In his paper on Roman family names in the period of the
Republic and of Augustus (_Romische Forschungen_, Berlin, 1864, Vol. I,
pp. 8-11) Mommsen writes:

The gentile name belongs to all the male members of the gens, excluding,
of course, the slaves, but including adopted and protected persons; it
belongs also to the women.... The tribe [as Mommsen here translates
gens] is... a communal entity, derived from common lineage (real,
supposed or even pretended) and united by communal festivities, burial
rites and laws of inheritance; to it all personally free individuals,
and therefore all women also, may and must belong. But it is difficult
to determine what gentile name was borne by married women. So long as
the woman may only marry a member of her own gens, this problem does not
arise; and there is evidence that for a long period it was more
difficult for women to marry outside than inside the gens; for instance,
so late as the sixth century [B.C.] the right of gentis enuptio
(marriage outside the gens) was a personal privilege, conceded as a
reward.... But when such marriages outside the tribe took place, the
wife, in earliest times, must thereby have gone over to her husband's
tribe. Nothing is more certain than that the woman, in the old religious
marriage, enters completely into the legal and sacramental bonds of her
husband's community and leaves her own. Everyone knows that the married
woman forfeits the right of inheritance and bequest in relation to
members of her own gens but shares rights of inheritance with her
husband and children and the members of their gens. And if she is
adopted by her husband and taken into his family, how can she remain
apart from his gens?

Mommsen therefore maintains that the Roman women who belonged to a gens
had originally been permitted to marry only within the gens, that the
gens had therefore been endogamous, not exogamous. This view, which is
in contradiction to all the evidence from other peoples, rests chiefly,
if not exclusively, on one much disputed passage from Livy (Book XXXIX,
Ch. 19), according to which the senate in the year 568 after the
foundation of the city, or 186 B.C., decreed: “Uti Feceniae Hispalae
datio deminutio gentis enuptio tutoris optio item esset, quasi ei vir
testaments dedisset; utique ei ingenuo nubere liceret, neu quid ei qui
eam duxisset ob id fraudi ignominiave essee” – that Fecenia Hispala
shall have the right to dispose of her property, to decrease it, to
marry outside the gens, and to choose for herself a guardian, exactly as
if her (deceased) husband had conferred this right on her by testament;
that she may marry a freeman, and that the man who takes her to wife
shall not be considered to have committed a wrongful or shameful act
thereby.

Without a doubt, Fecenia, a freedwoman, is here granted the right to
marry outside the gens. And equally without a doubt the husband
possessed the right, according to this passage, to bequeath to his wife
by will the right to marry outside the gens after his death. But outside
which gens?

If the woman had to marry within her gens, as Mommsen assumes, she
remained within this gens also after her marriage. But in the first
place the endogamous character of the gens which is here asserted is
precisely what has to be proved. And, secondly, if the wife had to marry
within the gens, then, of course, so had the man, for otherwise he could
not get a wife. So we reach the position that the man could bequeath to
his wife by will a right which he himself, and for himself, did not
possess; we arrive at a legal absurdity. Mommsen also feels this, and
hence makes the assumption: “For a lawful marriage outside the gens, it
was probably necessary to have the consent, not only of the chief, but
of all members of the gens.” That is a very bold assumption in the first
place, and, secondly, it contradicts the clear wording of the passage.
The senate grants her this right in the place of her husband; it grants
her expressly neither more nor less than her husband could have granted
her, but what it grants her is an absolute right, conditional upon no
other restriction. Thus it is provided that if she makes use of this
right, her new husband also shall not suffer any disability. The senate
even directs the present and future consuls and praetors to see to it
that no injurious consequences to her follow. Mommsen’s assumption
therefore seems to be completely inadmissible.

Or assume that the woman married a man from another gens, but herself
remained in the gens into which she had been born. Then, according to
the above passage, the man would have had the right to allow his wife to
marry outside her own gens. That is, he would have had the right to make
dispositions in the affairs of a gens to which he did not even belong.
The thing is so patently absurd that we need waste no more words on it.

Hence there only remains the assumption that in her first marriage the
woman married a man from another gens, and thereby immediately entered
the gens of her husband, which Mommsen himself actually admits to have
been the practice when the woman married outside her gens. Then
everything at once becomes clear. Severed from her old gens by her
marriage and accepted into the gentile group of her husband, the woman
occupies a peculiar position in her new gens. She is, indeed, a member
of the gens, but not related by blood. By the mere manner of her
acceptance as a gentile member, she is entirely excluded from the
prohibition against marrying within the gens, for she has just married
into it; further, she is accepted as one of the married members of the
gens, and on her husband’s death inherits from his property, the
property of a gentile member. What is more natural than that this
property should remain within the gens and that she should therefore be
obliged to marry a member of her husband’s gens and nobody else? And if
an exception is to be made, who is so competent to give her the
necessary authorization as the man who has bequeathed her this property,
her first husband? At the moment when he bequeaths to her a part of his
property and at the same time allows her to transfer it into another
gens through marriage or in consequence of marriage, this property still
belongs to him and he is therefore literally disposing of his own
property. As regards the woman herself and her relation to her husband's
gens, it was he who brought her into the gens by a free act of will -
the marriage; hence it also seems natural that he should be the proper
person to authorize her to leave this gens by a second marriage. In a
word, the matter appears simple and natural as soon as we abandon the
extraordinary conception of the endogamous Roman gens and regard it,
with Morgan, as originally exogamous.

There still remains one last assumption which has also found adherents,
and probably the most numerous. On this view, the passage only means
that “freed servants (liberty) could not without special permission e
gente enubere (marry out of the gens) or perform any of the acts, which,
involving loss of rights (capitis deminutio minima), would have resulted
in the liberta leaving the gens.” (Lange, _Römische Altertumer_, Berlin
1856, I, 195, where Huschke is cited in connection with our passage from
Livy.) If this supposition is correct, the passage then proves nothing
at all about the position of free Roman women, and there can be even
less question of any obligation resting on them to marry within the
gens.

The expression _enuptio gentis_ only occurs in this one passage and
nowhere else in the whole of Latin literature; the word enubere, to
marry outside, only occurs three times, also in Livy, and then not in
reference to the gens. The fantastic notion that Roman women were only
allowed to marry within their gens owes its existence solely to this one
passage. But it cannot possibly be maintained. For either the passage
refers to special restrictions for freedwomen, in which case it proves
nothing about free women (ingenue,); or it applies also to free women;
and then it proves, on the contrary, that the woman married as a rule
outside her gens, but on her marriage entered into the gens of her
husband; which contradicts Mommsen and supports Morgan.

Almost three centuries after the foundation of Rome, the gentile groups
were still so strong that a patrician gens, that of the Fabii, was able
to undertake an independent campaign, with the permission of the senate,
against the neighboring town of Veii; three hundred and six Fabii are
said to have set out and to have been killed to a man, in an ambush;
according to the story, only one boy who had remained behind survived to
propagate the gens.

As we have said, ten gentes formed a phratry, which among the Romans was
called a curia and had more important public functions than the Greek
phratry. Every curia had its own religious rites, shrines and priests;
the latter, as a body, formed one of the Roman priestly colleges. Ten
curiae formed a tribe, which probably, like the rest of the Latin
tribes, originally had an elected president-military leader and high
priest. The three tribes together formed the Roman people, the Populus
Romanus.

Thus no one could belong to the Roman people unless he was a member of a
gens and through it of a curia and a tribe. The first constitution of
the Roman people was as follows: Public affairs were managed in the
first instance by the senate, which, as Niebuhr first rightly saw, was
composed of the presidents of the three hundred gentes; it was because
they were the elders of the gens that they were called fathers, patres,
and their body, the senate (council of the elders, from senex, old).
Here again the custom of electing always from the same family in the
gens brought into being the first hereditary nobility; these families
called themselves “patricians,” and claimed for themselves exclusive
right of entry into the senate and tenure of all other offices. The
acquiescence of the people in this claim, in course of time, and its
transformation into an actual right, appear in legend as the story that
Romulus conferred the patriciate and its privileges on the first
senators and their descendants. The senate, like the Athenian boule,
made final decisions in many matters and held preparatory discussions on
those of greater importance, particularly new laws. With regard to
these, the decision rested with the assembly of the people, called the
comitia curiata (assembly of the curiae). The people assembled together,
grouped in curiae, each curia probably grouped in gentes; each of the
thirty curiae, had one vote in the final decision. The assembly of the
curiae accepted or rejected all laws, elected all higher officials,
including the rex (so-called king), declared war (the senate, however,
concluded peace), and, as supreme court, decided, on the appeal of the
parties concerned, all cases involving death sentence on a Roman
citizen. Lastly, besides the senate and the assembly of the people,
there was the rex, who corresponded exactly to the Greek basileus and
was not at all the almost absolute king which Mommsen made him out to
be. ^([2]) He also was military leader, high priest, and president of
certain courts. He had no civil authority whatever, nor any power over
the life, liberty, or property of citizens, except such as derived from
his disciplinary powers as military leader or his executive powers as
president of a court. The office of rex was not hereditary; on the
contrary, he was first elected by the assembly of the curiae, probably
on the nomination of his predecessor, and then at a second meeting
solemnly installed in office. That he could also be deposed is shown by
the fate of Tarquinius Superbus.

Like the Greeks of the heroic age, the Romans in the age of the
so-called kings lived in a military democracy founded on gentes,
phratries, and tribes and developed out of them. Even if the curiae and
tribes were to a certain extent artificial groups, they were formed
after the genuine, primitive models of the society out of which they had
arisen and by which they were still surrounded on all sides. Even if the
primitive patrician nobility had already gained ground, even if the
reges were endeavoring gradually to extend their power, it does not
change the original, fundamental character of the constitution, and that
alone matters.

Meanwhile, Rome and the Roman territory, which had been enlarged by
conquest, increased in population, partly through immigration, partly
through the addition of inhabitants of the subjugated, chiefly Latin,
districts. All these new citizens of the state (we leave aside the
question of the clients) stood outside the old gentes, curiae, and
tribes, and therefore formed no part of the populus Romanus, the real
Roman people. They were personally free, could own property in land, and
had to pay taxes and do military service. But they could not hold any
office, nor take part in the assembly of the curiae, nor share in the
allotment of conquered state lands. They formed the class that was
excluded from all public rights, the plebs. Owing to their continually
increasing numbers, their military training and their possession of
arms, they became a powerful threat to the old populus, which now
rigidly barred any addition to its own ranks from outside. Further,
landed property seems to have been fairly equally divided between
populus and plebs, while the commercial and industrial wealth, though
not as yet much developed, was probably for the most part in the hands
of the plebs.

The great obscurity which envelops the completely legendary primitive
history of Rome - an obscurity considerably deepened by the
rationalistically pragmatical interpretations and accounts given of the
subject by later authors with legalistic minds - makes it impossible to
say anything definite about the time, course, or occasion of the
revolution which made an end of the old gentile constitution. All that
is certain is that its cause lay in the struggles between plebs and
populus.

The new constitution, which was attributed to the rex Servius Tullius
and followed the Greek model, particularly that of Solon, created a new
assembly of the people, in which populus and plebeian without
distinction were included or excluded according to whether they
performed military service or not. The whole male population liable to
bear arms was divided on a property basis into six classes. The lower
limit in each of the five classes was: (1) 100,000 asses; (2) 75,000
asses; (3) 50,000 asses; (4) 25,000 asses; (5) 11,000 asses; according
to Dureau de la Malle, the equivalent to about 14,000; 10,500; 7,000;
3,600; and 1,570 marks respectively. The sixth class, the proletarians,
consisted of those with less property than the lower class and those
exempt from military service and taxes. In the new popular assembly of
the centuries (comitia centuriata) the citizens appeared in military
formation, arranged by companies in their centuries of a hundred men,
each century having one vote. Now the first class put eighty centuries
in the field, the second twenty-two, the third twenty, the fourth
twenty-two, the fifth thirty, and the sixth also on century for the sake
of appearances. In addition, there was the cavalry, drawn from the
wealthiest men, with eighteen centuries; total, 193; ninety-seven votes
were thus required for a clear majority. But the cavalry and the first
class alone had together ninety-eight votes, an therefore the majority;
if they were agreed, they did not ask the others; they made their
decision, and it stood.

This new assembly of the centuries now took over all political rights of
the former assembly of the curiae, with the exception of a few nominal
privileges. The curiae and the gentes of which they were composed were
thus degraded, as in Athens, to mere private and religious associations
and continued to vegetate as such for a long period while the assembly
of the curiae soon became completely dormant. In order that the three
old tribes of kinship should also be excluded from the state, four local
tribes were instituted, each of which inhabited one quarter of the city
and possessed a number of political rights.

Thus in Rome also, even before the abolition of the so-called monarchy,
the old order of society based on personal ties of blood was destroyed
and in its place was set up a new and complete state constitution based
on territorial division and difference of wealth. Here the public power
consisted of the body of citizens liable to military service, in
opposition not only to the slaves, but also to those excluded from
service in the army and from possession of arms, the so-called
proletarians.

The banishment of the last rex, Tarquinius Superbus, who usurped real
monarchic power, and the replacement of the office of rex by two
military leaders (consuls) with equal powers (as among the Iroquois) was
simply a further development of this new constitution. Within this new
constitution, the whole history of the Roman Republic runs its course,
with all the struggles between patricians and plebeians for admission to
office and share in the state lands, and the final merging of the
patrician nobility in the new class of the great land and money owners,
who, gradually swallowing up all the land of the peasants ruined by
military service, employed slave labor to cultivate the enormous estates
thus formed, depopulated Italy and so threw open the door, not only to
the emperors, but also to their successors, the German barbarians.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

Footnotes

 

[1] As gentes is here the Latin word used by the Romans, it is printed
in italics to distinguish it from the general term "gens" used
throughout the book - Ed.

 

[2] The Latin rex is the same as the Celtic-Irish righ (tribal chief)
and the Gothic reiks; that reiks signified head of the gens or tribe, as
did also originally the German word Furst (meaning "first" – cf. English
first and Danish forste), is shown by the fact that already in the
fourth century the Goths had a special word for the later "king," the
military leader of the whole people: thiudans. In Ulfilas’ translation
of the Bible, Artaxerxes and Herod are never called reiks, but thiudans,
and the empire of the Emperor Tiberius is not called reiki, but
thiudinassus. In the name of the Gothic thiodans or, as we inaccurately
translate, "king," Thiudareik (Theodorich, i.e. Dietrich), both titles
coalesce.

 

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

VII. The Gens among Celts and Germans

------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

Space does not allow us to consider the gentile institutions still
existing in greater or lesser degree of purity among the most various
savage and barbarian peoples, nor the traces of these institutions in
the ancient history of the civilized peoples of Asia. The institutions
or their traces are found everywhere. A few examples will be enough.
Before the gens had been recognized, the man who took the greatest pains
to misunderstand it, McLennan himself, proved its existence, and in the
main accurately described it, among the Kalmucks, Circassians, Samoyeds
and three Indian peoples: the Warali, Magars and Munniporees. Recently
it has been discovered and described by M. Kovalevsky among the Pshavs,
Shevsurs, Svanets and other Caucasian tribes. Here we will only give
some short notes on the occurrence of the gens among Celts and Germans.

The oldest Celtic laws which have been preserved show the gens still
fully alive: in Ireland, after being forcibly broken up by the English,
it still lives today in the consciousness of the people, as an instinct
at any rate; in Scotland it was still in full strength in the middle of
the eighteenth century, and here again it succumbed only to the weapons,
laws, and courts of the English.

The old Welsh laws, which were recorded in writing several centuries
before the English conquest, at the latest in the eleventh century,
still show common tillage of the soil by whole villages, even if only as
an exceptional relic of a once general custom; each family had five
acres for its own cultivation; a piece of land was cultivated
collectively as well and the yield shared. In view of the analogy of
Ireland and Scotland, it cannot be doubted that these village
communities represent gentes or subdivisions of gentes, even though
further examination of the Welsh laws, which I cannot undertake for lack
of time (my notes date from 1869), should not provide direct proof. But
what is directly proved by the Welsh sources and by the Irish is that
among the Celts in the eleventh century pairing marriage had not by any
means been displaced by monogamy.

In Wales a marriage only became indissoluble, or rather it only ceased
to be terminable by notification, after seven years had elapsed. If the
time was short of seven years by only three nights, husband and wife
could separate. They then shared out their property between them; the
woman divided and the man chose. The furniture was divided according to
fixed and very humorous rules. If it was the man who dissolved the
marriage, he had to give the woman back her dowry and some other things;
if it was the woman, she received less. Of the children the man took two
and the woman one, the middle child. If after the separation the woman
took another husband and the first husband came to fetch her back again,
she had to follow him even if she had already one foot in her new
marriage bed. If, on the other hand, the man and woman had been together
for seven years, they were husband and wife, even without any previous
formal marriage. Chastity of girls before marriage was not at all
strictly observed, nor was it demanded; the provisions in this respect
are of an extremely frivolous character and not at all in keeping with
bourgeois morality. If a woman committed adultery, the husband had the
right to beat her (this was one of the three occasions when he was
allowed to do so; otherwise he was punished), but not then to demand any
other satisfaction, since “for the one offense there shall be either
atonement or vengeance, but not both.” The grounds on which the wife
could demand divorce without losing any of her claims in the subsequent
settlement were very comprehensive; if the husband had bad breath, it
was enough. The money which had to be paid to the chief of the tribe or
king to buy off his right of the first night (gobr merch, whence the
medieval name, marcheta; French Marquette), plays a large part in the
code of laws. The women had the right to vote in the assemblies of the
people. When we add that the evidence shows similar conditions in
Ireland; that there, also, temporary marriages were quite usual and that
at the separation very favorable and exactly defined conditions were
assured to the woman, including even compensation for her domestic
services; that in Ireland there was a “first wife” as well as other
wives, and that in the division of an inheritance no distinction was
made between children born in wedlock or outside it -- we then have a
picture of pairing marriage in comparison with which the form of
marriage observed in North America appears strict. This is not
surprising in the eleventh century among a people who even so late as
Caesar’s time were still living in group marriage.

The existence of the Irish gens (sept; the tribe was called clann, clan)
is confirmed and described not only by the old legal codes, but also by
the English jurists of the seventeenth century who were sent over to
transform the clan lands into domains of the English crown. Until then,
the land had been the common property of the clan or gens, in so far as
the chieftains had not already converted it into their private domains.
When a member of the gens died and a household consequently came to an
end, the gentile chief (the English jurists called him _caput
cognationis_) made a new division of the whole territory among the
remaining households. This must have been done, broadly speaking,
according to the rules in force in Germany. Forty or fifty years ago
village fields were very numerous, and even today a few of these
rundales, as they are called, may still be found. The peasants of a
rundale, now individual tenants on the soil that had been the common
property of the gens till it was seized by the English conquerors, pay
rent for their respective piece of land, but put all their shares in
arable and meadowland together, which they then divide according to
position and quality into Gewanne, as they are called on the Moselle,
each receiving a share in each Gewann; moorland and pasture-land are
used in common. Only fifty years ago new divisions were still made from
time to time, sometimes annually. The field-map of such a village looks
exactly like that of a German Gehöferschaft [peasant community] on the
Moselle or in the Mittelwald. The gens also lives on in the “factions.”
The Irish peasants often divide themselves into parties based apparently
on perfectly absurd or meaningless distinctions; to the English they are
quite incomprehensible and seem to have no other purpose than the
favorite ceremony of two factions hammering one another. They are
artificial revivals, modern substitutes for the dispersed gentes,
manifesting in their own peculiar manner the persistence of the
inherited gentile instinct. In some districts the members of the gens
still live pretty much together on the old territory; in the ’thirties
the great majority of the inhabitants of County Monaghan still had only
four family names, that is, they were descended from four gentes or
clans. ^([1])

In Scotland the decay of the gentile organization dates from the
suppression of the rising of 1745. The precise function of the Scottish
clan in this organization still awaits investigation; but that the clan
is a gentile body is beyond doubt. In Walter Scott's novels the Highland
clan lives before our eyes. It is, says Morgan:

... an excellent type of the gens in organization and in spirit, and an
extraordinary illustration of the power of the gentile life over its
members.... We find in their feuds and blood revenge, in their
localization by gentes, in their use of lands in common, in the fidelity
of the clansman to his chief and of the members of the clan to each
other, the usual and persistent features of gentile society.... Descent
was in the male line, the children of the males remaining members of the
clan, while the children of its female members belonged to the clans of
their respective fathers."

[Morgan, op. cit., pp. 368-369. -- Ed.]

But that formerly mother-right prevailed in Scotland is proved by the
fact that, according to Bede, in the royal family of the Picts
succession was in the female line. Among the Scots, as among the Welsh,
a relic even of the punaluan family persisted into the Middle Ages in
the form of the right of the first night, which the head of the clan or
the king, as last representative of the former community of husbands,
had the right to exercise with every bride, unless it was compounded for
money.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

That the Germans were organized in gentes until the time of the
migrations is beyond all doubt. They can have occupied the territory
between the Danube, Rhine, Vistula, and the northern seas only a few
centuries before our era; the Cimbri and Teutons were then still in full
migration, and the Suevi did not find any permanent habitation until
Caesar's time. Caesar expressly states of them that they had settled in
gentes and kindreds (gentibus cognationtbusque), and in the mouth of a
Roman of the Julian gens the word _gentibus_ has a definite meaning
which cannot be argued away. The same was true of all the Germans; they
seem still to have settled by gentes even in the provinces they
conquered from the Romans. The code of laws of the Alemanni confirms
that the people settled by kindreds (_genealogiae_) in the conquered
territory south of the Danube; genealogia is used in exactly the same
sense as Markgenossenschaft or Dorfgenossenschaft [Mark or village
community – Ed.] later. Kovalevsky has recently put forward the view
that these genealogia- are the large household communities among which
the land was divided, and from which the village community only
developed later. This would then probably also apply to the fara, with
which expression the Burgundians and the Lombards – that is, a Gothic
and a Herminonian or High German tribe – designated nearly, if not
exactly, the same thing as the genealogiae in the Alemannian code of
laws. Whether it is really a gens or a household community must be
settled by further research.

The records of language leave us in doubt whether all the Germans had a
common expression for gens, and what that expression was.
Etymologically, the Gothic kuni, Middle High German kunne, corresponds
to the Greek genos and the Latin gens, and is used in the same sense.
The fact that the term for woman comes from the same root – Greek gyne,
Slav zena, Gothic qvino, Old Norse kona, kuna – points back to the time
of mother-right. Among the Lombards and Burgundians we find, as already
mentioned, the term fara, which Grimm derives from an imaginary root
fisan, to beget. I should prefer to go back to the more obvious
derivation from faran (fahren), to travel or wander; fara would then
denote a section of the migrating people which remained permanently
together and almost as a matter of course would be composed of
relatives. In the several centuries of migration, first to the east and
then to the west, the expression came to be transferred to the kinship
group itself. There are, further, the Gothic sibia, Anglo-Saxon sib, Old
High German sippia, sima, kindred. Old Norse only has the plural sifiar,
relatives; the singular only occurs as the name of a goddess, Sif.
Lastly, still another expression occurs in the Hildebrandslied, where
Hildebrand asks Hadubrand: “Who is thy father among the men of the
people... or of what kin art thou?“ (eddo huêlihhes cnuosles du sîs). In
as far as there was a common German name for the gens, it was probably
the Gothic huni that was used; this is rendered probable, not only by
its identity with the corresponding expression in the related languages,
but also by the fact that from it is derived the word kuning, König
(king), which originally denotes the head of a gens or of a tribe.
Sibia, kindred, does not seem to call for consideration; at any rate,
sifiar in Old Norse denotes not only blood relations, but also relations
by marriage; thus it includes the members of at least two gentes, and
hence sif itself cannot have been the term for the gens.

As among the Mexicans and Greeks, so also among the Germans, the order
of battle, both the cavalry squadrons and the wedge formations of the
infantry, was drawn up by gentes. Tacitus’ use of the vague expression
“by families and kindreds” is to be explained through the fact that in
his time the gens in Rome had long ceased to be a living body.

A further passage in Tacitus is decisive. It states that the maternal
uncle looks upon his nephew as his own son, and that some even regard
the bond of blood between the maternal uncle and the nephew as more
sacred and close than that between father and son, so that when hostages
are demanded the sister's son is considered a better security than the
natural son of the man whom it is desired to bind. Here we have living
evidence, described as particularly characteristic of the Germans, of
the matriarchal, and therefore primitive, gens. ^([2]) If a member of
such a gens gave his own son as a pledge of his oath and the son then
paid the penalty of death for his father's breach of faith, the father
had to answer for that to himself. But if it was a sister's son who was
sacrificed, then the most sacred law of the gens was violated. The
member of the gens who was nearest of kin to the boy or youth, and more
than all others was bound to protect him, was guilty of his death;
either he should not have pledged him or he should have kept the
agreement. Even if we had no other trace of gentile organization among
the Germans, this one passage would suffice.

Still more decisive, because it comes about eight hundred years later,
is a passage from the Old Norse poem of the twilight of the gods and the
end of the world, the Voluspa. In this "vision of the seeress," into
which Christian elements are also interwoven, as Bang and Bugge have now
proved, the description of the period of universal degeneration and
corruption leading up to the great catastrophe contains the following
passage:

Broedhr munu berjask ok at bonum verdask,
munu systrungar sifjum spilla.

“Brothers will make war upon one another and become one another’s
murderers, the children of sisters will break kinship.” _Systrungar_
means the son of the mother’s sister, and that these sisters’ sons
should betray the blood-bond between them is regarded by the poet as an
even greater crime than that of fratricide. The force of the climax is
in the word systrungar, which emphasizes the kinship on the mother“s
side; if the word had been syskina-born, brothers' or sisters' children,
or syskinasynir, brothers' or sisters' sons, the second line would not
have been a climax to the first, but would merely have weakened the
effect. Hence even in the time of the Vikings, when the Voluspa was
composed, the memory of mother-right had not yet been obliterated in
Scandinavia.

In the time of Tacitus, however, mother-right had already given way to
father-right, at least among the Germans with whose customs he was more
familiar. The children inherited from the father; if there were no
children, the brothers, and the uncles on the father's and the mother's
side. The fact that the mother’s brother was allowed to inherit is
connected with the survivals of mother-right already mentioned, and
again proves how new father-right still was among the Germans at that
time. Traces of mother-right are also found until late in the Middle
Ages. Apparently even at that time people still did not have any great
trust in fatherhood, especially in the case of serfs. When, therefore, a
feudal lord demanded from a town the return of a fugitive serf, it was
required – for example, in Augsburg, Basle and Kaiserslautern – that the
accused person's status as serf should be sworn to by six of his nearest
blood relations, and that they should all be relations on the mother’s
side. (Maurer, _Städteverfassung_, I, p. 381.)

Another relic of mother-right, which was still only in process of dying
out, was the respect of the Germans for the female sex, which to the
Romans was almost incomprehensible. Young girls of noble family were
considered the most binding hostages in treaties with the Germans. The
thought that their wives and daughters might be taken captive and
carried into slavery was terrible to them and more than anything else
fired their courage in battle; they saw in a woman something holy and
prophetic, and listened to her advice even in the most important
matters. Veleda, the priestess of the Bructerians on the River Lippe,
was the very soul of the whole Batavian rising in which Civilis, at the
head of the Germans and Belgae, shook the foundations of Roman rule in
Gaul. In the home, the woman seems to have held undisputed sway, though,
together with the old people and the children, she also had to do all
the work, while the man hunted, drank, or idled about. That, at least,
is what Tacitus says; but as he does not say who tilled the fields, and
definitely declares that the serfs only paid tribute, but did not have
to render labor dues, the bulk of the adult men must have had to do what
little work the cultivation of the land required. The form of marriage,
as already said, was a pairing marriage which was gradually approaching
monogamy. It was not yet strict monogamy, as polygamy was permitted for
the leading members of the tribe. In general, strict chastity was
required of the girls (in contrast to the Celts), and Tacitus also
speaks with special warmth of the sacredness of the marriage tie among
the Germans. Adultery by the woman is the only ground for divorce
mentioned by him. But there are many gaps here in his report, and it is
also only too apparent that he is holding up a mirror of virtue before
the dissipated Romans. One thing is certain: if the Germans were such
paragons of virtue in their forests, it only required slight contact
with the outside world to bring them down to the level of the average
man in the rest of Europe. Amidst the Roman world, the last trace of
moral austerity disappeared far more rapidly even than the German
language. For proof, it is enough to read Gregory of Tours. That in the
German primeval forests there could be no such voluptuous abandonment to
all the refinements of sensuality as in Rome is obvious; the superiority
of the Germans to the Roman world in this respect also is sufficiently
great, and there is no need to endow them with an ideal continence in
things of the flesh, such as has never yet been practiced by an entire
nation.

Also derived from the gentile organization is the obligation to inherit
the enmities as well as the friendships of the father or the relatives;
likewise the _Wergeld_, the fine for idling or injuring, in place of
blood revenge. The Wergeld, which only a generation ago was regarded as
a specifically German institution, has now been shown to be general
among hundreds of peoples as a milder form of the blood revenge
originating out of the gentile organization. We find it, for example,
among the American Indians, who also regard hospitality as an
obligation. Tacitus’ description of hospitality as practiced among the
Germans (Germania, Ch. XXI) is identical almost to the details with that
given by Morgan of his Indians.

The endless, burning controversy as to whether the Germans of Tacitus’
time had already definitely divided the land or not, and how the
relevant passages are to be interpreted, now belongs to the past. No
more words need be wasted in this dispute, since it has been established
that among almost all peoples the cultivated land was tilled
collectively by the gens, and later by communistic household communities
such as were still found by Caesar among the Suevi, and that after this
stage the land was allotted to individual families with periodical
repartitions, which are shown to have survived as a local custom in
Germany down to our day. If in the one hundred and fifty years between
Caesar and Tacitus the Germans had changed from the collective
cultivation of the land expressly attributed by Caesar to the Suevi
(they had no divided or private fields whatever, he says) to individual
cultivation with annual repartition of the land, that is surely progress
enough. The transition from that stage to complete private property in
land during such a short period and without any outside interference is
a sheer impossibility. What I read in Tacitus is simply what he says in
his own dry words: they change (or divide afresh) the cultivated land
every year, and there is enough common land left over. It is the stage
of agriculture and property relations in regard to the land which
exactly corresponds to the gentile constitution of the Germans at that
time.

I leave the preceding paragraph unchanged as it stood in the former
editions. Meanwhile the question has taken another turn. Since
Kovalevsky has shown (cf. pages 51-52) that the patriarchal household
community was a very common, if not universal, intermediate form between
the matriarchal communistic family and the modern isolated family, it is
no longer a question of whether property in land is communal or private,
which was the point at issue between Maurer and Waitz, but a question of
the form of the communal property. There is no doubt at all that the
Suevi in Caesar's time not only owned the land in common, but also
cultivated it in common for the common benefit. Whether the economic
unit was the gens or the household community or a communistic kinship
group intermediate between the two; or whether all three groups occurred
according to the conditions of the soil – these questions will be in
dispute for a long time to come. Kovalevsky maintains, however, that the
conditions described by Tacitus presuppose the existence, not of the
mark or village community, but of the household community and that the
village community only develops out of the latter much later, as a
result of the increase in population.

According to this view, the settlements of the Germans in the territory
of which they were already in possession at the time of the Romans, and
also in the territory which they later took from the Romans, were not
composed of villages but of large household communities, which included
several generations, cultivated an amount of land proportionate to the
number of their members, and had common use with their neighbors of the
surrounding waste. The passage in Tacitus about changing the cultivated
land would then have to be taken in an agronomic sense: the community
cultivated a different piece of land every year, and allowed the land
cultivated the previous year to lie fallow or run completely to waste;
the population being scanty, there was always enough waste left over to
make any disputes about land unnecessary. Only in the course of
centuries, when the number of members in the household communities had
increased so much that a common economy was no longer possible under the
existing conditions of production did the communities dissolve. The
arable and meadow lands which had hitherto been common were divided in
the manner familiar to us, first temporarily and then permanently, among
the single households which were now coming into being, while forest,
pasture land, and water remained common.

In the case of Russia this development seems to be a proved historical
fact. With regard to Germany, and, secondarily, the other Germanic
countries, it cannot be denied that in many ways this view provides a
better explanation of the sources and an easier solution to difficulties
than that held hitherto, which takes the village community back to the
time of Tacitus. On the whole, the oldest documents, such as the Codex
Laureshamensis, can be explained much better in terms of the household
community than of the village community. On the other hand, this view
raises new difficulties and new questions, which have still to be
solved. They can only be settled by new investigations; but I cannot
deny that in the case also of Germany, Scandinavia and England there is
very great probability in favor of the intermediate form of the
household community.

While in Caesar’s time the Germans had only just taken up or were still
looking for settled abodes, in Tacitus’ time they already had a full
century of settled life behind them; correspondingly, the progress in
the production of the necessities of life is unmistakable. They live in
log-houses; their clothing is still very much that of primitive people
of the forests: coarse woolen mantles, skins; for women and notable
people underclothing of linen. Their food is milk, meat, wild fruits,
and, as Pliny adds, oatmeal porridge (still the Celtic national food in
Ireland and Scotland). Their wealth consists in cattle and horses, but
of inferior breed; the cows are small, poor in build and without horns;
the horses are ponies, with very little speed. Money was used rarely and
in small amounts; it was exclusively Roman. They did not work gold or
silver, nor did they value it. Iron was rare, and, at least, among the
tribes on the Rhine and the Danube, seems to have been almost entirely
imported, not mined. Runic writing (imitated from the Greek or Latin
letters) was a purely secret form of writing, used only for religious
magic. Human sacrifices were still offered. In short, we here see a
people which had just raised itself from the middle to the upper stage
of barbarism. But whereas the tribes living immediately on the Roman
frontiers were hindered in the development of an independent metal and
textile industry by the facility with which Roman products could be
imported, such industry undoubtedly did develop in the northeast, on the
Baltic. The fragments of weapons found in the Schleswig marshes – long
iron sword, coat of mail, silver helmet, and so forth, together with
Roman coins of the end of the second century – and the German metal
objects distributed by the migrations, show quite a pronounced character
of their own, even when they derive from an originally Roman model.
Emigration into the civilized Roman world put an end to this native
industry everywhere except in England. With what uniformity this
industry arose and developed, can be seen, for example, in the bronze
brooches; those found in Burgundy, Rumania and on the Sea of Azov might
have come out of the same workshop as those found in England and Sweden,
and are just as certainly of Germanic origin.

The constitution also corresponds to the upper stage of barbarism.
According to Tacitus, there was generally a council of chiefs
(_principes_), which decided minor matters, but prepared more important
questions for decision by the assembly of the people; at the lower stage
of barbarism, so far as we have knowledge of it, as among the Americans,
this assembly of the people still comprises only the members of the
gens, not yet of the tribe or of the confederacy of tribes. The chiefs
(_principes_) are still sharply distinguished from the military leaders
(_duces_) just as they are among the Iroquois; they already subsist
partially on gifts of cattle, corn, etc., from the members of the tribe;
as in America, they are generally elected from the same family. The
transition to father-right favored, as in Greece and Rome, the gradual
transformation of election into hereditary succession, and hence the
rise of a noble family in each gens. This old so-called tribal nobility
disappeared for the most part during the migrations or soon afterwards.
The military leaders were chosen without regard to their descent, solely
according to their ability. They had little power and had to rely on the
force of example. Tacitus expressly states that the actual disciplinary
authority in the army lay with the priests. The real power was in the
hands of the assembly of the people. The king or the chief of the tribe
presides; the people decide: “No” by murmurs; “Yes” by acclamation and
clash of weapons. The assembly of the people is at the same time an
assembly of justice; here complaints are brought forward and decided and
sentences of death passed, the only capital crimes being cowardice,
treason against the people, and unnatural lust. Also in the gentes and
other subdivisions of the tribe all the members sit in judgment under
the presidency of the chief, who, as in all the early German courts, can
only have guided the proceedings and put questions; the actual verdict
was always given among Germans everywhere by the whole community.

Confederacies of tribes had grown up since the time of Caesar; some of
them already had kings; the supreme military commander was already
aiming at the position of tyrant, as among the Greeks and Romans, and
sometimes secured it. But these fortunate usurpers were not by any means
absolute rulers; they were, however, already beginning to break the
fetters of the gentile constitution. Whereas freed slaves usually
occupied a subordinate position, since they could not belong to any
gens, as favorites of the new kings they often won rank, riches and
honors. The same thing happened after the conquest of the Roman Empire
by these military leaders, who now became kings of great countries.
Among the Franks, slaves and freedmen of the king played a leading part
first at the court and then in the state; the new nobility was to a
great extent descended from them.

One institution particularly favored the rise of kingship: the retinues.
We have already seen among the American Indians how, side by side with
the gentile constitution, private associations were formed to carry on
wars independently. Among the Germans, these private associations had
already become permanent. A military leader who had made himself a name
gathered around him a band of young men eager for booty, whom he pledged
to personal loyalty, giving the same pledge to them. The leader provided
their keep, gave them gifts, and organized them on a hierarchic basis; a
bodyguard and a standing troop for smaller expeditions and a regular
corps of officers for operations on a larger scale. Weak as these
retinues must have been, and as we in fact find them to be later – for
example, under Odoacer in Italy – they were nevertheless the beginnings
of the decay of the old freedom of the people and showed themselves to
be such during and after the migrations. For in the first place they
favored the rise of monarchic power. In the second place, as Tacitus
already notes, they could only be kept together by continual wars and
plundering expeditions. Plunder became an end in itself. If the leader
of the retinue found nothing to do in the neighborhood, he set out with
his men to other peoples where there was war and the prospect of booty.
The German mercenaries who fought in great numbers under the Roman
standard even against Germans were partly mobilized through these
retinues. They already represent the first form of the system of
Landsknechte, the shame and curse of the Germans. When the Roman Empire
had been conquered, these retinues of the kings formed the second main
stock, after the unfree and the Roman courtiers, from which the later
nobility was drawn.

In general, then, the constitution of those German tribes which had
combined into peoples was the same as had developed among the Greeks of
the Heroic Age and the Romans of the so-called time of the kings:
assembly of the people, council of the chiefs of the gentes, military
leader, who is already striving for real monarchic power. It was the
highest form of constitution which the gentile order could achieve; it
was the model constitution of the upper stage of barbarism. If society
passed beyond the limits within which this constitution was adequate,
that meant the end of the gentile order; it was broken up and the state
took its place.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Footnotes

 

[1] During a few days spent in Ireland, I realized afresh to what an
extent the country people still live in the conceptions of the gentile
period. The landed proprietor, whose tenant the farmer is, is still
regarded by the latter as a kind of chief of the clan, whose duty it is
to manage the land in the interests of all, while the farmer pays
tribute in the form of rent, but has a claim upon him for assistance in
times of necessity. Similarly, everyone who is well off is considered
under an obligation to assist his poorer neighbors when they fall on
hard times. Such help is not charity; it is what the poorer member of
the clan is entitled to receive from the wealthier member or the chief.
One can understand the complaints of the political economists and
jurists about the impossibility of making the Irish peasant grasp the
idea of modern bourgeois property; the Irishman simply cannot get it
into his head that there can be property with rights but no duties. But
one can also understand that when Irishmen with these naive gentile
conceptions suddenly find themselves in one of the big English or
American towns among a population with completely different ideas of
morality and justice, they easily become completely confused about both
morality and justice and lose all their bearings, with the result that
masses of them become demoralized. (Note to the Fourth Edition.)

 

[2] The peculiar closeness of the bond between maternal uncle and
nephew, which derives from the time of mother-right and is found among
many peoples, is only recognized by the Greeks in their mythology of the
heroic age. According to Diodorus, IV, 34, Meleager slays the sons of
Thestius, the brothers of his mother Althma. She regards this deed as
such an inexpiable crime that she curses the murderer, her own son, and
prays for his death. “The gods heard her wishes,” the story says, “and
put an end to Meleager’s life.” Also according to Diodorus (IV, 44), the
Argonauts land in Thrace under Heracles and there find that Phincus, at
the instigation of his new wife, is shamefully ill-treating the two sons
born to him by his former wife, the Boread Cleopatra, whom he has put
away. But among the Argonauts there are also Boreads, brothers of
Cleopatra, therefore maternal uncles of the maltreated boys. They at
once take up their nephews’ cause, free them, and kill their guards.

 

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

VIII. The Formation of the State among Germans

------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

According to Tacitus, the Germans were a very numerous people. Caesar
gives us an approximate idea of the strength of the separate German
peoples; he places the number of the Usipetans and the Tencterans who
appeared on the left bank of the Rhine at 180,000, women and children
included. That is about 100,000 to one people, ^([1]) already
considerably more than, for instance, the total number of the Iroquois
in their prime, when, no more than 20,000 strong, they were the terror
of the whole country from the Great Lakes to the Ohio and the Potomac.
On the map, if we try to group the better known peoples settled near the
Rhine according to the evidence of the reports, a single people occupies
the space of a Prussian government district that is, about 10,000 square
kilometers or 182 geographical square miles. [About 4,000 square miles –
Ed.] Now, the Germania Magna of the Romans, which reached as far as the
Vistula, had an area of 500,000 square kilometers in round figures.
Reckoning the average number of each people at 100,000, the total
population of Germania Magna would work out at 5,000,000 - a
considerable figure for a barbarian group of peoples, but, compared with
our conditions ten persons to the square kilometer, or about 550 to the
geographical square mile - extremely low. But that by no means exhausts
the number of the Germans then living. We know that all along the
Carpathians and down to the south of the Danube there were German
peoples descended from Gothic tribes, such as the Bastarnians,
Peucinians and others, who were so numerous that Pliny classes them
together as the fifth main tribe of the Germans. As early as 180 B.C.
they make their appearance as mercenaries in the service of the
Macedonian King Perseus, and in the first years of Augustus, still
advancing, they almost reached Adrianople. If we estimate these at only
1,000,000, the probable total number of the Germans at the beginning of
our era must have been at least 6,000,000.

After permanent settlements had been founded in Germany, the population
must have grown with increasing rapidity; the advances in industry we
mentioned are in themselves proof of this. The objects found in the
Schleswig marshes date from the third century, according to the Roman
coins discovered with them. At this time, therefore, there was already a
developed metal and textile industry on the Baltic, brisk traffic with
the Roman Empire and a certain degree of luxury among the more wealthy –
all signs of denser population. But also at this time begins the general
attack by the Germans along the whole line of the Rhine, the Roman wall
and the Danube, from the North Sea to the Black Sea – direct proof of
the continual growth and outward thrust of the population. For three
centuries the fight went on, during which the whole main body of the
Gothic peoples (with the exception of the Scandinavian Goths and the
Burgundians) thrust south-east, forming the left wing on the long front
of attack, while in the center the High Germans (Hermionians) pushed
forward down the upper Danube, and on the right wing the Ischovonians,
now called Franks, advanced along the Rhine; the Ingoevonians carried
out the conquest of Britain. By the end of the fifth century an
exhausted and bleeding Roman Empire lay helpless before the invading
Germans.

In earlier chapters we were standing at the cradle of ancient Greek and
Roman civilization. Now we stand at its grave. Rome had driven the
leveling plane of its world rule over all the countries of the
Mediterranean basin, and that for centuries. Except when Greek offered
resistance, all natural languages had been forced to yield to a debased
Latin; there were no more national differences, no more Gauls, Iberians,
Ligurians, Noricans; all had become Romans. Roman administration and
Roman law had everywhere broken up the old kinship groups, and with them
the last vestige of local and national independence. The half-baked
culture of Rome provided no substitute; it expressed no nationality,
only the lack of nationality. The elements of new nations were present
everywhere; the Latin dialects of the various provinces were becoming
increasingly differentiated; the natural boundaries which once had made
Italy, Gaul, Spain, Africa independent territories, were still there and
still made themselves felt. But the strength was not there to fuse these
elements into new nations; there was no longer a sign anywhere of
capacity for development, or power of resistance, to say nothing of
creative energy. The enormous mass of humanity in the whole enormous
territory was held together by one bond only: the Roman state; and the
Roman state had become in the course of time their worst enemy and
oppressor. The provinces had annihilated Rome; Rome itself had become a
provincial town like the rest – privileged, but no longer the ruler, no
longer the hub of the world empire, not even the seat of the emperors or
sub-emperors, who now lived in Constantinople, Treves, Milan. The Roman
state had become a huge, complicated machine, exclusively for bleeding
its subjects, Taxes, state imposts and tributes of every kind pressed
the mass of the people always deeper into poverty; the pressure was
intensified until the exactions of governors, tax-collectors, and armies
made it unbearable. That was what the Roman state had achieved with its
world rule. It gave as the justification of its existence that it
maintained order within the empire and protected it against the
barbarians without. But its order was worse than the worst disorder, and
the citizens whom it claimed to protect against the barbarians longed
for the barbarians to deliver them.

Social conditions were no less desperate. Already in the last years of
the republic the policy of Roman rule had been ruthlessly to exploit the
provinces; the empire, far from abolishing this exploitation, had
organized it. The more the empire declined, the higher rose the taxes
and levies, the more shamelessly the officials robbed and extorted. The
Romans had always been too occupied in ruling other nations to become
proficient in trade and industry; it was only as usurers that they beat
all who came before or after. What commerce had already existed and
still survived was now ruined by official extortion; it struggled on
only in the eastern, Greek part of the empire, which lies outside the
present study. General impoverishment; decline of commerce, handicrafts
and art; fall in the population; decay of the towns; relapse of
agriculture to a lower level-such was the final result of Roman world
rule.

Agriculture, always the decisive branch of production throughout the
ancient world, was now more so than ever. In Italy, the enormous estates
(latifundia) which, since the end of the republic, occupied almost the
whole country, had been exploited in two different ways. They had been
used either as pastures, the population being displaced by sheep and
cattle, which could be tended by a few slaves, or as country estates
(villae), where large-scale horticulture was carried on with masses of
slaves, partly as a luxury for the owner, partly for sale in the town
markets. The great grazing farms had kept going and had probably even
extended; the country estates and their gardens had been ruined through
the impoverishment of their owners and the decay of the towns. The
system of latifundia run by slave labor no longer paid; but at that time
no other form of large-scale agriculture was possible. Small production
had again become the only profitable form. One country estate after
another was cut up into small lots, which were handed over either to
tenants, who paid a fixed sum and had hereditary rights, or to
partiarii_, stewards rather than tenants, who received a sixth or even
only a ninth of the year's product in return for their labor. For the
most part, however, these small lots of land were given out to coloni,
who paid for them a definite yearly amount, were tied to the soil and
could be sold together with their lot. True, they were not slaves, but
neither were they free; they could not marry free persons, and their
marriages with one another were not regarded as full marriages, but,
like those of slaves, as mere concubinage (contubernium). They were the
forerunners of the medieval serfs.

The slavery of classical times had outlived itself. Whether employed on
the land in large-scale agriculture or in manufacture in the towns, it
no longer yielded any satisfactory return – the market for its products
was no longer there. But the small-scale agriculture and the small
handicraft production to which the enormous production of the empire in
its prosperous days was now shrunk had no room for numbers of slaves.
Only for the domestic and luxury slaves of the wealthy was there still a
place in society. But though it was dying out, slavery was still common
enough to make all productive labor appear to be work for slaves,
unworthy of free Romans – and everybody was a free Roman now. Hence, on
the one side, increasing manumissions of the superfluous slaves who were
now a burden; on the other hand, a growth in some parts in the numbers
of the coloni, and in other parts of the declassed freemen (like the
“poor whites” in the ex-slave states of America). Christianity is
completely innocent of the gradual dying out of ancient slavery; it was
itself actively involved in the system for centuries under the Roman
Empire, and never interfered later with slave-trading by Christians: not
with the Germans in the north, or with the Venetians in the
Mediterranean, or with the later trade in Negroes. ^([2]) Slavery no
longer paid; it was for that reason it died out. But in dying it left
behind its poisoned sting – the stigma attaching to the productive labor
of freemen. This was the blind alley from which the Roman world had no
way out: slavery was economically impossible, the labor of freemen was
morally ostracized. The one could be the basic form of social production
no longer; the other, not yet. Nothing could help here except a complete
revolution.

Things were no better in the provinces. We have most material about
Gaul. Here there was still a free small peasantry in addition to
coloni;. In order to be secured against oppression by officials, judges,
and usurers, these peasants often placed themselves under the
protection, the patronage, of a powerful person; and it was not only
individuals who did so, but whole communities, so that in the fourth
century the emperors frequently prohibited the practice. But what help
was this protection to those who sought it? Their patron made it a
condition that they should transfer to him the rights of ownership in
their pieces of land, in return for which he guaranteed them the use of
the land for their lifetime – a trick which the Holy Church took note of
and in the ninth and tenth centuries lustily imitated, to the increase
of God’s glory and its own lands. At this time, it is true, about the
year 475, Bishop Salvianus of Marseilles still inveighs indignantly
against such theft. He relates that oppression by Roman officials and
great landlords had become so heavy that many “Romans” fled into
districts already occupied by the barbarians, and that the Roman
citizens settled there feared nothing so much as a return to Roman rule.
That parents owing to their poverty often sold their children into
slavery at this time is proved by a decree prohibiting the practice.

In return for liberating the Romans from their own state, the German
barbarians took from them two-thirds of all the land and divided it
among themselves. The division was made according to the gentile
constitution. The conquerors being relatively few in number, large
tracts of land were left undivided, as the property partly of the whole
people, partly of the individual tribes and gentes. Within each gens the
arable and meadow land was distributed by lot in equal portions among
the individual households. We do not know whether reallotments of the
land were repeatedly carried out at this time, but in any event they
were soon discontinued in the Roman provinces and the individual lots
became alienable private property, _allodium_. Woods and pastures
remained undivided for common use; the provisions regulating their
common use, and the manner in which the divided land was to be
cultivated, were settled in accordance with ancient custom and by the
decision of the whole community. The longer the gens remained settled in
its village and the more the Germans and the Romans gradually merged,
the more the bond of union lost its character of kinship and became
territorial. The gens was lost in the mark community, in which, however,
traces of its origin in the kinship of its members are often enough
still visible. Thus, at least in those countries where the mark
community maintained itself - northern France, England, Germany and
Scandinavia - the gentile constitution changed imperceptibly into a
local constitution and thus became capable of incorporation into the
state. But it nevertheless retained that primitive democratic character
which distinguishes the whole gentile constitution, and thus even in its
later enforced degeneration and up to the most recent times it kept
something of the gentile constitution alive, to be a weapon in the hands
of the oppressed.

This weakening of the bond of blood in the gens followed from the
degeneration of the organs of kinship also in the tribe and in the
entire people as a result of their conquests. As we know, rule over
subjugated peoples is incompatible with the gentile constitution. Here
we can see this on a large scale. The German peoples, now masters of the
Roman provinces, had to organize what they had conquered. But they could
neither absorb the mass of Romans into the gentile bodies nor govern
them through these bodies. At the head of the Roman local governing
bodies, many of which continued for the time being to function, had to
be placed a substitute for the Roman state, and this substitute could
only be another state. The organs of the gentile constitution had to be
transformed into state organs, and that very idly, for the situation was
urgent. But the immediate representative of the conquering people was
their military leader. To secure the conquered territory against attack
from within and without, it was necessary to strengthen his power. The
moment had come to transform the military leadership into kinship: the
transformation was made.

Let us take the country of the Franks. Here the victorious Salian people
had come into complete possession, not only of the extensive Roman state
domains, but also of the very large tracts of land which had not been
distributed among the larger and smaller district and mark communities,
in particular all the larger forest areas. On his transformation from a
plain military chief into the real sovereign of a country, the first
thing which the king of the Franks did was to transform this property of
the people into crown lands, to steal it from the people and to give it,
outright or in fief, to his retainers. This retinue, which originally
consisted of his personal following of warriors and of the other lesser
military leaders, was presently increased not only by Romans – Romanized
Gauls, whose education, knowledge of writing, familiarity with the
spoken Romance language of the country and the written Latin language,
as well as with the country's laws, soon made them indispensable to him,
but also by slaves, serfs and freedmen, who composed his court and from
whom he chose his favorites. All these received their portions of the
people's land, at first generally in the form of gifts, later of
benefices, usually conferred, to begin with, for the king's lifetime.
Thus, at the expense of the people the foundation of a new nobility was
laid.

And that was not all. The wide extent of the kingdom could not be
governed with the means provided by the old gentile constitution; the
council of chiefs, even if it had not long since become obsolete, would
have been unable to meet, and it was soon displaced by the permanent
retinue of the king; the old assembly of the people continued to exist
in name, but it also increasingly became a mere assembly of military
leaders subordinate to the king, and of the new rising nobility. By the
incessant civil wars and wars of conquest (the latter were particularly
frequent under Charlemagne), the free land-owning peasants, the mass of
the Frankish people, were reduced to the same state of exhaustion and
penury as the Roman peasants in the last years of the Republic. Though
they had originally constituted the whole army and still remained its
backbone after the conquest of France, by the beginning of the ninth
century they were so impoverished that hardly one man in five could go
to the wars. The army of free peasants raised directly by the king was
replaced by an army composed of the serving-men of the new nobles,
including bondsmen, descendants of men who in earlier times had known no
master save the king and still earlier no master at all, not even a
king. The internal wars under Charlemagne's successors, the weakness of
the authority of the crown, and the corresponding excesses of the nobles
(including the counts instituted by Charlemagne, who were now striving
to make their office hereditary), had already brought ruin on the
Frankish peasantry, and the ruin was finally completed by the invasions
of the Norsemen. Fifty years after the death of Charlemagne, the Empire
of the Franks lay as defenseless at the feet of the Norsemen as the
Roman Empire, four hundred years earlier, had lain at the feet of the
Franks.

Not only was there the same impotence against enemies from without, but
there was almost the same social order or rather disorder within. The
free Frankish peasants were in a plight similar to their predecessors,
the Roman coloni. Plundered, and ruined by wars, they had been forced to
put themselves under the protection of the new nobles or of the Church,
the crown being too weak to protect them. But they had to pay dearly for
it. Like the Gallic peasants earlier, they had to transfer their rights
of property in land to their protecting lord and received the land back
from him in tenancies of various and changing forms, but always only in
return for services and dues. Once in this position of dependence, they
gradually lost their personal freedom also; after a few generations most
of them were already serfs. How rapid was the disappearance of the free
peasantry is shown by Irminon’s records of the monastic possessions of
the Abbey of Saint Germain des Prés, at that time near, now in, Paris.
On the huge holdings of this Abbey, which were scattered in the
surrounding country, there lived in Charlemagne’s time 2,788 households,
whose members were almost without exception Franks with German names.
They included 2,080 coloni, 35 lites [semi-free peasants – Ed.], 220
slaves, and only eight freehold tenants! The godless practice, as
Salvianus had called it, by which the protecting lord had the peasant’s
land transferred to himself as his own property, and only gave it back
to the peasant for use during life, was now commonly employed by the
Church against the peasants. The forced services now imposed with
increasing frequency had had their prototype as much in the Roman
angariae, compulsory labor for the state, as in the services provided by
members of the German marks for bridge and road-making and other common
purposes. To all appearances, therefore, after four hundred years, the
mass of the people were back again where they had started.

But that only proved two things: first, that the social stratification
and the distribution of property in the declining Roman Empire
completely correspond to the level of agricultural and industrial
production at that time, and had therefore been inevitable; secondly,
that this level of production had neither risen nor fallen significantly
during the following four centuries and had therefore with equal
necessity again produced the same distribution of property and the same
classes in the population. In the last centuries of the Roman Empire the
town had lost its former supremacy over the country, and in the first
centuries of German rule it had not regained it. This implies a low
level of development both in agriculture and industry. This general
situation necessarily produces big ruling landowners and a dependent
small peasantry. How impossible it was to graft onto such a society
either the Roman system of latifundia worked by slave-labor or the newer
large-scale agriculture worked by forced services is proved by
Charlemagne's experiments with the famous imperial country estates
(villae). These experiments were gigantic in scope, but they left
scarcely a trace. They were continued only by the monasteries, and only
for them were they fruitful. But the monasteries were abnormal social
bodies, founded on celibacy; they could produce exceptional results, but
for that very reason necessarily continued to be exceptional themselves.

And yet progress was made during these four hundred years. Though at the
end we find almost the same main classes as at the beginning, the human
beings who formed these classes were different. Ancient slavery had
gone, and so had the pauper freemen who despised work as only fit for
slaves. Between the Roman colonus and the new bondsman had stood the
free Frankish peasant. The “useless memories and aimless strife” of
decadent Roman culture were dead and buried. The social classes of the
ninth century had been formed, not in the rottenness of a decaying
civilization, but in the birth-pangs of a new civilization. Compared
with their Roman predecessors, the new breed, whether masters or
servants, was a breed of men. The relation of powerful landowners and
subject peasants which had meant for the ancient world the final ruin,
from which there was no escape, was for them the starting-point of a new
development. And, further, however unproductive these four centuries
appear, one great product they did leave: the modern nationalities, the
new forms and structures through which west European humanity was to
make coming history. The Germans had, in fact, given Europe new life,
and therefore the break-up of the states in the Germanic period ended,
not in subjugation by the Norsemen and Saracens, but in the further
development of the system of benefices and protection into feudalism,
and in such an enormous increase of the population that scarcely two
centuries later the severe blood-letting of the Crusades was borne
without injury.

But what was the mysterious magic by which the Germans breathed new life
into a dying Europe? Was it some miraculous power innate in the Germanic
race, such as our chauvinist historians romance about? Not a bit of it.
The Germans, especially at that time, were a highly gifted Aryan tribe,
and in the full vigor of development. It was not, however, their
specific national qualities which rejuvenated Europe, but simply – their
barbarism, their gentile constitution.

Their individual ability and courage, their sense of freedom, their
democratic instinct which in everything of public concern felt itself
concerned; in a word, all the qualities which had been lost to the
Romans and were alone capable of forming new states and making new
nationalities grow out of the slime of the Roman world-what else were
they than the characteristics of the barbarian of the upper stage,
fruits of his gentile constitution?

If they recast the ancient form of monogamy, moderated the supremacy of
the man in the family, and gave the woman a higher position than the
classical world had ever known, what made them capable of doing so if
not their barbarism, their gentile customs, their living heritage from
the time of mother-right?

If in at least three of the most important countries, Germany, northern
France and England, they carried over into the feudal state a genuine
piece of gentile constitution, in the form of mark communities, thus
giving the oppressed class, the peasants, even under the harshest
medieval serfdom, a local center of solidarity and a means of resistance
such as neither the slaves of classical times nor the modern proletariat
found ready to their hand - to what was this due, if not to their
barbarism, their purely barbarian method of settlement in kinship
groups?

Lastly: they were able to develop and make universal the milder form of
servitude they had practiced in their own country, which even in the
Roman Empire increasingly displaced slavery; a form of servitude which,
as Fourier first stressed, gives to the bondsmen the means of their
gradual liberation as a class (“fournit aux cultivateurs des moyens
d'affranchissement collectif et Progressif”); a form of servitude which
thus stands high above slavery, where the only possibility is the
immediate release, without any transitional stage, of individual slaves
(abolition of slavery by successful rebellion is unknown to antiquity),
whereas the medieval serfs gradually won their liberation as a class.
And to what do we owe this if not to their barbarism, thanks to which
they had not yet reached the stage of fully developed slavery, neither
the labor slavery of the classical world nor the domestic slavery of the
Orient?

All the vigorous and creative life which the Germans infused into the
Roman world was barbarism. Only barbarians are able to rejuvenate a
world in the throes of collapsing civilization. And precisely the
highest stage of barbarism, to which and in which the Germans worked
their way upwards before the migrations, was the most favorable for this
process. That explains everything.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

Footnotes

 

[1] The number assumed here is confirmed by a statement of Diodorus
about the Celts of Gaul: “In Gaul dwell many peoples of varying
strength. Among those that are greatest the number is about 200,000,
among the smallest, 50,000” (Diodorus Siculus, V, 75). On an average,
therefore, 125,000; it can undoubtedly be assumed that, owing to their
higher stage of development, the single peoples among the Gauls were
rather larger than among the Germans.

 

[2] According to Bishop Liutprand of Cremona, in the tenth century the
chief industry of Verdun – in the Holy German Empire, observe – was the
manufacture of eunuchs, who were exported at great profit to Spain for
the Moorish harems.

 

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

IX. Barbarism and Civilization

------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

We have now traced the dissolution of the gentile constitution in the
three great instances of the Greeks, the Romans, and the Germans. In
conclusion, let us examine the general economic conditions which already
undermined the gentile organization of society at the upper stage of
barbarism and with the coming of civilization overthrew it completely.
Here we shall need Marx's _Capital_ as much as Morgan’s book.

Arising in the middle stage of savagery, further developed during its
upper stage, the gens reaches its most flourishing period, so far as our
sources enable us to judge, during the lower stage of barbarism. We
begin therefore with this stage.

Here – the American Indians must serve as our example – we find the
gentile constitution fully formed. The tribe is now grouped in several
gentes, generally two. With the increase in population, each of these
original gentes splits up into several daughter gentes, their mother
gens now appearing as the phratry. The tribe itself breaks up into
several tribes, in each of which we find again, for the most part, the
old gentes. The related tribes, at least in some cases, are united in a
confederacy. This simple organization suffices completely for the social
conditions out of which it sprang. It is nothing more than the grouping
natural to those conditions, and it is capable of settling all conflicts
that can arise within a society so organized. War settles external
conflicts; it may end with the annihilation of the tribe, but never with
its subjugation. It is the greatness, but also the limitation, of the
gentile constitution that it has no place for ruler and ruled. Within
the tribe there is as yet no difference between rights and duties; the
question whether participation in public affairs, in blood revenge or
atonement, is a right or a duty, does not exist for the Indian; it would
seem to him just as absurd as the question whether it was a right or a
duty to sleep, eat, or hunt. A division of the tribe or of the gens into
different classes was equally impossible. And that brings us to the
examination of the economic basis of these conditions.

The population is extremely sparse; it is dense only at the tribe’s
place of settlement, around which lie in a wide circle first the hunting
grounds and then the protective belt of neutral forest, which separates
the tribe from others. The division of labor is purely primitive,
between the sexes only. The man fights in the wars, goes hunting and
fishing, procures the raw materials of food and the tools necessary for
doing so. The woman looks after the house and the preparation of food
and clothing, cooks, weaves, sews. They are each master in their own
sphere: the man in the forest, the woman in the house. Each is owner of
the instruments which he or she makes and uses: the man of the weapons,
the hunting and fishing implements, the woman of the household gear. The
housekeeping is communal among several and often many families. ^([1])
What is made and used in common is common property - the house, the
garden, the long-boat. Here therefore, and here alone, there still
exists in actual fact that “property created by the owner’s labor” which
in civilized society is an ideal fiction of the jurists and economists,
the last lying legal pretense by which modern capitalist property still
bolsters itself up.

But humanity did not everywhere remain at this stage. In Asia they found
animals which could be tamed and, when once tamed, bred. The wild
buffalo-cow had to be hunted; the tame buffalo-cow gave a calf yearly
and milk as well. A number of the most advanced tribes – the Aryans,
Semites, perhaps already also the Turanians – now made their chief work
first the taming of cattle, later their breeding and tending only.
Pastoral tribes separated themselves from the mass of the rest of the
barbarians: the first great social division of labor. The pastoral
tribes produced not only more necessities of life than the other
barbarians, but different ones. They possessed the advantage over them
of having not only milk, milk products and greater supplies of meat, but
also skins, wool, goat-hair, and spun and woven fabrics, which became
more common as the amount of raw material increased. Thus for the first
time regular exchange became possible. At the earlier stages only
occasional exchanges can take place; particular skill in the making of
weapons and tools may lead to a temporary division of labor. Thus in
many places undoubted remains of workshops for the making of stone tools
have been found, dating from the later Stone Age. The artists who here
perfected their skill probably worked for the whole community, as each
special handicraftsman still does in the gentile communities in India.
In no case could exchange arise at this stage except within the tribe
itself, and then only as an exceptional event. But now, with the
differentiation of pastoral tribes, we find all the conditions ripe for
exchange between branches of different tribes and its development into a
regular established institution. Originally tribes exchanged with tribe
through the respective chiefs of the gentes; but as the herds began to
pass into private ownership, exchange between individuals became more
common, and, finally, the only form. Now the chief article which the
pastoral tribes exchanged with their neighbors was cattle; cattle became
the commodity by which all other commodities were valued and which was
everywhere willingly taken in exchange for them – in short, cattle
acquired a money function and already at this stage did the work of
money. With such necessity and speed, even at the very beginning of
commodity exchange, did the need for a money commodity develop.

Horticulture, probably unknown to Asiatic barbarians of the lower stage,
was being practiced by them in the middle stage at the latest, as the
forerunner of agriculture. In the climate of the Turanian plateau,
pastoral life is impossible without supplies of fodder for the long and
severe winter. Here, therefore, it was essential that land should be put
under grass and corn cultivated. The same is true of the steppes north
of the Black Sea. But when once corn had been grown for the cattle, it
also soon became food for men. The cultivated land still remained tribal
property; at first it was allotted to the gens, later by the gens to the
household communities and finally to individuals for use. The users may
have had certain rights of possession, but nothing more.

Of the industrial achievements of this stage, two are particularly
important. The first is the loom, the second the smelting of metal ores
and the working of metals. Copper and tin and their alloy, bronze, were
by far the most important. Bronze provided serviceable tools and
weapons, though it could not displace stone tools; only iron could do
that, and the method of obtaining iron was not yet understood. Gold and
silver were beginning to be used for ornament and decoration, and must
already have acquired a high value as compared with copper and bronze.

The increase of production in all branches – cattle-raising,
agriculture, domestic handicrafts – gave human labor-power the capacity
to produce a larger product than was necessary for its maintenance. At
the same time it increased the daily amount of work to be done by each
member of the gens, household community or single family. It was now
desirable to bring in new labor forces. War provided them; prisoners of
war were turned into slaves. With its increase of the productivity of
labor, and therefore of wealth, and its extension of the field of
production, the first great social division of labor was bound, in the
general historical conditions prevailing, to bring slavery in its train.
From the first great social division of labor arose the first great
cleavage of society into two classes: masters and slaves, exploiters and
exploited.

As to how and when the herds passed out of the common possession of the
tribe or the gens into the ownership of individual heads of families, we
know nothing at present. But in the main it must have occurred during
this stage. With the herds and the other new riches, a revolution came
over the family. To procure the necessities of life had always been the
business of the man; he produced and owned the means of doing so. The
herds were the new means of producing these necessities; the taming of
the animals in the first instance and their later tending were the man’s
work. To him, therefore, belonged the cattle, and to him the commodities
and the slaves received in exchange for cattle. All the surplus which
the acquisition of the necessities of life now yielded fell to the man;
the woman shared in its enjoyment, but had no part in its ownership. The
“savage” warrior and hunter had been content to take second place in the
house, after the woman; the “gentler” shepherd, in the arrogance of his
wealth, pushed himself forward into the first place and the woman down
into the second. And she could not complain. The division of labor
within the family had regulated the division of property between the man
and the woman. That division of labor had remained the same; and yet it
now turned the previous domestic relation upside down, simply because
the division of labor outside the family had changed. The same cause
which had ensured to the woman her previous supremacy in the house –
that her activity was confined to domestic labor – this same cause now
ensured the man's supremacy in the house: the domestic labor of the
woman no longer counted beside the acquisition of the necessities of
life by the man; the latter was everything, the former an unimportant
extra. We can already see from this that to emancipate woman and make
her the equal of the man is and remains an impossibility so long as the
woman is shut out from social productive labor and restricted to private
domestic labor. The emancipation of woman will only be possible when
woman can take part in production on a large, social scale, and domestic
work no longer claims anything but an insignificant amount of her time.
And only now has that become possible through modern large-scale
industry, which does not merely permit of the employment of female labor
over a wide range, but positively demands it, while it also tends
towards ending private domestic labor by changing it more and more into
a public industry.

The man now being actually supreme in the house, the last barrier to his
absolute supremacy had fallen. This autocracy was confirmed and
perpetuated by the overthrow of mother-right, the introduction of
father-right, and the gradual transition of the pairing marriage into
monogamy. But this tore a breach in the old gentile order; the single
family became a power, and its rise was a menace to the gens.

The next step leads us to the upper stage of barbarism, the period when
all civilized peoples have their Heroic Age: the age of the iron sword,
but also of the iron plowshare and ax. Iron was now at the service of
man, the last and most important of all the raw materials which played a
historically revolutionary role – until the potato. Iron brought the
tillage of large areas, the clearing of wide tracts of virgin forest;
iron gave to the handicraftsman tools so hard and sharp that no stone,
no other known metal could resist them. All this came gradually; the
first iron was often even softer than bronze. Hence stone weapons only
disappeared slowly; not merely in the Hildebrandslied, but even as late
as Hastings in 1066, [the final battle in the Norman Conquest of
England] stone axes were still used for fighting. But progress could not
now be stopped; it went forward with fewer checks and greater speed. The
town, with its houses of stone or brick, encircled by stone walls,
towers and ramparts, became the central seat of the tribe or the
confederacy of tribes – an enormous architectural advance, but also a
sign of growing danger and need for protection. Wealth increased
rapidly, but as the wealth of individuals. The products of weaving,
metal-work and the other handicrafts, which were becoming more and more
differentiated, displayed growing variety and skill. In addition to
corn, leguminous plants and fruit, agriculture now provided wine and
oil, the preparation of which had been learned. Such manifold activities
were no longer within the scope of one and the same individual; the
second great division of labor took place: handicraft separated from
agriculture. The continuous increase of production and simultaneously of
the productivity of labor heightened the value of human labor-power.
Slavery, which during the preceding period was still in its beginnings
and sporadic, now becomes an essential constituent part of the social
system; slaves no longer merely help with production - they are driven
by dozens to work in the fields and the workshops. With the splitting up
of production into the two great main branches, agriculture and
handicrafts, arises production directly for exchange, commodity
production; with it came commerce, not only in the interior and on the
tribal boundaries, but also already overseas. All this, however, was
still very undeveloped; the precious metals were beginning to be the
predominant and general money commodity, but still uncoined, exchanging
simply by their naked weight.

The distinction of rich and poor appears beside that of freemen and
slaves - with the new division of labor, a new cleavage of society into
classes. The inequalities of property among the individual heads of
families break up the old communal household communities wherever they
had still managed to survive, and with them the common cultivation of
the soil by and for these communities. The cultivated land is allotted
for use to single families, at first temporarily, later permanently. The
transition to full private property is gradually accomplished, parallel
with the transition of the pairing marriage into monogamy. The single
family is becoming the economic unit of society.

The denser population necessitates closer consolidation both for
internal and external action. The confederacy of related tribes becomes
everywhere a necessity, and soon also their fusion, involving the fusion
of the separate tribal territories into one territory of the nation. The
military leader of the people, res, basileus, thiudans – becomes an
indispensable, permanent official. The assembly of the people takes
form, wherever it did not already exist. Military leader, council,
assembly of the people are the organs of gentile society developed into
military democracy – military, since war and organization for war have
now become regular functions of national life. Their neighbors' wealth
excites the greed of peoples who already see in the acquisition of
wealth one of the main aims of life. They are barbarians: they think it
more easy and in fact more honorable to get riches by pillage than by
work. War, formerly waged only in revenge for injuries or to extend
territory that had grown too small, is now waged simply for plunder and
becomes a regular industry. Not without reason the bristling battlements
stand menacingly about the new fortified towns; in the moat at their
foot yawns the grave of the gentile constitution, and already they rear
their towers into civilization. Similarly in the interior. The wars of
plunder increase the power of the supreme military leader and the
subordinate commanders; the customary election of their successors from
the same families is gradually transformed, especially after the
introduction of father-right, into a right of hereditary succession,
first tolerated, then claimed, finally usurped; the foundation of the
hereditary monarchy and the hereditary nobility is laid. Thus the organs
of the gentile constitution gradually tear themselves loose from their
roots in the people, in gens, phratry, tribe, and the whole gentile
constitution changes into its opposite: from an organization of tribes
for the free ordering of their own affairs it becomes an organization
for the plundering and oppression of their neighbors; and
correspondingly its organs change from instruments of the will of the
people into independent organs for the domination and oppression of the
people. That, however, would never have been possible if the greed for
riches had not split the members of the gens into rich and poor, if “the
property differences within one and the same gens had not transformed
its unity of interest into antagonism between its members” (Marx), if
the extension of slavery had not already begun to make working for a
living seem fit only for slaves and more dishonorable than pillage.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

We have now reached the threshold of civilization. Civilization opens
with a new advance in the division of labor. At the lowest stage of
barbarism men produced only directly for their own needs; any acts of
exchange were isolated occurrences, the object of exchange merely some
fortuitous surplus. In the middle stage of barbarism we already find
among the pastoral peoples a possession in the form of cattle which,
once the herd has attained a certain size, regularly produces a surplus
over and above the tribe’s own requirements, leading to a division of
labor between pastoral peoples and backward tribes without herds, and
hence to the existence of two different levels of production side by
side with one another and the conditions necessary for regular exchange.
The upper stage of barbarism brings us the further division of labor
between agriculture and handicrafts, hence the production of a
continually increasing portion of the products of labor directly for
exchange, so that exchange between individual producers assumes the
importance of a vital social function. Civilization consolidates and
intensifies all these existing divisions of labor, particularly by
sharpening the opposition between town and country (the town may
economically dominate the country, as in antiquity, or the country the
town, as in the middle ages), and it adds a third division of labor,
peculiar to itself and of decisive importance: it creates a class which
no longer concerns itself with production, but only with the exchange of
the products–the merchants. Hitherto whenever classes had begun to form,
it had always been exclusively in the field of production; the persons
engaged in production were separated into those who directed and those
who executed, or else into large-scale and small-scale producers. Now
for the first time a class appears which, without in any way
participating in production, captures the direction of production as a
whole and economically subjugates the producers; which makes itself into
an indispensable middleman between any two producers and exploits them
both. Under the pretext that they save the producers the trouble and
risk of exchange, extend the sale of their products to distant markets
and are therefore the most useful class of the population, a class of
parasites comes into being, “genuine social ichneumons,” who, as a
reward for their actually very insignificant services, skim all the
cream off production at home and abroad, rapidly amass enormous wealth
and correspondingly social influence, and for that reason receive under
civilization ever higher honors and ever greater control of production,
until at last they also bring forth a product of their own – the
periodical trade crises.

At our stage of development, however, the young merchants had not even
begun to dream of the great destiny awaiting them. But they were growing
and making themselves indispensable, which was quite sufficient. And
with the formation of the merchant class came also the development of
metallic money, the minted coin, a new instrument for the domination of
the non-producer over the producer and his production. The commodity of
commodities had been discovered, that which holds all other commodities
hidden in itself, the magic power which can change at will into
everything desirable and desired. The man who had it ruled the world of
production–and who had more of it than anybody else? The merchant. The
worship of money was safe in his hands. He took good care to make it
clear that, in face of money, all commodities, and hence all producers
of commodities, must prostrate themselves in adoration in the dust. He
proved practically that all other forms of wealth fade into mere
semblance beside this incarnation of wealth as such. Never again has the
power of money shown itself in such primitive brutality and violence as
during these days of its youth. After commodities had begun to sell for
money, loans and advances in money came also, and with them interest and
usury. No legislation of later times so utterly and ruthlessly delivers
over the debtor to the usurious creditor as the legislation of ancient
Athens and ancient Rome–and in both cities it arose spontaneously, as
customary law, without any compulsion other than the economic.

Alongside wealth in commodities and slaves, alongside wealth in money,
there now appeared wealth in land also. The individuals’ rights of
possession in the pieces of land originally allotted to them by gens or
tribe had now become so established that the land was their hereditary
property. Recently they had striven above all to secure their freedom
against the rights of the gentile community over these lands, since
these rights had become for them a fetter. They got rid of the fetter –
but soon afterwards of their new landed property also. Full, free
ownership of the land meant not only power, uncurtailed and unlimited,
to possess the land; it meant also the power to alienate it. As long as
the land belonged to the gens, no such power could exist. But when the
new landed proprietor shook off once and for all the fetters laid upon
him by the prior right of gens and tribe, he also cut the ties which had
hitherto inseparably attached him to the land. Money, invented at the
same time as private property in land, showed him what that meant. Land
could now become a commodity; it could be sold and pledged. Scarcely had
private property in land been introduced than the mortgage was already
invented (see Athens). As hetaerism and prostitution dog the heels of
monogamy, so from now onwards mortgage dogs the heels of private land
ownership. You asked for full, free alienable ownership of the land and
now you have got it – “tu l'as voulu, Georges Dandin.” It's your fault,
Georges Dandin, from Molière’s play.

With trade expansion, money and usury, private property in land and
mortgages, the concentration and centralization of wealth in the hands
of a small class rapidly advanced, accompanied by an increasing
impoverishment of the masses and an increasing mass of impoverishment.
The new aristocracy of wealth, in so far as it had not been identical
from the outset with the old hereditary aristocracy, pushed it
permanently into the background (in Athens, in Rome, among the Germans).
And simultaneous with this division of the citizens into classes
according to wealth there was an enormous increase, particularly in
Greece, in the number of slaves, [2] whose forced labor was the
foundation on which the superstructure of the entire society was reared.

Let us now see what had become of the gentile constitution in this
social upheaval. Confronted by the new forces in whose growth it had had
no share, the gentile constitution was helpless. The necessary condition
for its existence was that the members of a gens or at least of a tribe
were settled together in the same territory and were its sole
inhabitants. That had long ceased to be the case. Every territory now
had a heterogeneous population belonging to the most varied gentes and
tribes; everywhere slaves, protected persons and aliens lived side by
side with citizens. The settled conditions of life which had only been
achieved towards the end of the middle stage of barbarism were broken up
by the repeated shifting and changing of residence under the pressure of
trade, alteration of occupation and changes in the ownership of the
land. The members of the gentile bodies could no longer meet to look
after their common concerns; only unimportant matters, like the
religious festivals, were still perfunctorily attended to. In addition
to the needs and interests with which the gentile bodies were intended
and fitted to deal, the upheaval in productive relations and the
resulting change in the social structure had given rise to new needs and
interests, which were not only alien to the old gentile order, but ran
directly counter to it at every point. The interests of the groups of
handicraftsmen which had arisen with the division of labor, the special
needs of the town as opposed to the country, called for new organs. But
each of these groups was composed of people of the most diverse gentes,
phratries, and tribes, and even included aliens. Such organs had
therefore to be formed outside the gentile constitution, alongside of
it, and hence in opposition to it. And this conflict of interests was at
work within every gentile body, appearing in its most extreme form in
the association of rich and poor, usurers and debtors, in the same gens
and the same tribe. Further, there was the new mass of population
outside the gentile bodies, which, as in Rome, was able to become a
power in the land and at the same time was too numerous to be gradually
absorbed into the kinship groups and tribes. In relation to this mass,
the gentile bodies stood opposed as closed, privileged corporations; the
primitive natural democracy had changed into a malign aristocracy.
Lastly, the gentile constitution had grown out of a society which knew
no internal contradictions, and it was only adapted to such a society.
It possessed no means of coercion except public opinion. But here was a
society which by all its economic conditions of life had been forced to
split itself into freemen and slaves, into the exploiting rich and the
exploited poor; a society which not only could never again reconcile
these contradictions, but was compelled always to intensify them. Such a
society could only exist either in the continuous open fight of these
classes against one another, or else under the rule of a third power,
which, apparently standing above the warring classes, suppressed their
open conflict and allowed the class struggle to be fought out at most in
the economic field, in so-called legal form. The gentile constitution
was finished. It had been shattered by the division of labor and its
result, the cleavage of society into classes. It was replaced by the
state.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

The three main forms in which the state arises on the ruins of the
gentile constitution have been examined in detail above. Athens provides
the purest, classic form; here the state springs directly and mainly out
of the class oppositions which develop within gentile society itself. In
Rome, gentile society becomes a closed aristocracy in the midst of the
numerous plebs who stand outside it, and have duties but no rights; the
victory of plebs breaks up the old constitution based on kinship, and
erects on its ruins the state, into which both the gentile aristocracy
and the plebs are soon completely absorbed. Lastly, in the case of the
German conquerors of the Roman Empire, the state springs directly out of
the conquest of large foreign territories, which the gentile
constitution provides no means of governing. But because this conquest
involves neither a serious struggle with the original population nor a
more advanced division of labor; because conquerors and conquered are
almost on the same level of economic development, and the economic basis
of society remains therefore as before–for these reasons the gentile
constitution is able to survive for many centuries in the altered,
territorial form of the mark constitution and even for a time to
rejuvenate itself in a feebler shape in the later noble and patrician
families, and indeed in peasant families, as in Ditmarschen. ^([3])

The state is therefore by no means a power imposed on society from
without; just as little is it “the reality of the moral idea,” “the
image and the reality of reason,” as Hegel maintains. Rather, it is a
product of society at a particular stage of development; it is the
admission that this society has involved itself in insoluble
self-contradiction and is cleft into irreconcilable antagonisms which it
is powerless to exorcise. But in order that these antagonisms, classes
with conflicting economic interests, shall not consume themselves and
society in fruitless struggle, a power, apparently standing above
society, has become necessary to moderate the conflict and keep it
within the bounds of “order”; and this power, arisen out of society, but
placing itself above it and increasingly alienating itself from it, is
the state.

In contrast to the old gentile organization, the state is distinguished
firstly by the grouping of its members on a territorial basis. The old
gentile bodies, formed and held together by ties of blood, had, as we
have seen, become inadequate largely because they presupposed that the
gentile members were bound to one particular locality, whereas this had
long ago ceased to be the case. The territory was still there, but the
people had become mobile. The territorial division was therefore taken
as the starting point and the system introduced by which citizens
exercised their public rights and duties where they took up residence,
without regard to gens or tribe. This organization of the citizens of
the state according to domicile is common to all states. To us,
therefore, this organization seems natural; but, as we have seen, hard
and protracted struggles were necessary before it was able in Athens and
Rome to displace the old organization founded on kinship.

The second distinguishing characteristic is the institution of a public
force which is no longer immediately identical with the people’s own
organization of themselves as an armed power. This special public force
is needed because a self-acting armed organization of the people has
become impossible since their cleavage into classes. The slaves also
belong to the population: as against the 365,000 slaves, the 90,000
Athenian citizens constitute only a privileged class. The people’s army
of the Athenian democracy confronted the slaves as an aristocratic
public force, and kept them in check; but to keep the citizens in check
as well, a police-force was needed, as described above. This public
force exists in every state; it consists not merely of armed men, but
also of material appendages, prisons and coercive institutions of all
kinds, of which gentile society knew nothing. It may be very
insignificant, practically negligible, in societies with still
undeveloped class antagonisms and living in remote areas, as at times
and in places in the United States of America. But it becomes stronger
in proportion as the class antagonisms within the state become sharper
and as adjoining states grow larger and more populous. It is enough to
look at Europe today, where class struggle and rivalry in conquest have
brought the public power to a pitch that it threatens to devour the
whole of society and even the state itself.

In order to maintain this public power, contributions from the state
citizens are necessary – taxes. These were completely unknown to gentile
society. We know more than enough about them today. With advancing
civilization, even taxes are not sufficient; the state draws drafts on
the future, contracts loans, state debts. Our old Europe can tell a tale
about these, too.

In possession of the public power and the right of taxation, the
officials now present themselves as organs of society standing above
society. The free, willing respect accorded to the organs of the gentile
constitution is not enough for them, even if they could have it.
Representatives of a power which estranges them from society, they have
to be given prestige by means of special decrees, which invest them with
a peculiar sanctity and inviolability. The lowest police officer of the
civilized state has more “authority” than all the organs of gentile
society put together; but the mightiest prince and the greatest
statesman or general of civilization might envy the humblest of the
gentile chiefs the unforced and unquestioned respect accorded to him.
For the one stands in the midst of society; the other is forced to pose
as something outside and above it.

As the state arose from the need to keep class antagonisms in check, but
also arose in the thick of the fight between the classes, it is normally
the state of the most powerful, economically ruling class, which by its
means becomes also the politically ruling class, and so acquires new
means of holding down and exploiting the oppressed class. The ancient
state was, above all, the state of the slave-owners for holding down the
slaves, just as the feudal state was the organ of the nobility for
holding down the peasant serfs and bondsmen, and the modern
representative state is the instrument for exploiting wage-labor by
capital. Exceptional periods, however, occur when the warring classes
are so nearly equal in forces that the state power, as apparent
mediator, acquires for the moment a certain independence in relation to
both. This applies to the absolute monarchy of the seventeenth and
eighteenth centuries, which balances the nobility and the bourgeoisie
against one another; and to the Bonapartism of the First and
particularly of the Second French Empire, which played off the
proletariat against the bourgeoisie and the bourgeoisie against the
proletariat. The latest achievement in this line, in which ruler and
ruled look equally comic, is the new German Empire of the Bismarckian
nation; here the capitalists and the workers are balanced against one
another and both of them fleeced for the benefit of the decayed Prussian
cabbage Junkers. [German:Krautjunker, translated as ‘country squire’,
but with pejorative overtones.]

Further, in most historical states the rights conceded to citizens are
graded on a property basis, whereby it is directly admitted that the
state is an organization for the protection of the possessing class
against the non-possessing class. This is already the case in the
Athenian and Roman property classes. Similarly in the medieval feudal
state, in which the extent of political power was determined by the
extent of landownership. Similarly, also, in the electoral
qualifications in modern parliamentary states. This political
recognition of property differences is, however, by no means essential.
On the contrary, it marks a low stage in the development of the state.
The highest form of the state, the democratic republic, which in our
modern social conditions becomes more and more an unavoidable necessity
and is the form of state in which alone the last decisive battle between
proletariat and bourgeoisie can be fought out – the democratic republic
no longer officially recognizes differences of property. Wealth here
employs its power indirectly, but all the more surely. It does this in
two ways: by plain corruption of officials, of which America is the
classic example, and by an alliance between the government and the stock
exchange, which is effected all the more easily the higher the state
debt mounts and the more the joint-stock companies concentrate in their
hands not only transport but also production itself, and themselves have
their own center in the stock exchange. In addition to America, the
latest French republic illustrates this strikingly, and honest little
Switzerland has also given a creditable performance in this field. But
that a democratic republic is not essential to this brotherly bond
between government and stock exchange is proved not only by England, but
also by the new German Empire, where it is difficult to say who scored
most by the introduction of universal suffrage, Bismarck or the
Bleichroder bank. And lastly the possessing class rules directly by
means of universal suffrage. As long as the oppressed class – in our
case, therefore, the proletariat – is not yet ripe for its
self-liberation, so long will it, in its majority, recognize the
existing order of society as the only possible one and remain
politically the tall of the capitalist class, its extreme left wing. But
in the measure in which it matures towards its self-emancipation, in the
same measure it constitutes itself as its own party and votes for its
own representatives, not those of the capitalists. Universal suffrage is
thus the gauge of the maturity of the working class. It cannot and never
will be anything more in the modern state; but that is enough. On the
day when the thermometer of universal suffrage shows boiling-point among
the workers, they as well as the capitalists will know where they stand.

The state, therefore, has not existed from all eternity. There have been
societies which have managed without it, which had no notion of the
state or state power. At a definite stage of economic development, which
necessarily involved the cleavage of society into classes, the state
became a necessity because of this cleavage. We are now rapidly
approaching a stage in the development of production at which the
existence of these classes has not only ceased to be a necessity, but
becomes a positive hindrance to production. They will fall as inevitably
as they once arose. The state inevitably falls with them. The society
which organizes production anew on the basis of free and equal
association of the producers will put the whole state machinery where it
will then belong–into the museum of antiquities, next to the spinning
wheel and the bronze ax.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Civilization is, therefore, according to the above analysis, the stage
of development in society at which the division of labor, the exchange
between individuals arising from it, and the commodity production which
combines them both, come to their full growth and revolutionizes the
whole of previous society.

At all earlier stages of society production was essentially collective,
just as consumption proceeded by direct distribution of the products
within larger or smaller communistic communities. This collective
production was very limited; but inherent in it was the producers’
control over their process of production and their product. They knew
what became of their product: they consumed it; it did not leave their
hands. And so long as production remains on this basis, it cannot grow
above the heads of the producers nor raise up incorporeal alien powers
against them, as in civilization is always and inevitably the case.

But the division of labor slowly insinuates itself into this process of
production. It undermines the collectivity of production and
appropriation, elevates appropriation by individuals into the general
rule, and thus creates exchange between individuals – how it does so, we
have examined above. Gradually commodity production becomes the
dominating form.

With commodity production, production no longer for use by the producers
but for exchange, the products necessarily change hands. In exchanging
his product, the producer surrenders it; he no longer knows what becomes
of it. When money, and with money the merchant, steps in as intermediary
between the producers, the process of exchange becomes still more
complicated, the final fate of the products still more uncertain. The
merchants are numerous, and none of them knows what the other is doing.
The commodities already pass not only from hand to hand; they also pass
from market to market; the producers have lost control over the total
production within their own spheres, and the merchants have not gained
it. Products and production become subjects of chance.

But chance is only the one pole of a relation whose other pole is named
“necessity.” In the world of nature, where chance also seems to rule, we
have long since demonstrated in each separate field the inner necessity
and law asserting itself in this chance. But what is true of the natural
world is true also of society. The more a social activity, a series of
social processes, becomes too powerful for men's conscious control and
grows above their heads, and the more it appears a matter of pure
chance, then all the more surely within this chance the laws peculiar to
it and inherent in it assert themselves as if by natural necessity. Such
laws also govern the chances of commodity production and exchange. To
the individuals producing or exchanging, they appear as alien, at first
often unrecognized, powers, whose nature Must first be laboriously
investigated and established. These economic laws of commodity
production are modified with the various stages of this form of
production; but in general the whole period of civilization is dominated
by them. And still to this day the product rules the producer; still to
this day the total production of society is regulated, not by a jointly
devised plan, but by blind laws, which manifest themselves with
elemental violence, in the final instance in the storms of the
periodical trade crises.

We saw above how at a fairly early stage in the development of
production, human labor-power obtains the capacity of producing a
considerably greater product than is required for the maintenance of the
producers, and how this stage of development was in the main the same as
that in which division of labor and exchange between individuals arise.
It was not long then before the great “truth” was discovered that man
also can be a commodity; that human energy can be exchanged and put to
use by making a man into a slave. Hardly had men begun to exchange than
already they themselves were being exchanged. The active became the
passive, whether the men liked it or not.

With slavery, which attained its fullest development under civilization,
came the first great cleavage of society into an exploiting and an
exploited class. This cleavage persisted during the whole civilized
period. Slavery is the first form of exploitation, the form peculiar to
the ancient world; it is succeeded by serfdom in the middle ages, and
wage-labor in the more recent period. These are the three great forms of
servitude, characteristic of the three great epochs of civilization;
open, and in recent times disguised, slavery always accompanies them.

The stage of commodity production with which civilization begins is
distinguished economically by the introduction of (1) metal money, and
with it money capital, interest and usury; (2) merchants, as the class
of intermediaries between the producers; (3) private ownership of land,
and the mortgage system; (4) slave labor as the dominant form of
production The form of family corresponding to civilization and coming
to definite supremacy with it is monogamy, the domination of the man
over the woman, and the single family as the economic unit of society.
The central link in civilized society is the state, which in all typical
periods is without exception the state of the ruling class, and in all
cases continues to be essentially a machine for holding down the
oppressed, exploited class. Also characteristic of civilization is the
establishment of a permanent opposition between town and country as
basis of the whole social division of labor; and, further, the
introduction of wills, whereby the owner of property is still able to
dispose over it even when he is dead. This institution, which is a
direct affront to the old gentile constitution, was unknown in Athens
until the time of Solon; in Rome it was introduced early, though we do
not know the date; [4] among the Germans it was the clerics who
introduced it, in order that there might be nothing to stop the pious
German from leaving his legacy to the Church.

With this as its basic constitution, civilization achieved things of
which gentile society was not even remotely capable. But it achieved
them by setting in motion the lowest instincts and passions in man and
developing them at the expense of all his other abilities. From its
first day to this, sheer greed was the driving spirit of civilization;
wealth and again wealth and once more wealth, wealth, not of society,
but of the single scurvy individual–here was its one and final aim. If
at the same time the progressive development of science and a repeated
flowering of supreme art dropped into its lap, it was only because
without them modern wealth could not have completely realized its
achievements.

Since civilization is founded on the exploitation of one class by
another class, its whole development proceeds in a constant
contradiction. Every step forward in production is at the same time a
step backwards in the position of the oppressed class, that is, of the
great majority. Whatever benefits some necessarily injures the others;
every fresh emancipation of one class is necessarily a new oppression
for another class. The most striking proof of this is provided by the
introduction of machinery, the effects of which are now known to the
whole world. And if among the barbarians, as we saw, the distinction
between rights and duties could hardly be drawn, civilization makes the
difference and antagonism between them clear even to the dullest
intelligence by giving one class practically all the rights and the
other class practically all the duties.

But that should not be: what is good for the ruling class must also be
good for the whole of society, with which the ruling-class identifies
itself. Therefore the more civilization advances, the more it is
compelled to cover the evils it necessarily creates with the cloak of
love and charity, to palliate them or to deny them–in short, to
introduce a conventional hypocrisy which was unknown to earlier forms of
society and even to the first stages of civilization, and which
culminates in the pronouncement: the exploitation of the oppressed class
is carried on by the exploiting class simply and solely in the interests
of the exploited class itself; and if the exploited class cannot see it
and even grows rebellious, that is the basest ingratitude to its
benefactors, the exploiters. ^([5])

And now, in conclusion, Morgan’s judgment of civilization:

Since the advent of civilization, the outgrowth of property has been so
immense, its forms so diversified, its uses so expanding and its
management so intelligent in the interests of its owners, that it has
become, on the part of the people, an unmanageable power. The human mind
stands bewildered in the presence of its own creation. The time will
come, nevertheless, when human intelligence will rise to the mastery
over property, and define the relations of the state to the property it
protects, as well as the obligations and the limits of the rights of its
owners. The interests of society are paramount to individual interests,
and the two must be brought into just and harmonious relations. A mere
property career is not the final destiny of mankind, if progress is to
be the law of the future as it has been of the past. The time which has
passed away since civilization began is but a fragment of the past
duration of man’s existence; and but a fragment of the ages yet to come.
The dissolution of society bids fair to become the termination of a
career of which property is the end and aim; because such a career
contains the elements of self-destruction. Democracy in government,
brotherhood in society, equality in rights and privileges, and universal
education, foreshadow the next higher plane of society to which
experience, intelligence and knowledge are steadily tending. It will be
a revival, in a higher form, of the liberty, equality and fraternity of
the ancient gentes.

[Morgan, op. cit., p. 562.–Ed.]

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

Footnotes

 

[1] Especially on the north-west coast of America–see Bancroft. Among
the Haidahs on Queen Charlotte Islands there are households with as many
as 700 persons under one roof. Among the Nootkas whole tribes used to
live under one roof.

 

[2] For the number of slaves in Athens, see above, page 107. In Corinth,
at the height of its power, the number of slaves was 460,000; in Ægina,
470,000. In both cases, ten times the population of free citizens.

 

[3] The first historian who had at any rate an approximate conception of
the nature of the gens was Niebuhr, and for this he had to thank his
acquaintance with the Ditmarechen families, though he was overhasty in
transferring their characteristics to the gens.

 

[4] The second part of Lassalle&rsquo;s _System der erworbenen Rechte
(System of Acquired Rights)_ turns chiefly on the proposition that the
Roman testament is as old as Rome itself, that there was never in Roman
history “a time when there were no testaments“; that, on the contrary,
the testament originated in pre-Roman times out of the cult of the dead.
Lassalle, as a faithful Hegelian of the old school, derives the
provisions of Roman law not from the social relations of the Romans, but
from the “speculative concept” of the human will, and so arrives at this
totally unhistorical conclusion. This is not to be wondered at in a book
which comes to the conclusion, on the ground of the same speculative
concept, that the transfer of property was a purely secondary matter in
Roman inheritance. Lassalle not only believes in the illusions of the
Roman jurists, particularly of the earlier periods; he outdoes them.

 

[5] I originally intended to place the brilliant criticism of
civilization which is found scattered through the work of Charles
Fourier beside that of Morgan and my own. Unfortunately, I have not the
time. I will only observe that Fourier already regards monogamy and
private property in land as the chief characteristics of civilization,
and that he calls civilization a war of the rich against the poor. We
also find already in his work the profound recognition that in all
societies which are imperfect and split into antagonisms single families
(les families incohirentes) are the economic units.

 

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Appendix. A Recently Discovered Case of Group Marriage

------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

1892 From _Die Neue Zeit_ Vol. XI, No. I, pp. 373-75

Since it has recently become fashionable among certain rationalistic
ethnographers to deny the existence of group marriage, the following
report is of interest; I translate it from the Russkiye Vyedomosti,
Moscow, October 14, 1892 (Old Style). Not only group marriage, i.e., the
right of mutual sexual intercourse between a number of men and a number
of women, is expressly affirmed to be in full force, but a form of group
marriage which closely follows the punaluan marriage of the Hawaiians,
the most developed and classic phase of group marriage. While the
typical punaluan family consists of a number of brothers (own and
collateral), who are married to a number of own and collateral sisters,
we here find on the island of Sakhalin that a man is married to all the
wives of his brothers and to all the sisters of his wife, which means,
seen from the woman's side, that his wife may freely practice sexual
intercourse with the brothers of her husband and the husbands of her
sisters. It therefore differs from the typical form of punaluan marriage
only in the fact that the brothers of the husband and the husbands of
the sisters are not necessarily the same persons.

It should further be observed that this report again confirms what I
said in The Origin of the Family, 4th edition, pp. 28-29: that group
marriage does not look at all like what our brother-obsessed philistine
imagines; that the partners in group marriage do not lead in public the
same kind of lascivious life as he practices in secret, but that this
form of marriage, at least in the instances still known to occur today,
differs in practice from a loose pairing marriage or from polygamy only
in the fact that custom permits sexual intercourse in a number of cases
where otherwise it would be severely punished. That the actual exercise
of these rights is gradually dying out only proves that this form of
marriage is itself destined to die out, which is further confirmed by
its infrequency.

The whole description, moreover, is interesting because it again
demonstrates the similarity, even the identity in their main
characteristics, of the social institutions of primitive peoples at
approximately the same stage of development. Most of what the report
states about these Mongoloids on the island of Sakhalin also holds for
the Dravidian tribes of India, the South Sea Islanders at the time of
their discovery, and the American Indians. The report runs:

"At the session of October 10 (Old Style; October 22, New Style) of the
Anthropological Section of the Society of the Friends of Natural
Science, N. A. Yanchuk read an interesting communication from Mr.
Sternberg on the Gilyaks, a little-studied tribe on the island of
Sakhalin, who are at the cultural level of savagery. The Gilyaks are
acquainted neither with agriculture nor with pottery; they procure their
food chiefly by hunting and fishing; they warm water in wooden vessels
by throwing in heated stones, etc. Of particular interest are their
institutions relating to the family and to the gens. The Gilyak
addresses as father, not only his own natural father, but also all the
brothers of his father; all the wives of these brothers, as well as all
the sisters of his mother, he addresses as his mothers; the children of
all these 'fathers' and 'mothers' he addresses as his brothers and
sisters. This system of address also exists, as is well known, among the
Iroquois and other Indian tribes of North America, as also among some
tribes of India. But whereas in these cases it has long since ceased to
correspond to the actual conditions, among the Gilyaks it serves to
designate a state still valid today. To this day every Gilyak has the
rights of a husband in regard to the wives of his brothers and to the
sisters of his wife; at any rate, the exercise of these rights is not
regarded as impermissible. These survivals of group marriage on the
basis of the gens are reminiscent of the well-known punaluan marriage,
which still existed in the Sandwich Islands in the first half of this
century. Family and gens relations of this type form the basis of the
whole gentile order and social constitution of the Gilyaks.

"The gens of a Gilyak consists of all-nearer and more remote, real and
nominal-brothers of his father, of their fathers and mothers of the
children of his brothers, and of his own children.

One can readily understand that a gens so constituted may comprise an
enormous number of people. Life within the gens proceeds according to
the following principles. Marriage within the gens is unconditionally
prohibited. When a Gilyak dies, his wife passes by decision of the gens
to one of his brothers, own or nominal. The gens provides for the
maintenance of all of its members who are unable to work. 'We have no
poor,' said a Gilyak to the writer. 'Whoever is in need, is fed by the
khal [gens].' The members of the gens are further united by common
sacrificial ceremonies and festivals, a common burial place, etc.

"The gens guarantees the life and security of its members against
attacks by non-gentiles; the means of repression used is blood-revenge,
though under Russian rule the practice has very much declined. Women are
completely excepted from gentile blood-revenge. In some very rare cases
the gens adopts members of other gentes. It is a general rule that the
property of a deceased member may not pass out of the gens; in this
respect the famous provision of the Twelve Tables holds literally among
the Gilyaks: si suos heredes non habet, gentiles familiam habento -- if
he has no heirs of his own, the members of the gens shall inherit. No
important event takes place in the life of a Gilyak without
participation by the gens. Not very long ago, about one or two
generations, the oldest gentile member was the head of the community,
the starosta of the gens; today the functions of the chief elder of the
gens are restricted almost solely to presiding over religious
ceremonies. The gentes are often dispersed among widely distant places,
but even when separated the members of a gens still remember one another
and continue to give one another hospitality, and to provide mutual
assistance and protection, etc. Except under the most extreme necessity,
the Gilyak never leaves the fellow-members of his gens or the graves of
his gens. Gentile society has impressed a very definite stamp on the
whole mental life of the Gilyaks, on their character, their customs and
institutions. The habit of common discussion and decision on all
matters, the necessity of continually taking an active part in all
questions affecting the members of the gens, the solidarity of
blood-revenge, the fact of being compelled and accustomed to live
together with ten or more like himself in great tents (yurtas), and to
be, in short, always with other people-all this has given the Gilyak a
sociable and open character. The Gilyak is extraordinarily hospitable;
he loves to entertain guests and to come himself as a guest. This
admirable habit of hospitality is especially prominent in times of
distress. In a bad year, when a Gilyak has nothing for himself or for
his dogs to eat, he does not stretch out his hand for alms, but
confidently seeks hospitality, and is fed, often for a considerable
time.

"Among the Gilyaks of Sakhalin crimes from motives of personal gain
practically never occur. The Gilyak keeps his valuables in a storehouse,
which is never locked. He has such a keen sense of shame that if he is
convicted of a disgraceful act, he immediately goes into the forest and
hangs himself. Murder is very rare, and is hardly ever committed except
in anger, never from intentions of gain. In his dealings with other
people, the Gilyak shows himself honest, reliable, and conscientious.

"Despite their long subjection to the Manchurians, now become Chinese,
and despite the corrupting influence of the settlement of the Amur
district, the Gilyaks still preserve in their moral character many of
the virtues of a primitive tribe. But the fate awaiting their social
order cannot be averted. One or two more generations, and the Gilyaks on
the mainland will have been completely Russianized, and together with
the benefits of culture they will also acquire its defects. The Gilyaks
on the island of Sakhalin, being more or less remote from the centers of
Russian settlement, have some prospect of preserving their way of life
unspoiled rather longer. But among them, too, the influence of their
Russian neighbors is beginning to make itself felt. The Gilyaks come
into the villages to trade, they go to Nikolaievsk to look for work; and
every Gilyak who returns from such work to his home brings with him the
same atmosphere which the Russian worker takes back from the town into
his village. And at the same time, working in the town, with its chances
and changes of fortune, destroys more and more that primitive equality
which is such a prominent feature of the artlessly simple economic life
of these peoples.

"Mr. Sternberg's article, which also contains information about their
religious views and customs and their legal institutions, will appear
unabridged in the Etnografitcheskoye Obozrenic (Ethnographical Review).

 

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------
